
--**--**--
 her and her mother was strikingly great.
 
 Elinor saw, with concern, the excess of her sister's sensibility; but
 by Mrs. Dashwood it was valued and cherished.  They encouraged each
 other now in the violence of their affliction.  The agony of grief
 which overpowered them at first, was voluntarily renewed, was sought
 for, was created again and again.  They gave themselves up wholly to
 their sorrow, seeking increase of wretchedness in every reflection that
 could afford it, and resolved against ever admitting consolation in
 future.  Elinor, too, was deeply afflicted; but still she could
 struggle, she could exert herself.  She could consult with her brother,
 could receive her sister-in-law on her arrival, and treat her with
 proper attention; and could strive to rouse her mother to similar
 exertion, and encourage her to similar forbearance.
 
 Margaret, the other sister, was a good-humored, well-disposed girl; but
 as she had already imbibed a good deal of Marianne's romance, without
 having much of her sense, she did not, at thirteen, bid fair to equal
 her sisters at a more advanced period of life.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER 2
 
 
 Mrs. John Dashwood now installed herself mistress of Norland; and her
 mother and sisters-in-law were degraded to the condition of visitors.
 As such, however, they were treated by her with quiet civility; and by
 her husband with as much kindness as he could feel towards anybody
 beyond himself, his wife, and their child.  He really pressed them,
 with some earnestness, to consider Norland as their home; and, as no
 plan appeared so eligible to Mrs. Dashwood as remaining there till she
 could accommodate herself with a house in the neighbourhood, his
 invitation was accepted.
 
 A continuance in a place where everything reminded her of former
 delight, was exactly what suited her mind.  In seasons of cheerfulness,
 no temper could be more cheerful than hers, or possess, in a greater
--**--**--
 afford to do."
 
 "Certainly--and I think I may afford to give them five hundred pounds
 a-piece.  As it is, without any addition of mine, they will each have
 about three thousand pounds on their mother's death--a very comfortable
 fortune for any young woman."
 
 "To be sure it is; and, indeed, it strikes me that they can want no
 addition at all.  They will have ten thousand pounds divided amongst
 them.  If they marry, they will be sure of doing well, and if they do
 not, they may all live very comfortably together on the interest of ten
 thousand pounds."
 
 "That is very true, and, therefore, I do not know whether, upon the
 whole, it would not be more advisable to do something for their mother
 while she lives, rather than for them--something of the annuity kind I
 mean.--My sisters would feel the good effects of it as well as herself.
 A hundred a year would make them all perfectly comfortable."
 
 His wife hesitated a little, however, in giving her consent to this
 plan.
 
 "To be sure," said she, "it is better than parting with fifteen hundred
 pounds at once.  But, then, if Mrs. Dashwood should live fifteen years
 we shall be completely taken in."
 
 "Fifteen years! my dear Fanny; her life cannot be worth half that
 purchase."
 
 "Certainly not; but if you observe, people always live for ever when
 there is an annuity to be paid them; and she is very stout and healthy,
 and hardly forty.  An annuity is a very serious business; it comes over
 and over every year, and there is no getting rid of it.  You are not
 aware of what you are doing.  I have known a great deal of the trouble
 of annuities; for my mother was clogged with the payment of three to
--**--**--
 comprehended all his merits; the persuasion of his regard for Elinor
 perhaps assisted her penetration; but she really felt assured of his
 worth: and even that quietness of manner, which militated against all
 her established ideas of what a young man's address ought to be, was no
 longer uninteresting when she knew his heart to be warm and his temper
 affectionate.
 
 No sooner did she perceive any symptom of love in his behaviour to
 Elinor, than she considered their serious attachment as certain, and
 looked forward to their marriage as rapidly approaching.
 
 "In a few months, my dear Marianne." said she, "Elinor will, in all
 probability be settled for life.  We shall miss her; but SHE will be
 happy."
 
 "Oh! Mama, how shall we do without her?"
 
 "My love, it will be scarcely a separation.  We shall live within a few
 miles of each other, and shall meet every day of our lives.  You will
 gain a brother, a real, affectionate brother.  I have the highest
 opinion in the world of Edward's heart.  But you look grave, Marianne;
 do you disapprove your sister's choice?"
 
 "Perhaps," said Marianne, "I may consider it with some surprise.
 Edward is very amiable, and I love him tenderly.  But yet--he is not
 the kind of young man--there is something wanting--his figure is not
 striking; it has none of that grace which I should expect in the man
 who could seriously attach my sister.  His eyes want all that spirit,
 that fire, which at once announce virtue and intelligence.  And besides
 all this, I am afraid, Mama, he has no real taste.  Music seems
 scarcely to attract him, and though he admires Elinor's drawings very
 much, it is not the admiration of a person who can understand their
 worth.  It is evident, in spite of his frequent attention to her while
--**--**--
 shall not lose you so soon, and Edward will have greater opportunity of
 improving that natural taste for your favourite pursuit which must be
 so indispensably necessary to your future felicity.  Oh! if he should
 be so far stimulated by your genius as to learn to draw himself, how
 delightful it would be!"
 
 Elinor had given her real opinion to her sister.  She could not
 consider her partiality for Edward in so prosperous a state as Marianne
 had believed it.  There was, at times, a want of spirits about him
 which, if it did not denote indifference, spoke of something almost as
 unpromising.  A doubt of her regard, supposing him to feel it, need not
 give him more than inquietude.  It would not be likely to produce that
 dejection of mind which frequently attended him.  A more reasonable
 cause might be found in the dependent situation which forbade the
 indulgence of his affection.  She knew that his mother neither behaved
 to him so as to make his home comfortable at present, nor to give him
 any assurance that he might form a home for himself, without strictly
 attending to her views for his aggrandizement.  With such a knowledge
 as this, it was impossible for Elinor to feel easy on the subject.  She
 was far from depending on that result of his preference of her, which
 her mother and sister still considered as certain.  Nay, the longer
 they were together the more doubtful seemed the nature of his regard;
 and sometimes, for a few painful minutes, she believed it to be no more
 than friendship.
 
 But, whatever might really be its limits, it was enough, when perceived
 by his sister, to make her uneasy, and at the same time, (which was
 still more common,) to make her uncivil.  She took the first
--**--**--
 exertion to which he had limited the performance of his promise to his
 father was by this arrangement rendered impracticable.-- The furniture
 was all sent around by water.  It chiefly consisted of household linen,
 plate, china, and books, with a handsome pianoforte of Marianne's.
 Mrs. John Dashwood saw the packages depart with a sigh: she could not
 help feeling it hard that as Mrs. Dashwood's income would be so
 trifling in comparison with their own, she should have any handsome
 article of furniture.
 
 Mrs. Dashwood took the house for a twelvemonth; it was ready furnished,
 and she might have immediate possession.  No difficulty arose on either
 side in the agreement; and she waited only for the disposal of her
 effects at Norland, and to determine her future household, before she
 set off for the west; and this, as she was exceedingly rapid in the
 performance of everything that interested her, was soon done.--The
 horses which were left her by her husband had been sold soon after his
 death, and an opportunity now offering of disposing of her carriage,
 she agreed to sell that likewise at the earnest advice of her eldest
 daughter.  For the comfort of her children, had she consulted only her
 own wishes, she would have kept it; but the discretion of Elinor
 prevailed.  HER wisdom too limited the number of their servants to
 three; two maids and a man, with whom they were speedily provided from
 amongst those who had formed their establishment at Norland.
 
 The man and one of the maids were sent off immediately into Devonshire,
 to prepare the house for their mistress's arrival; for as Lady
 Middleton was entirely unknown to Mrs. Dashwood, she preferred going
 directly to the cottage to being a visitor at Barton Park; and she
 relied so undoubtingly on Sir John's description of the house, as to
--**--**--
 of their sitting room.
 
 In such employments as these they were interrupted soon after breakfast
 the next day by the entrance of their landlord, who called to welcome
 them to Barton, and to offer them every accommodation from his own
 house and garden in which theirs might at present be deficient.  Sir
 John Middleton was a good looking man about forty.  He had formerly
 visited at Stanhill, but it was too long for his young cousins to
 remember him.  His countenance was thoroughly good-humoured; and his
 manners were as friendly as the style of his letter.  Their arrival
 seemed to afford him real satisfaction, and their comfort to be an
 object of real solicitude to him.  He said much of his earnest desire
 of their living in the most sociable terms with his family, and pressed
 them so cordially to dine at Barton Park every day till they were
 better settled at home, that, though his entreaties were carried to a
 point of perseverance beyond civility, they could not give offence.
 His kindness was not confined to words; for within an hour after he
 left them, a large basket full of garden stuff and fruit arrived from
 the park, which was followed before the end of the day by a present of
 game.  He insisted, moreover, on conveying all their letters to and
 from the post for them, and would not be denied the satisfaction of
 sending them his newspaper every day.
 
 Lady Middleton had sent a very civil message by him, denoting her
 intention of waiting on Mrs. Dashwood as soon as she could be assured
 that her visit would be no inconvenience; and as this message was
 answered by an invitation equally polite, her ladyship was introduced
 to them the next day.
 
 They were, of course, very anxious to see a person on whom so much of
--**--**--
 rest of the children, as Sir John would not leave the house without
 securing their promise of dining at the park the next day.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER 7
 
 
 Barton Park was about half a mile from the cottage.  The ladies had
 passed near it in their way along the valley, but it was screened from
 their view at home by the projection of a hill.  The house was large
 and handsome; and the Middletons lived in a style of equal hospitality
 and elegance.  The former was for Sir John's gratification, the latter
 for that of his lady.  They were scarcely ever without some friends
 staying with them in the house, and they kept more company of every
 kind than any other family in the neighbourhood.  It was necessary to
 the happiness of both; for however dissimilar in temper and outward
 behaviour, they strongly resembled each other in that total want of
 talent and taste which confined their employments, unconnected with
 such as society produced, within a very narrow compass.  Sir John was a
 sportsman, Lady Middleton a mother.  He hunted and shot, and she
 humoured her children; and these were their only resources.  Lady
 Middleton had the advantage of being able to spoil her children all the
 year round, while Sir John's independent employments were in existence
 only half the time.  Continual engagements at home and abroad, however,
 supplied all the deficiencies of nature and education; supported the
 good spirits of Sir John, and gave exercise to the good breeding of his
 wife.
 
 Lady Middleton piqued herself upon the elegance of her table, and of
 all her domestic arrangements; and from this kind of vanity was her
 greatest enjoyment in any of their parties.  But Sir John's
 satisfaction in society was much more real; he delighted in collecting
 about him more young people than his house would hold, and the noisier
--**--**--
 others; and she was reasonable enough to allow that a man of five and
 thirty might well have outlived all acuteness of feeling and every
 exquisite power of enjoyment.  She was perfectly disposed to make every
 allowance for the colonel's advanced state of life which humanity
 required.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER 8
 
 
 Mrs. Jennings was a widow with an ample jointure.  She had only two
 daughters, both of whom she had lived to see respectably married, and
 she had now therefore nothing to do but to marry all the rest of the
 world.  In the promotion of this object she was zealously active, as
 far as her ability reached; and missed no opportunity of projecting
 weddings among all the young people of her acquaintance.  She was
 remarkably quick in the discovery of attachments, and had enjoyed the
 advantage of raising the blushes and the vanity of many a young lady by
 insinuations of her power over such a young man; and this kind of
 discernment enabled her soon after her arrival at Barton decisively to
 pronounce that Colonel Brandon was very much in love with Marianne
 Dashwood.  She rather suspected it to be so, on the very first evening
 of their being together, from his listening so attentively while she
 sang to them; and when the visit was returned by the Middletons' dining
 at the cottage, the fact was ascertained by his listening to her again.
 It must be so.  She was perfectly convinced of it.  It would be an
 excellent match, for HE was rich, and SHE was handsome.  Mrs. Jennings
 had been anxious to see Colonel Brandon well married, ever since her
 connection with Sir John first brought him to her knowledge; and she
 was always anxious to get a good husband for every pretty girl.
 
 The immediate advantage to herself was by no means inconsiderable, for
--**--**--
 themselves.  The house and the garden, with all the objects surrounding
 them, were now become familiar, and the ordinary pursuits which had
 given to Norland half its charms were engaged in again with far greater
 enjoyment than Norland had been able to afford, since the loss of their
 father.  Sir John Middleton, who called on them every day for the first
 fortnight, and who was not in the habit of seeing much occupation at
 home, could not conceal his amazement on finding them always employed.
 
 Their visitors, except those from Barton Park, were not many; for, in
 spite of Sir John's urgent entreaties that they would mix more in the
 neighbourhood, and repeated assurances of his carriage being always at
 their service, the independence of Mrs. Dashwood's spirit overcame the
 wish of society for her children; and she was resolute in declining to
 visit any family beyond the distance of a walk.  There were but few who
 could be so classed; and it was not all of them that were attainable.
 About a mile and a half from the cottage, along the narrow winding
 valley of Allenham, which issued from that of Barton, as formerly
 described, the girls had, in one of their earliest walks, discovered an
 ancient respectable looking mansion which, by reminding them a little
 of Norland, interested their imagination and made them wish to be
 better acquainted with it.  But they learnt, on enquiry, that its
 possessor, an elderly lady of very good character, was unfortunately
 too infirm to mix with the world, and never stirred from home.
 
 The whole country about them abounded in beautiful walks.  The high
 downs which invited them from almost every window of the cottage to
 seek the exquisite enjoyment of air on their summits, were a happy
 alternative when the dirt of the valleys beneath shut up their superior
--**--**--
 features were all good; her smile was sweet and attractive; and in her
 eyes, which were very dark, there was a life, a spirit, an eagerness,
 which could hardily be seen without delight.  From Willoughby their
 expression was at first held back, by the embarrassment which the
 remembrance of his assistance created.  But when this passed away, when
 her spirits became collected, when she saw that to the perfect
 good-breeding of the gentleman, he united frankness and vivacity, and
 above all, when she heard him declare, that of music and dancing he was
 passionately fond, she gave him such a look of approbation as secured
 the largest share of his discourse to herself for the rest of his stay.
 
 It was only necessary to mention any favourite amusement to engage her
 to talk.  She could not be silent when such points were introduced, and
 she had neither shyness nor reserve in their discussion.  They speedily
 discovered that their enjoyment of dancing and music was mutual, and
 that it arose from a general conformity of judgment in all that related
 to either.  Encouraged by this to a further examination of his
 opinions, she proceeded to question him on the subject of books; her
 favourite authors were brought forward and dwelt upon with so rapturous
 a delight, that any young man of five and twenty must have been
 insensible indeed, not to become an immediate convert to the excellence
 of such works, however disregarded before.  Their taste was strikingly
 alike.  The same books, the same passages were idolized by each--or if
 any difference appeared, any objection arose, it lasted no longer than
 till the force of her arguments and the brightness of her eyes could be
 displayed.  He acquiesced in all her decisions, caught all her
 enthusiasm; and long before his visit concluded, they conversed with
--**--**--
 Marianne, of marking his animated admiration of her, and of receiving,
 in her behaviour to himself, the most pointed assurance of her
 affection.
 
 Elinor could not be surprised at their attachment.  She only wished
 that it were less openly shewn; and once or twice did venture to
 suggest the propriety of some self-command to Marianne.  But Marianne
 abhorred all concealment where no real disgrace could attend unreserve;
 and to aim at the restraint of sentiments which were not in themselves
 illaudable, appeared to her not merely an unnecessary effort, but a
 disgraceful subjection of reason to common-place and mistaken notions.
 Willoughby thought the same; and their behaviour at all times, was an
 illustration of their opinions.
 
 When he was present she had no eyes for any one else.  Every thing he
 did, was right.  Every thing he said, was clever.  If their evenings at
 the park were concluded with cards, he cheated himself and all the rest
 of the party to get her a good hand.  If dancing formed the amusement
 of the night, they were partners for half the time; and when obliged to
 separate for a couple of dances, were careful to stand together and
 scarcely spoke a word to any body else.  Such conduct made them of
 course most exceedingly laughed at; but ridicule could not shame, and
 seemed hardly to provoke them.
 
 Mrs. Dashwood entered into all their feelings with a warmth which left
 her no inclination for checking this excessive display of them.  To her
 it was but the natural consequence of a strong affection in a young and
 ardent mind.
 
 This was the season of happiness to Marianne.  Her heart was devoted to
 Willoughby, and the fond attachment to Norland, which she brought with
 her from Sussex, was more likely to be softened than she had thought it
--**--**--
 them.  From that moment she doubted not of their being engaged to each
 other; and the belief of it created no other surprise than that she, or
 any of their friends, should be left by tempers so frank, to discover
 it by accident.
 
 Margaret related something to her the next day, which placed this
 matter in a still clearer light.  Willoughby had spent the preceding
 evening with them, and Margaret, by being left some time in the parlour
 with only him and Marianne, had had opportunity for observations,
 which, with a most important face, she communicated to her eldest
 sister, when they were next by themselves.
 
 "Oh, Elinor!" she cried, "I have such a secret to tell you about
 Marianne.  I am sure she will be married to Mr. Willoughby very soon."
 
 "You have said so," replied Elinor, "almost every day since they first
 met on High-church Down; and they had not known each other a week, I
 believe, before you were certain that Marianne wore his picture round
 her neck; but it turned out to be only the miniature of our great
 uncle."
 
 "But indeed this is quite another thing.  I am sure they will be
 married very soon, for he has got a lock of her hair."
 
 "Take care, Margaret.  It may be only the hair of some great uncle of
 HIS."
 
 "But, indeed, Elinor, it is Marianne's. I am almost sure it is, for I
 saw him cut it off.  Last night after tea, when you and mama went out
 of the room, they were whispering and talking together as fast as could
 be, and he seemed to be begging something of her, and presently he took
 up her scissors and cut off a long lock of her hair, for it was all
 tumbled down her back; and he kissed it, and folded it up in a piece of
--**--**--
 delighted her husband and mother.  The idea however started by her, was
 immediately pursued by Colonel Brandon, who was on every occasion
 mindful of the feelings of others; and much was said on the subject of
 rain by both of them.  Willoughby opened the piano-forte, and asked
 Marianne to sit down to it; and thus amidst the various endeavours of
 different people to quit the topic, it fell to the ground.  But not so
 easily did Elinor recover from the alarm into which it had thrown her.
 
 A party was formed this evening for going on the following day to see a
 very fine place about twelve miles from Barton, belonging to a
 brother-in-law of Colonel Brandon, without whose interest it could not
 be seen, as the proprietor, who was then abroad, had left strict orders
 on that head.  The grounds were declared to be highly beautiful, and
 Sir John, who was particularly warm in their praise, might be allowed
 to be a tolerable judge, for he had formed parties to visit them, at
 least, twice every summer for the last ten years.  They contained a
 noble piece of water; a sail on which was to a form a great part of the
 morning's amusement; cold provisions were to be taken, open carriages
 only to be employed, and every thing conducted in the usual style of a
 complete party of pleasure.
 
 To some few of the company it appeared rather a bold undertaking,
 considering the time of year, and that it had rained every day for the
 last fortnight;--and Mrs. Dashwood, who had already a cold, was
 persuaded by Elinor to stay at home.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER 13
 
 
 Their intended excursion to Whitwell turned out very different from
 what Elinor had expected.  She was prepared to be wet through,
 fatigued, and frightened; but the event was still more unfortunate, for
--**--**--
 Colonel Brandon again repeated his sorrow at being the cause of
 disappointing the party; but at the same time declared it to be
 unavoidable.
 
 "Well, then, when will you come back again?"
 
 "I hope we shall see you at Barton," added her ladyship, "as soon as
 you can conveniently leave town; and we must put off the party to
 Whitwell till you return."
 
 "You are very obliging.  But it is so uncertain, when I may have it in
 my power to return, that I dare not engage for it at all."
 
 "Oh! he must and shall come back," cried Sir John.  "If he is not here
 by the end of the week, I shall go after him."
 
 "Ay, so do, Sir John," cried Mrs. Jennings, "and then perhaps you may
 find out what his business is."
 
 "I do not want to pry into other men's concerns.  I suppose it is
 something he is ashamed of."
 
 Colonel Brandon's horses were announced.
 
 "You do not go to town on horseback, do you?" added Sir John.
 
 "No. Only to Honiton.  I shall then go post."
 
 "Well, as you are resolved to go, I wish you a good journey.  But you
 had better change your mind."
 
 "I assure you it is not in my power."
 
 He then took leave of the whole party.
 
 "Is there no chance of my seeing you and your sisters in town this
 winter, Miss Dashwood?"
 
 "I am afraid, none at all."
 
 "Then I must bid you farewell for a longer time than I should wish to
 do."
 
 To Marianne, he merely bowed and said nothing.
 
 "Come Colonel," said Mrs. Jennings, "before you go, do let us know what
 you are going about."
 
 He wished her a good morning, and, attended by Sir John, left the room.
 
 The complaints and lamentations which politeness had hitherto
--**--**--
 Marianne coloured, and replied very hastily, "Where, pray?"--
 
 "Did not you know," said Willoughby, "that we had been out in my
 curricle?"
 
 "Yes, yes, Mr. Impudence, I know that very well, and I was determined
 to find out WHERE you had been to.-- I hope you like your house, Miss
 Marianne.  It is a very large one, I know; and when I come to see you,
 I hope you will have new-furnished it, for it wanted it very much when
 I was there six years ago."
 
 Marianne turned away in great confusion.  Mrs. Jennings laughed
 heartily; and Elinor found that in her resolution to know where they
 had been, she had actually made her own woman enquire of Mr.
 Willoughby's groom; and that she had by that method been informed that
 they had gone to Allenham, and spent a considerable time there in
 walking about the garden and going all over the house.
 
 Elinor could hardly believe this to be true, as it seemed very unlikely
 that Willoughby should propose, or Marianne consent, to enter the house
 while Mrs. Smith was in it, with whom Marianne had not the smallest
 acquaintance.
 
 As soon as they left the dining-room, Elinor enquired of her about it;
 and great was her surprise when she found that every circumstance
 related by Mrs. Jennings was perfectly true.  Marianne was quite angry
 with her for doubting it.
 
 "Why should you imagine, Elinor, that we did not go there, or that we
 did not see the house?  Is not it what you have often wished to do
 yourself?"
 
 "Yes, Marianne, but I would not go while Mrs. Smith was there, and with
 no other companion than Mr. Willoughby."
 
 "Mr. Willoughby however is the only person who can have a right to shew
 that house; and as he went in an open carriage, it was impossible to
--**--**--
 the subject, which they must know to be peculiarly interesting to them
 all.  As this silence continued, every day made it appear more strange
 and more incompatible with the disposition of both.  Why they should
 not openly acknowledge to her mother and herself, what their constant
 behaviour to each other declared to have taken place, Elinor could not
 imagine.
 
 She could easily conceive that marriage might not be immediately in
 their power; for though Willoughby was independent, there was no reason
 to believe him rich.  His estate had been rated by Sir John at about
 six or seven hundred a year; but he lived at an expense to which that
 income could hardly be equal, and he had himself often complained of
 his poverty.  But for this strange kind of secrecy maintained by them
 relative to their engagement, which in fact concealed nothing at all,
 she could not account; and it was so wholly contradictory to their
 general opinions and practice, that a doubt sometimes entered her mind
 of their being really engaged, and this doubt was enough to prevent her
 making any inquiry of Marianne.
 
 Nothing could be more expressive of attachment to them all, than
 Willoughby's behaviour.  To Marianne it had all the distinguishing
 tenderness which a lover's heart could give, and to the rest of the
 family it was the affectionate attention of a son and a brother.  The
 cottage seemed to be considered and loved by him as his home; many more
 of his hours were spent there than at Allenham; and if no general
 engagement collected them at the park, the exercise which called him
 out in the morning was almost certain of ending there, where the rest
 of the day was spent by himself at the side of Marianne, and by his
 favourite pointer at her feet.
--**--**--
 CHAPTER 15
 
 
 Mrs. Dashwood's visit to Lady Middleton took place the next day, and
 two of her daughters went with her; but Marianne excused herself from
 being of the party, under some trifling pretext of employment; and her
 mother, who concluded that a promise had been made by Willoughby the
 night before of calling on her while they were absent, was perfectly
 satisfied with her remaining at home.
 
 On their return from the park they found Willoughby's curricle and
 servant in waiting at the cottage, and Mrs. Dashwood was convinced that
 her conjecture had been just.  So far it was all as she had foreseen;
 but on entering the house she beheld what no foresight had taught her
 to expect.  They were no sooner in the passage than Marianne came
 hastily out of the parlour apparently in violent affliction, with her
 handkerchief at her eyes; and without noticing them ran up stairs.
 Surprised and alarmed they proceeded directly into the room she had
 just quitted, where they found only Willoughby, who was leaning against
 the mantel-piece with his back towards them.  He turned round on their
 coming in, and his countenance shewed that he strongly partook of the
 emotion which over-powered Marianne.
 
 "Is anything the matter with her?" cried Mrs. Dashwood as she
 entered--"is she ill?"
 
 "I hope not," he replied, trying to look cheerful; and with a forced
 smile presently added, "It is I who may rather expect to be ill--for I
 am now suffering under a very heavy disappointment!"
 
 "Disappointment?"
 
 "Yes, for I am unable to keep my engagement with you.  Mrs. Smith has
 this morning exercised the privilege of riches upon a poor dependent
 cousin, by sending me on business to London.  I have just received my
 dispatches, and taken my farewell of Allenham; and by way of
--**--**--
 Elinor's uneasiness was at least equal to her mother's.  She thought of
 what had just passed with anxiety and distrust.  Willoughby's behaviour
 in taking leave of them, his embarrassment, and affectation of
 cheerfulness, and, above all, his unwillingness to accept her mother's
 invitation, a backwardness so unlike a lover, so unlike himself,
 greatly disturbed her.  One moment she feared that no serious design
 had ever been formed on his side; and the next that some unfortunate
 quarrel had taken place between him and her sister;--the distress in
 which Marianne had quitted the room was such as a serious quarrel could
 most reasonably account for, though when she considered what Marianne's
 love for him was, a quarrel seemed almost impossible.
 
 But whatever might be the particulars of their separation, her sister's
 affliction was indubitable; and she thought with the tenderest
 compassion of that violent sorrow which Marianne was in all probability
 not merely giving way to as a relief, but feeding and encouraging as a
 duty.
 
 In about half an hour her mother returned, and though her eyes were
 red, her countenance was not uncheerful.
 
 "Our dear Willoughby is now some miles from Barton, Elinor," said she,
 as she sat down to work, "and with how heavy a heart does he travel?"
 
 "It is all very strange.  So suddenly to be gone! It seems but the work
 of a moment.  And last night he was with us so happy, so cheerful, so
 affectionate?  And now, after only ten minutes notice--Gone too without
 intending to return!--Something more than what he owned to us must have
 happened.  He did not speak, he did not behave like himself.  YOU must
 have seen the difference as well as I.  What can it be?  Can they have
 quarrelled?  Why else should he have shewn such unwillingness to accept
--**--**--
 
 "Concealing it from us! my dear child, do you accuse Willoughby and
 Marianne of concealment? This is strange indeed, when your eyes have
 been reproaching them every day for incautiousness."
 
 "I want no proof of their affection," said Elinor; "but of their
 engagement I do."
 
 "I am perfectly satisfied of both."
 
 "Yet not a syllable has been said to you on the subject, by either of
 them."
 
 "I have not wanted syllables where actions have spoken so plainly.  Has
 not his behaviour to Marianne and to all of us, for at least the last
 fortnight, declared that he loved and considered her as his future
 wife, and that he felt for us the attachment of the nearest relation?
 Have we not perfectly understood each other?  Has not my consent been
 daily asked by his looks, his manner, his attentive and affectionate
 respect?  My Elinor, is it possible to doubt their engagement?  How
 could such a thought occur to you?  How is it to be supposed that
 Willoughby, persuaded as he must be of your sister's love, should leave
 her, and leave her perhaps for months, without telling her of his
 affection;--that they should part without a mutual exchange of
 confidence?"
 
 "I confess," replied Elinor, "that every circumstance except ONE is in
 favour of their engagement; but that ONE is the total silence of both
 on the subject, and with me it almost outweighs every other."
 
 "How strange this is!  You must think wretchedly indeed of Willoughby,
 if, after all that has openly passed between them, you can doubt the
 nature of the terms on which they are together.  Has he been acting a
 part in his behaviour to your sister all this time?  Do you suppose him
 really indifferent to her?"
 
 "No, I cannot think that.  He must and does love her I am sure."
--**--**--
 indulgent a mother, the question could not give offence.  It would be
 the natural result of your affection for her.  She used to be all
 unreserve, and to you more especially."
 
 "I would not ask such a question for the world.  Supposing it possible
 that they are not engaged, what distress would not such an enquiry
 inflict!  At any rate it would be most ungenerous.  I should never
 deserve her confidence again, after forcing from her a confession of
 what is meant at present to be unacknowledged to any one.  I know
 Marianne's heart: I know that she dearly loves me, and that I shall not
 be the last to whom the affair is made known, when circumstances make
 the revealment of it eligible.  I would not attempt to force the
 confidence of any one; of a child much less; because a sense of duty
 would prevent the denial which her wishes might direct."
 
 Elinor thought this generosity overstrained, considering her sister's
 youth, and urged the matter farther, but in vain; common sense, common
 care, common prudence, were all sunk in Mrs. Dashwood's romantic
 delicacy.
 
 It was several days before Willoughby's name was mentioned before
 Marianne by any of her family; Sir John and Mrs. Jennings, indeed, were
 not so nice; their witticisms added pain to many a painful hour;--but
 one evening, Mrs. Dashwood, accidentally taking up a volume of
 Shakespeare, exclaimed,
 
 "We have never finished Hamlet, Marianne; our dear Willoughby went away
 before we could get through it.  We will put it by, that when he comes
 again...But it may be months, perhaps, before THAT happens."
 
 "Months!" cried Marianne, with strong surprise.  "No--nor many weeks."
 
 Mrs. Dashwood was sorry for what she had said; but it gave Elinor
 pleasure, as it produced a reply from Marianne so expressive of
--**--**--
 them, as the world goes now, we shall both agree that every kind of
 external comfort must be wanting.  Your ideas are only more noble than
 mine.  Come, what is your competence?"
 
 "About eighteen hundred or two thousand a year; not more than THAT."
 
 Elinor laughed.  "TWO thousand a year! ONE is my wealth! I guessed how
 it would end."
 
 "And yet two thousand a-year is a very moderate income," said Marianne.
 "A family cannot well be maintained on a smaller.  I am sure I am not
 extravagant in my demands.  A proper establishment of servants, a
 carriage, perhaps two, and hunters, cannot be supported on less."
 
 Elinor smiled again, to hear her sister describing so accurately their
 future expenses at Combe Magna.
 
 "Hunters!" repeated Edward--"but why must you have hunters?  Every body
 does not hunt."
 
 Marianne coloured as she replied, "But most people do."
 
 "I wish," said Margaret, striking out a novel thought, "that somebody
 would give us all a large fortune apiece!"
 
 "Oh that they would!" cried Marianne, her eyes sparkling with
 animation, and her cheeks glowing with the delight of such imaginary
 happiness.
 
 "We are all unanimous in that wish, I suppose," said Elinor, "in spite
 of the insufficiency of wealth."
 
 "Oh dear!" cried Margaret, "how happy I should be!  I wonder what I
 should do with it!"
 
 Marianne looked as if she had no doubt on that point.
 
 "I should be puzzled to spend so large a fortune myself," said Mrs.
 Dashwood, "if my children were all to be rich without my help."
 
 "You must begin your improvements on this house," observed Elinor, "and
 your difficulties will soon vanish."
 
 "What magnificent orders would travel from this family to London," said
 Edward, "in such an event!  What a happy day for booksellers,
 music-sellers, and print-shops!  You, Miss Dashwood, would give a
--**--**--
 "My judgment," he returned, "is all on your side of the question; but I
 am afraid my practice is much more on your sister's.  I never wish to
 offend, but I am so foolishly shy, that I often seem negligent, when I
 am only kept back by my natural awkwardness.  I have frequently thought
 that I must have been intended by nature to be fond of low company, I
 am so little at my ease among strangers of gentility!"
 
 "Marianne has not shyness to excuse any inattention of hers," said
 Elinor.
 
 "She knows her own worth too well for false shame," replied Edward.
 "Shyness is only the effect of a sense of inferiority in some way or
 other.  If I could persuade myself that my manners were perfectly easy
 and graceful, I should not be shy."
 
 "But you would still be reserved," said Marianne, "and that is worse."
 
 Edward started--"Reserved! Am I reserved, Marianne?"
 
 "Yes, very."
 
 "I do not understand you," replied he, colouring.  "Reserved!--how, in
 what manner?  What am I to tell you?  What can you suppose?"
 
 Elinor looked surprised at his emotion; but trying to laugh off the
 subject, she said to him, "Do not you know my sister well enough to
 understand what she means?  Do not you know she calls every one
 reserved who does not talk as fast, and admire what she admires as
 rapturously as herself?"
 
 Edward made no answer.  His gravity and thoughtfulness returned on him
 in their fullest extent--and he sat for some time silent and dull.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER 18
 
 
 Elinor saw, with great uneasiness the low spirits of her friend.  His
 visit afforded her but a very partial satisfaction, while his own
 enjoyment in it appeared so imperfect.  It was evident that he was
 unhappy; she wished it were equally evident that he still distinguished
--**--**--
 Dashwood to stay longer; but, as if he were bent only on
 self-mortification, he seemed resolved to be gone when his enjoyment
 among his friends was at the height.  His spirits, during the last two
 or three days, though still very unequal, were greatly improved--he
 grew more and more partial to the house and environs--never spoke of
 going away without a sigh--declared his time to be wholly
 disengaged--even doubted to what place he should go when he left
 them--but still, go he must.  Never had any week passed so quickly--he
 could hardly believe it to be gone.  He said so repeatedly; other
 things he said too, which marked the turn of his feelings and gave the
 lie to his actions.  He had no pleasure at Norland; he detested being
 in town; but either to Norland or London, he must go.  He valued their
 kindness beyond any thing, and his greatest happiness was in being with
 them.  Yet, he must leave them at the end of a week, in spite of their
 wishes and his own, and without any restraint on his time.
 
 Elinor placed all that was astonishing in this way of acting to his
 mother's account; and it was happy for her that he had a mother whose
 character was so imperfectly known to her, as to be the general excuse
 for every thing strange on the part of her son.  Disappointed, however,
 and vexed as she was, and sometimes displeased with his uncertain
 behaviour to herself, she was very well disposed on the whole to regard
 his actions with all the candid allowances and generous qualifications,
 which had been rather more painfully extorted from her, for
 Willoughby's service, by her mother.  His want of spirits, of openness,
 and of consistency, were most usually attributed to his want of
--**--**--
 
 "The consequence of which, I suppose, will be," said Mrs. Dashwood,
 "since leisure has not promoted your own happiness, that your sons will
 be brought up to as many pursuits, employments, professions, and trades
 as Columella's."
 
 "They will be brought up," said he, in a serious accent, "to be as
 unlike myself as is possible.  In feeling, in action, in condition, in
 every thing."
 
 "Come, come; this is all an effusion of immediate want of spirits,
 Edward.  You are in a melancholy humour, and fancy that any one unlike
 yourself must be happy.  But remember that the pain of parting from
 friends will be felt by every body at times, whatever be their
 education or state.  Know your own happiness.  You want nothing but
 patience--or give it a more fascinating name, call it hope.  Your
 mother will secure to you, in time, that independence you are so
 anxious for; it is her duty, and it will, it must ere long become her
 happiness to prevent your whole youth from being wasted in discontent.
 How much may not a few months do?"
 
 "I think," replied Edward, "that I may defy many months to produce any
 good to me."
 
 This desponding turn of mind, though it could not be communicated to
 Mrs. Dashwood, gave additional pain to them all in the parting, which
 shortly took place, and left an uncomfortable impression on Elinor's
 feelings especially, which required some trouble and time to subdue.
 But as it was her determination to subdue it, and to prevent herself
 from appearing to suffer more than what all her family suffered on his
 going away, she did not adopt the method so judiciously employed by
 Marianne, on a similar occasion, to augment and fix her sorrow, by
 seeking silence, solitude and idleness.  Their means were as different
--**--**--
 "They mean no less to be civil and kind to us now," said Elinor, "by
 these frequent invitations, than by those which we received from them a
 few weeks ago.  The alteration is not in them, if their parties are
 grown tedious and dull.  We must look for the change elsewhere."
 
 
 
 CHAPTER 20
 
 
 As the Miss Dashwoods entered the drawing-room of the park the next
 day, at one door, Mrs. Palmer came running in at the other, looking as
 good humoured and merry as before.  She took them all most
 affectionately by the hand, and expressed great delight in seeing them
 again.
 
 "I am so glad to see you!" said she, seating herself between Elinor and
 Marianne, "for it is so bad a day I was afraid you might not come,
 which would be a shocking thing, as we go away again tomorrow. We must
 go, for the Westons come to us next week you know.  It was quite a
 sudden thing our coming at all, and I knew nothing of it till the
 carriage was coming to the door, and then Mr. Palmer asked me if I
 would go with him to Barton.  He is so droll! He never tells me any
 thing! I am so sorry we cannot stay longer; however we shall meet again
 in town very soon, I hope."
 
 They were obliged to put an end to such an expectation.
 
 "Not go to town!" cried Mrs. Palmer, with a laugh, "I shall be quite
 disappointed if you do not.  I could get the nicest house in world for
 you, next door to ours, in Hanover-square.  You must come, indeed.  I
 am sure I shall be very happy to chaperon you at any time till I am
 confined, if Mrs. Dashwood should not like to go into public."
--**--**--
 
 "There now; you see how droll he is.  This is always the way with him!
 Sometimes he won't speak to me for half a day together, and then he
 comes out with something so droll--all about any thing in the world."
 
 She surprised Elinor very much as they returned into the drawing-room,
 by asking her whether she did not like Mr. Palmer excessively.
 
 "Certainly," said Elinor; "he seems very agreeable."
 
 "Well--I am so glad you do.  I thought you would, he is so pleasant;
 and Mr. Palmer is excessively pleased with you and your sisters I can
 tell you, and you can't think how disappointed he will be if you don't
 come to Cleveland.--I can't imagine why you should object to it."
 
 Elinor was again obliged to decline her invitation; and by changing the
 subject, put a stop to her entreaties.  She thought it probable that as
 they lived in the same county, Mrs. Palmer might be able to give some
 more particular account of Willoughby's general character, than could
 be gathered from the Middletons' partial acquaintance with him; and she
 was eager to gain from any one, such a confirmation of his merits as
 might remove the possibility of fear from Marianne.  She began by
 inquiring if they saw much of Mr. Willoughby at Cleveland, and whether
 they were intimately acquainted with him.
 
 "Oh dear, yes; I know him extremely well," replied Mrs. Palmer;--"Not
 that I ever spoke to him, indeed; but I have seen him for ever in town.
 Somehow or other I never happened to be staying at Barton while he was
 at Allenham.  Mama saw him here once before;--but I was with my uncle
 at Weymouth.  However, I dare say we should have seen a great deal of
 him in Somersetshire, if it had not happened very unluckily that we
--**--**--
 "John is in such spirits today!" said she, on his taking Miss Steeles's
 pocket handkerchief, and throwing it out of window--"He is full of
 monkey tricks."
 
 And soon afterwards, on the second boy's violently pinching one of the
 same lady's fingers, she fondly observed, "How playful William is!"
 
 "And here is my sweet little Annamaria," she added, tenderly caressing
 a little girl of three years old, who had not made a noise for the last
 two minutes; "And she is always so gentle and quiet--Never was there
 such a quiet little thing!"
 
 But unfortunately in bestowing these embraces, a pin in her ladyship's
 head dress slightly scratching the child's neck, produced from this
 pattern of gentleness such violent screams, as could hardly be outdone
 by any creature professedly noisy.  The mother's consternation was
 excessive; but it could not surpass the alarm of the Miss Steeles, and
 every thing was done by all three, in so critical an emergency, which
 affection could suggest as likely to assuage the agonies of the little
 sufferer.  She was seated in her mother's lap, covered with kisses, her
 wound bathed with lavender-water, by one of the Miss Steeles, who was
 on her knees to attend her, and her mouth stuffed with sugar plums by
 the other.  With such a reward for her tears, the child was too wise to
 cease crying.  She still screamed and sobbed lustily, kicked her two
 brothers for offering to touch her, and all their united soothings were
 ineffectual till Lady Middleton luckily remembering that in a scene of
 similar distress last week, some apricot marmalade had been
 successfully applied for a bruised temple, the same remedy was eagerly
 proposed for this unfortunate scratch, and a slight intermission of
 screams in the young lady on hearing it, gave them reason to hope that
--**--**--
 
 The Miss Steeles, as she expected, had now all the benefit of these
 jokes, and in the eldest of them they raised a curiosity to know the
 name of the gentleman alluded to, which, though often impertinently
 expressed, was perfectly of a piece with her general inquisitiveness
 into the concerns of their family.  But Sir John did not sport long
 with the curiosity which he delighted to raise, for he had at least as
 much pleasure in telling the name, as Miss Steele had in hearing it.
 
 "His name is Ferrars," said he, in a very audible whisper; "but pray do
 not tell it, for it's a great secret."
 
 "Ferrars!" repeated Miss Steele; "Mr. Ferrars is the happy man, is he?
 What! your sister-in-law's brother, Miss Dashwood? a very agreeable
 young man to be sure; I know him very well."
 
 "How can you say so, Anne?" cried Lucy, who generally made an amendment
 to all her sister's assertions.  "Though we have seen him once or twice
 at my uncle's, it is rather too much to pretend to know him very well."
 
 Elinor heard all this with attention and surprise.  "And who was this
 uncle?  Where did he live?  How came they acquainted?"  She wished very
 much to have the subject continued, though she did not chuse to join in
 it herself; but nothing more of it was said, and for the first time in
 her life, she thought Mrs. Jennings deficient either in curiosity after
 petty information, or in a disposition to communicate it.  The manner
 in which Miss Steele had spoken of Edward, increased her curiosity; for
 it struck her as being rather ill-natured, and suggested the suspicion
 of that lady's knowing, or fancying herself to know something to his
 disadvantage.--But her curiosity was unavailing, for no farther notice
--**--**--
 assiduities, her flatteries at the Park betrayed; and she could have no
 lasting satisfaction in the company of a person who joined insincerity
 with ignorance; whose want of instruction prevented their meeting in
 conversation on terms of equality, and whose conduct toward others made
 every shew of attention and deference towards herself perfectly
 valueless.
 
 "You will think my question an odd one, I dare say," said Lucy to her
 one day, as they were walking together from the park to the
 cottage--"but pray, are you personally acquainted with your
 sister-in-law's mother, Mrs. Ferrars?"
 
 Elinor DID think the question a very odd one, and her countenance
 expressed it, as she answered that she had never seen Mrs. Ferrars.
 
 "Indeed!" replied Lucy; "I wonder at that, for I thought you must have
 seen her at Norland sometimes.  Then, perhaps, you cannot tell me what
 sort of a woman she is?"
 
 "No," returned Elinor, cautious of giving her real opinion of Edward's
 mother, and not very desirous of satisfying what seemed impertinent
 curiosity-- "I know nothing of her."
 
 "I am sure you think me very strange, for enquiring about her in such a
 way," said Lucy, eyeing Elinor attentively as she spoke; "but perhaps
 there may be reasons--I wish I might venture; but however I hope you
 will do me the justice of believing that I do not mean to be
 impertinent."
 
 Elinor made her a civil reply, and they walked on for a few minutes in
 silence.  It was broken by Lucy, who renewed the subject again by
 saying, with some hesitation,
 
 "I cannot bear to have you think me impertinently curious.  I am sure I
 would rather do any thing in the world than be thought so by a person
 whose good opinion is so well worth having as yours.  And I am sure I
--**--**--
 
 "He was four years with my uncle, who lives at Longstaple, near
 Plymouth.  It was there our acquaintance begun, for my sister and me
 was often staying with my uncle, and it was there our engagement was
 formed, though not till a year after he had quitted as a pupil; but he
 was almost always with us afterwards.  I was very unwilling to enter
 into it, as you may imagine, without the knowledge and approbation of
 his mother; but I was too young, and loved him too well, to be so
 prudent as I ought to have been.-- Though you do not know him so well
 as me, Miss Dashwood, you must have seen enough of him to be sensible
 he is very capable of making a woman sincerely attached to him."
 
 "Certainly," answered Elinor, without knowing what she said; but after
 a moment's reflection, she added, with revived security of Edward's
 honour and love, and her companion's falsehood--"Engaged to Mr. Edward
 Ferrars!--I confess myself so totally surprised at what you tell me,
 that really--I beg your pardon; but surely there must be some mistake
 of person or name.  We cannot mean the same Mr. Ferrars."
 
 "We can mean no other," cried Lucy, smiling.  "Mr. Edward Ferrars, the
 eldest son of Mrs. Ferrars, of Park Street, and brother of your
 sister-in-law, Mrs. John Dashwood, is the person I mean; you must allow
 that I am not likely to be deceived as to the name of the man on who
 all my happiness depends."
 
 "It is strange," replied Elinor, in a most painful perplexity, "that I
 should never have heard him even mention your name."
 
 "No; considering our situation, it was not strange.  Our first care has
 been to keep the matter secret.-- You knew nothing of me, or my family,
--**--**--
 Miss Steeles as to Norland and their family connections, which had
 often surprised her, the picture, the letter, the ring, formed
 altogether such a body of evidence, as overcame every fear of
 condemning him unfairly, and established as a fact, which no partiality
 could set aside, his ill-treatment of herself.--Her resentment of such
 behaviour, her indignation at having been its dupe, for a short time
 made her feel only for herself; but other ideas, other considerations,
 soon arose.  Had Edward been intentionally deceiving her?  Had he
 feigned a regard for her which he did not feel?  Was his engagement to
 Lucy an engagement of the heart?  No; whatever it might once have been,
 she could not believe it such at present.  His affection was all her
 own.  She could not be deceived in that.  Her mother, sisters, Fanny,
 all had been conscious of his regard for her at Norland; it was not an
 illusion of her own vanity.  He certainly loved her.  What a softener
 of the heart was this persuasion!  How much could it not tempt her to
 forgive!  He had been blamable, highly blamable, in remaining at
 Norland after he first felt her influence over him to be more than it
 ought to be.  In that, he could not be defended; but if he had injured
 her, how much more had he injured himself; if her case were pitiable,
 his was hopeless.  His imprudence had made her miserable for a while;
 but it seemed to have deprived himself of all chance of ever being
 otherwise.  She might in time regain tranquillity; but HE, what had he
 to look forward to?  Could he ever be tolerably happy with Lucy Steele;
 could he, were his affection for herself out of the question, with his
 integrity, his delicacy, and well-informed mind, be satisfied with a
--**--**--
 Lucy really felt for Edward, whether there were any sincerity in her
 declaration of tender regard for him, and she particularly wanted to
 convince Lucy, by her readiness to enter on the matter again, and her
 calmness in conversing on it, that she was no otherwise interested in
 it than as a friend, which she very much feared her involuntary
 agitation, in their morning discourse, must have left at least
 doubtful.  That Lucy was disposed to be jealous of her appeared very
 probable: it was plain that Edward had always spoken highly in her
 praise, not merely from Lucy's assertion, but from her venturing to
 trust her on so short a personal acquaintance, with a secret so
 confessedly and evidently important.  And even Sir John's joking
 intelligence must have had some weight.  But indeed, while Elinor
 remained so well assured within herself of being really beloved by
 Edward, it required no other consideration of probabilities to make it
 natural that Lucy should be jealous; and that she was so, her very
 confidence was a proof.  What other reason for the disclosure of the
 affair could there be, but that Elinor might be informed by it of
 Lucy's superior claims on Edward, and be taught to avoid him in future?
 She had little difficulty in understanding thus much of her rival's
 intentions, and while she was firmly resolved to act by her as every
 principle of honour and honesty directed, to combat her own affection
 for Edward and to see him as little as possible; she could not deny
 herself the comfort of endeavouring to convince Lucy that her heart was
 unwounded.  And as she could now have nothing more painful to hear on
 the subject than had already been told, she did not mistrust her own
 ability of going through a repetition of particulars with composure.
--**--**--
 "But what," said she after a short silence, "are your views? or have
 you none but that of waiting for Mrs. Ferrars's death, which is a
 melancholy and shocking extremity?--Is her son determined to submit to
 this, and to all the tediousness of the many years of suspense in which
 it may involve you, rather than run the risk of her displeasure for a
 while by owning the truth?"
 
 "If we could be certain that it would be only for a while!  But Mrs.
 Ferrars is a very headstrong proud woman, and in her first fit of anger
 upon hearing it, would very likely secure every thing to Robert, and
 the idea of that, for Edward's sake, frightens away all my inclination
 for hasty measures."
 
 "And for your own sake too, or you are carrying your disinterestedness
 beyond reason."
 
 Lucy looked at Elinor again, and was silent.
 
 "Do you know Mr. Robert Ferrars?" asked Elinor.
 
 "Not at all--I never saw him; but I fancy he is very unlike his
 brother--silly and a great coxcomb."
 
 "A great coxcomb!" repeated Miss Steele, whose ear had caught those
 words by a sudden pause in Marianne's music.-- "Oh, they are talking of
 their favourite beaux, I dare say."
 
 "No sister," cried Lucy, "you are mistaken there, our favourite beaux
 are NOT great coxcombs."
 
 "I can answer for it that Miss Dashwood's is not," said Mrs. Jennings,
 laughing heartily; "for he is one of the modestest, prettiest behaved
 young men I ever saw; but as for Lucy, she is such a sly little
 creature, there is no finding out who SHE likes."
 
 "Oh," cried Miss Steele, looking significantly round at them, "I dare
 say Lucy's beau is quite as modest and pretty behaved as Miss
 Dashwood's."
 
 Elinor blushed in spite of herself.  Lucy bit her lip, and looked
--**--**--
 latter to cautiousness of conduct in an affair respecting which she had
 never been able to inspire her with distrust; and she dared not explain
 the motive of her own disinclination for going to London.  That
 Marianne, fastidious as she was, thoroughly acquainted with Mrs.
 Jennings' manners, and invariably disgusted by them, should overlook
 every inconvenience of that kind, should disregard whatever must be
 most wounding to her irritable feelings, in her pursuit of one object,
 was such a proof, so strong, so full, of the importance of that object
 to her, as Elinor, in spite of all that had passed, was not prepared to
 witness.
 
 On being informed of the invitation, Mrs. Dashwood, persuaded that such
 an excursion would be productive of much amusement to both her
 daughters, and perceiving through all her affectionate attention to
 herself, how much the heart of Marianne was in it, would not hear of
 their declining the offer upon HER account; insisted on their both
 accepting it directly; and then began to foresee, with her usual
 cheerfulness, a variety of advantages that would accrue to them all,
 from this separation.
 
 "I am delighted with the plan," she cried, "it is exactly what I could
 wish.  Margaret and I shall be as much benefited by it as yourselves.
 When you and the Middletons are gone, we shall go on so quietly and
 happily together with our books and our music! You will find Margaret
 so improved when you come back again!  I have a little plan of
 alteration for your bedrooms too, which may now be performed without
 any inconvenience to any one.  It is very right that you SHOULD go to
 town; I would have every young woman of your condition in life
 acquainted with the manners and amusements of London.  You will be
--**--**--
 
 
 
 CHAPTER 26
 
 
 Elinor could not find herself in the carriage with Mrs. Jennings, and
 beginning a journey to London under her protection, and as her guest,
 without wondering at her own situation, so short had their acquaintance
 with that lady been, so wholly unsuited were they in age and
 disposition, and so many had been her objections against such a measure
 only a few days before! But these objections had all, with that happy
 ardour of youth which Marianne and her mother equally shared, been
 overcome or overlooked; and Elinor, in spite of every occasional doubt
 of Willoughby's constancy, could not witness the rapture of delightful
 expectation which filled the whole soul and beamed in the eyes of
 Marianne, without feeling how blank was her own prospect, how cheerless
 her own state of mind in the comparison, and how gladly she would
 engage in the solicitude of Marianne's situation to have the same
 animating object in view, the same possibility of hope.  A short, a
 very short time however must now decide what Willoughby's intentions
 were; in all probability he was already in town.  Marianne's eagerness
 to be gone declared her dependence on finding him there; and Elinor was
 resolved not only upon gaining every new light as to his character
 which her own observation or the intelligence of others could give her,
 but likewise upon watching his behaviour to her sister with such
 zealous attention, as to ascertain what he was and what he meant,
 before many meetings had taken place.  Should the result of her
 observations be unfavourable, she was determined at all events to open
 the eyes of her sister; should it be otherwise, her exertions would be
 of a different nature--she must then learn to avoid every selfish
 comparison, and banish every regret which might lessen her satisfaction
--**--**--
 the same.  "I am writing home, Marianne," said Elinor; "had not you
 better defer your letter for a day or two?"
 
 "I am NOT going to write to my mother," replied Marianne, hastily, and
 as if wishing to avoid any farther inquiry.  Elinor said no more; it
 immediately struck her that she must then be writing to Willoughby; and
 the conclusion which as instantly followed was, that, however
 mysteriously they might wish to conduct the affair, they must be
 engaged.  This conviction, though not entirely satisfactory, gave her
 pleasure, and she continued her letter with greater alacrity.
 Marianne's was finished in a very few minutes; in length it could be no
 more than a note; it was then folded up, sealed, and directed with
 eager rapidity.  Elinor thought she could distinguish a large W in the
 direction; and no sooner was it complete than Marianne, ringing the
 bell, requested the footman who answered it to get that letter conveyed
 for her to the two-penny post.  This decided the matter at once.
 
 Her spirits still continued very high; but there was a flutter in them
 which prevented their giving much pleasure to her sister, and this
 agitation increased as the evening drew on.  She could scarcely eat any
 dinner, and when they afterwards returned to the drawing room, seemed
 anxiously listening to the sound of every carriage.
 
 It was a great satisfaction to Elinor that Mrs. Jennings, by being much
 engaged in her own room, could see little of what was passing.  The tea
 things were brought in, and already had Marianne been disappointed more
 than once by a rap at a neighbouring door, when a loud one was suddenly
 heard which could not be mistaken for one at any other house, Elinor
 felt secure of its announcing Willoughby's approach, and Marianne,
--**--**--
 to her than to Elinor, for it was spent in all the anxiety of
 expectation and the pain of disappointment.  She sometimes endeavoured
 for a few minutes to read; but the book was soon thrown aside, and she
 returned to the more interesting employment of walking backwards and
 forwards across the room, pausing for a moment whenever she came to the
 window, in hopes of distinguishing the long-expected rap.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER 27
 
 
 "If this open weather holds much longer," said Mrs. Jennings, when they
 met at breakfast the following morning, "Sir John will not like leaving
 Barton next week; 'tis a sad thing for sportsmen to lose a day's
 pleasure.  Poor souls!  I always pity them when they do; they seem to
 take it so much to heart."
 
 "That is true," cried Marianne, in a cheerful voice, and walking to the
 window as she spoke, to examine the day.  "I had not thought of that.
 This weather will keep many sportsmen in the country."
 
 It was a lucky recollection, all her good spirits were restored by it.
 "It is charming weather for THEM indeed," she continued, as she sat
 down to the breakfast table with a happy countenance.  "How much they
 must enjoy it! But" (with a little return of anxiety) "it cannot be
 expected to last long.  At this time of the year, and after such a
 series of rain, we shall certainly have very little more of it.  Frosts
 will soon set in, and in all probability with severity.  In another day
 or two perhaps; this extreme mildness can hardly last longer--nay,
 perhaps it may freeze tonight!"
 
 "At any rate," said Elinor, wishing to prevent Mrs. Jennings from
 seeing her sister's thoughts as clearly as she did, "I dare say we
 shall have Sir John and Lady Middleton in town by the end of next week."
--**--**--
 frost.
 
 The Miss Dashwoods had no greater reason to be dissatisfied with Mrs.
 Jennings's style of living, and set of acquaintance, than with her
 behaviour to themselves, which was invariably kind.  Every thing in her
 household arrangements was conducted on the most liberal plan, and
 excepting a few old city friends, whom, to Lady Middleton's regret, she
 had never dropped, she visited no one to whom an introduction could at
 all discompose the feelings of her young companions.  Pleased to find
 herself more comfortably situated in that particular than she had
 expected, Elinor was very willing to compound for the want of much real
 enjoyment from any of their evening parties, which, whether at home or
 abroad, formed only for cards, could have little to amuse her.
 
 Colonel Brandon, who had a general invitation to the house, was with
 them almost every day; he came to look at Marianne and talk to Elinor,
 who often derived more satisfaction from conversing with him than from
 any other daily occurrence, but who saw at the same time with much
 concern his continued regard for her sister.  She feared it was a
 strengthening regard.  It grieved her to see the earnestness with which
 he often watched Marianne, and his spirits were certainly worse than
 when at Barton.
 
 About a week after their arrival, it became certain that Willoughby was
 also arrived.  His card was on the table when they came in from the
 morning's drive.
 
 "Good God!" cried Marianne, "he has been here while we were out."
 Elinor, rejoiced to be assured of his being in London, now ventured to
 say, "Depend upon it, he will call again tomorrow."  But Marianne
 seemed hardly to hear her, and on Mrs. Jennings's entrance, escaped with
 the precious card.
 
 This event, while it raised the spirits of Elinor, restored to those of
--**--**--
 
 "Aye, aye," said Mrs. Jennings, "we know the reason of all that very
 well; if a certain person who shall be nameless, had been there, you
 would not have been a bit tired: and to say the truth it was not very
 pretty of him not to give you the meeting when he was invited."
 
 "Invited!" cried Marianne.
 
 "So my daughter Middleton told me, for it seems Sir John met him
 somewhere in the street this morning." Marianne said no more, but
 looked exceedingly hurt.  Impatient in this situation to be doing
 something that might lead to her sister's relief, Elinor resolved to
 write the next morning to her mother, and hoped by awakening her fears
 for the health of Marianne, to procure those inquiries which had been
 so long delayed; and she was still more eagerly bent on this measure by
 perceiving after breakfast on the morrow, that Marianne was again
 writing to Willoughby, for she could not suppose it to be to any other
 person.
 
 About the middle of the day, Mrs. Jennings went out by herself on
 business, and Elinor began her letter directly, while Marianne, too
 restless for employment, too anxious for conversation, walked from one
 window to the other, or sat down by the fire in melancholy meditation.
 Elinor was very earnest in her application to her mother, relating all
 that had passed, her suspicions of Willoughby's inconstancy, urging her
 by every plea of duty and affection to demand from Marianne an account
 of her real situation with respect to him.
 
 Her letter was scarcely finished, when a rap foretold a visitor, and
 Colonel Brandon was announced.  Marianne, who had seen him from the
 window, and who hated company of any kind, left the room before he
 entered it.  He looked more than usually grave, and though expressing
--**--**--
 
 "Pray, pray be composed," cried Elinor, "and do not betray what you
 feel to every body present.  Perhaps he has not observed you yet."
 
 This however was more than she could believe herself; and to be
 composed at such a moment was not only beyond the reach of Marianne, it
 was beyond her wish.  She sat in an agony of impatience which affected
 every feature.
 
 At last he turned round again, and regarded them both; she started up,
 and pronouncing his name in a tone of affection, held out her hand to
 him.  He approached, and addressing himself rather to Elinor than
 Marianne, as if wishing to avoid her eye, and determined not to observe
 her attitude, inquired in a hurried manner after Mrs. Dashwood, and
 asked how long they had been in town.  Elinor was robbed of all
 presence of mind by such an address, and was unable to say a word.  But
 the feelings of her sister were instantly expressed.  Her face was
 crimsoned over, and she exclaimed, in a voice of the greatest emotion,
 "Good God! Willoughby, what is the meaning of this?  Have you not
 received my letters?  Will you not shake hands with me?"
 
 He could not then avoid it, but her touch seemed painful to him, and he
 held her hand only for a moment.  During all this time he was evidently
 struggling for composure.  Elinor watched his countenance and saw its
 expression becoming more tranquil.  After a moment's pause, he spoke
 with calmness.
 
 "I did myself the honour of calling in Berkeley Street last Tuesday,
 and very much regretted that I was not fortunate enough to find
 yourselves and Mrs. Jennings at home.  My card was not lost, I hope."
 
 "But have you not received my notes?" cried Marianne in the wildest
--**--**--
 
 "No, Elinor," she replied, "ask nothing; you will soon know all."
 
 The sort of desperate calmness with which this was said, lasted no
 longer than while she spoke, and was immediately followed by a return
 of the same excessive affliction.  It was some minutes before she could
 go on with her letter, and the frequent bursts of grief which still
 obliged her, at intervals, to withhold her pen, were proofs enough of
 her feeling how more than probable it was that she was writing for the
 last time to Willoughby.
 
 Elinor paid her every quiet and unobtrusive attention in her power; and
 she would have tried to sooth and tranquilize her still more, had not
 Marianne entreated her, with all the eagerness of the most nervous
 irritability, not to speak to her for the world.  In such
 circumstances, it was better for both that they should not be long
 together; and the restless state of Marianne's mind not only prevented
 her from remaining in the room a moment after she was dressed, but
 requiring at once solitude and continual change of place, made her
 wander about the house till breakfast time, avoiding the sight of every
 body.
 
 At breakfast she neither ate, nor attempted to eat any thing; and
 Elinor's attention was then all employed, not in urging her, not in
 pitying her, nor in appearing to regard her, but in endeavouring to
 engage Mrs. Jennings's notice entirely to herself.
 
 As this was a favourite meal with Mrs. Jennings, it lasted a
 considerable time, and they were just setting themselves, after it,
 round the common working table, when a letter was delivered to
 Marianne, which she eagerly caught from the servant, and, turning of a
 death-like paleness, instantly ran out of the room.  Elinor, who saw as
 plainly by this, as if she had seen the direction, that it must come
--**--**--
 deep in hardened villainy.
 
 She paused over it for some time with indignant astonishment; then read
 it again and again; but every perusal only served to increase her
 abhorrence of the man, and so bitter were her feelings against him,
 that she dared not trust herself to speak, lest she might wound
 Marianne still deeper by treating their disengagement, not as a loss to
 her of any possible good but as an escape from the worst and most
 irremediable of all evils, a connection, for life, with an unprincipled
 man, as a deliverance the most real, a blessing the most important.
 
 In her earnest meditations on the contents of the letter, on the
 depravity of that mind which could dictate it, and probably, on the
 very different mind of a very different person, who had no other
 connection whatever with the affair than what her heart gave him with
 every thing that passed, Elinor forgot the immediate distress of her
 sister, forgot that she had three letters on her lap yet unread, and so
 entirely forgot how long she had been in the room, that when on hearing
 a carriage drive up to the door, she went to the window to see who
 could be coming so unreasonably early, she was all astonishment to
 perceive Mrs. Jennings's chariot, which she knew had not been ordered
 till one.  Determined not to quit Marianne, though hopeless of
 contributing, at present, to her ease, she hurried away to excuse
 herself from attending Mrs. Jennings, on account of her sister being
 indisposed.  Mrs. Jennings, with a thoroughly good-humoured concern for
 its cause, admitted the excuse most readily, and Elinor, after seeing
 her safe off, returned to Marianne, whom she found attempting to rise
 from the bed, and whom she reached just in time to prevent her from
--**--**--
 instigated?"
 
 "By all the world, rather than by his own heart.  I could rather
 believe every creature of my acquaintance leagued together to ruin me
 in his opinion, than believe his nature capable of such cruelty.  This
 woman of whom he writes--whoever she be--or any one, in short, but your
 own dear self, mama, and Edward, may have been so barbarous to bely me.
 Beyond you three, is there a creature in the world whom I would not
 rather suspect of evil than Willoughby, whose heart I know so well?"
 
 Elinor would not contend, and only replied, "Whoever may have been so
 detestably your enemy, let them be cheated of their malignant triumph,
 my dear sister, by seeing how nobly the consciousness of your own
 innocence and good intentions supports your spirits.  It is a
 reasonable and laudable pride which resists such malevolence."
 
 "No, no," cried Marianne, "misery such as mine has no pride.  I care
 not who knows that I am wretched.  The triumph of seeing me so may be
 open to all the world.  Elinor, Elinor, they who suffer little may be
 proud and independent as they like--may resist insult, or return
 mortification--but I cannot.  I must feel--I must be wretched--and they
 are welcome to enjoy the consciousness of it that can."
 
 "But for my mother's sake and mine--"
 
 "I would do more than for my own.  But to appear happy when I am so
 miserable--Oh! who can require it?"
 
 Again they were both silent.  Elinor was employed in walking
 thoughtfully from the fire to the window, from the window to the fire,
 without knowing that she received warmth from one, or discerning
 objects through the other; and Marianne, seated at the foot of the bed,
 with her head leaning against one of its posts, again took up
--**--**--
 
 "It would be impossible to go to-morrow. We owe Mrs. Jennings much more
 than civility; and civility of the commonest kind must prevent such a
 hasty removal as that."
 
 "Well then, another day or two, perhaps; but I cannot stay here long, I
 cannot stay to endure the questions and remarks of all these people.
 The Middletons and Palmers--how am I to bear their pity?  The pity of
 such a woman as Lady Middleton!  Oh, what would HE say to that!"
 
 Elinor advised her to lie down again, and for a moment she did so; but
 no attitude could give her ease; and in restless pain of mind and body
 she moved from one posture to another, till growing more and more
 hysterical, her sister could with difficulty keep her on the bed at
 all, and for some time was fearful of being constrained to call for
 assistance.  Some lavender drops, however, which she was at length
 persuaded to take, were of use; and from that time till Mrs. Jennings
 returned, she continued on the bed quiet and motionless.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER 30
 
 
 Mrs. Jennings came immediately to their room on her return, and without
 waiting to have her request of admittance answered, opened the door and
 walked in with a look of real concern.
 
 "How do you do my dear?"--said she in a voice of great compassion to
 Marianne, who turned away her face without attempting to answer.
 
 "How is she, Miss Dashwood?--Poor thing! she looks very bad.-- No
 wonder.  Ay, it is but too true.  He is to be married very soon--a
 good-for-nothing fellow!  I have no patience with him.  Mrs. Taylor
 told me of it half an hour ago, and she was told it by a particular
 friend of Miss Grey herself, else I am sure I should not have believed
--**--**--
 ready to have him.  Why don't he, in such a case, sell his horses, let
 his house, turn off his servants, and make a thorough reform at once? I
 warrant you, Miss Marianne would have been ready to wait till matters
 came round.  But that won't do now-a-days; nothing in the way of
 pleasure can ever be given up by the young men of this age."
 
 "Do you know what kind of a girl Miss Grey is?  Is she said to be
 amiable?"
 
 "I never heard any harm of her; indeed I hardly ever heard her
 mentioned; except that Mrs. Taylor did say this morning, that one day
 Miss Walker hinted to her, that she believed Mr. and Mrs. Ellison would
 not be sorry to have Miss Grey married, for she and Mrs. Ellison could
 never agree."--
 
 "And who are the Ellisons?"
 
 "Her guardians, my dear.  But now she is of age and may choose for
 herself; and a pretty choice she has made!--What now," after pausing a
 moment--"your poor sister is gone to her own room, I suppose, to moan
 by herself.  Is there nothing one can get to comfort her?  Poor dear,
 it seems quite cruel to let her be alone.  Well, by-and-by we shall
 have a few friends, and that will amuse her a little.  What shall we
 play at?  She hates whist I know; but is there no round game she cares
 for?"
 
 "Dear ma'am, this kindness is quite unnecessary.  Marianne, I dare say,
 will not leave her room again this evening.  I shall persuade her if I
 can to go early to bed, for I am sure she wants rest."
 
 "Aye, I believe that will be best for her.  Let her name her own
 supper, and go to bed.  Lord! no wonder she has been looking so bad and
--**--**--
 whom I KNEW to be engaged--but how shall I tell you?  If you know it
 already, as surely you must, I may be spared."
 
 "You mean," answered Elinor, with forced calmness, "Mr. Willoughby's
 marriage with Miss Grey.  Yes, we DO know it all.  This seems to have
 been a day of general elucidation, for this very morning first unfolded
 it to us.  Mr. Willoughby is unfathomable!  Where did you hear it?"
 
 "In a stationer's shop in Pall Mall, where I had business.  Two ladies
 were waiting for their carriage, and one of them was giving the other
 an account of the intended match, in a voice so little attempting
 concealment, that it was impossible for me not to hear all.  The name
 of Willoughby, John Willoughby, frequently repeated, first caught my
 attention; and what followed was a positive assertion that every thing
 was now finally settled respecting his marriage with Miss Grey--it was
 no longer to be a secret--it would take place even within a few weeks,
 with many particulars of preparations and other matters.  One thing,
 especially, I remember, because it served to identify the man still
 more:--as soon as the ceremony was over, they were to go to Combe
 Magna, his seat in Somersetshire.  My astonishment!--but it would be
 impossible to describe what I felt.  The communicative lady I learnt,
 on inquiry, for I stayed in the shop till they were gone, was a Mrs.
 Ellison, and that, as I have been since informed, is the name of Miss
 Grey's guardian."
 
 "It is.  But have you likewise heard that Miss Grey has fifty thousand
 pounds?  In that, if in any thing, we may find an explanation."
 
 "It may be so; but Willoughby is capable--at least I think"--he stopped
 a moment; then added in a voice which seemed to distrust itself, "And
--**--**--
 regard--nothing but an earnest desire of being useful--I think I am
 justified--though where so many hours have been spent in convincing
 myself that I am right, is there not some reason to fear I may be
 wrong?" He stopped.
 
 "I understand you," said Elinor.  "You have something to tell me of Mr.
 Willoughby, that will open his character farther.  Your telling it will
 be the greatest act of friendship that can be shewn Marianne.  MY
 gratitude will be insured immediately by any information tending to
 that end, and HERS must be gained by it in time.  Pray, pray let me
 hear it."
 
 "You shall; and, to be brief, when I quitted Barton last October,--but
 this will give you no idea--I must go farther back.  You will find me a
 very awkward narrator, Miss Dashwood; I hardly know where to begin.  A
 short account of myself, I believe, will be necessary, and it SHALL be
 a short one.  On such a subject," sighing heavily, "can I have little
 temptation to be diffuse."
 
 He stopt a moment for recollection, and then, with another sigh, went
 on.
 
 "You have probably entirely forgotten a conversation--(it is not to be
 supposed that it could make any impression on you)--a conversation
 between us one evening at Barton Park--it was the evening of a
 dance--in which I alluded to a lady I had once known, as resembling, in
 some measure, your sister Marianne."
 
 "Indeed," answered Elinor, "I have NOT forgotten it." He looked pleased
 by this remembrance, and added,
 
 "If I am not deceived by the uncertainty, the partiality of tender
 recollection, there is a very strong resemblance between them, as well
 in mind as person.  The same warmth of heart, the same eagerness of
 fancy and spirits.  This lady was one of my nearest relations, an
--**--**--
 servant of my own, who had since fallen into misfortune, carried me to
 visit him in a spunging-house, where he was confined for debt; and
 there, in the same house, under a similar confinement, was my unfortunate
 sister.  So altered--so faded--worn down by acute suffering of every
 kind! hardly could I believe the melancholy and sickly figure before
 me, to be the remains of the lovely, blooming, healthful girl, on whom
 I had once doted.  What I endured in so beholding her--but I have no
 right to wound your feelings by attempting to describe it--I have
 pained you too much already.  That she was, to all appearance, in the
 last stage of a consumption, was--yes, in such a situation it was my
 greatest comfort.  Life could do nothing for her, beyond giving time
 for a better preparation for death; and that was given.  I saw her
 placed in comfortable lodgings, and under proper attendants; I visited
 her every day during the rest of her short life: I was with her in her
 last moments."
 
 Again he stopped to recover himself; and Elinor spoke her feelings in
 an exclamation of tender concern, at the fate of his unfortunate friend.
 
 "Your sister, I hope, cannot be offended," said he, "by the resemblance
 I have fancied between her and my poor disgraced relation.  Their
 fates, their fortunes, cannot be the same; and had the natural sweet
 disposition of the one been guarded by a firmer mind, or a happier
 marriage, she might have been all that you will live to see the other
 be.  But to what does all this lead?  I seem to have been distressing
 you for nothing.  Ah! Miss Dashwood--a subject such as this--untouched
 for fourteen years--it is dangerous to handle it at all!  I WILL be
 more collected--more concise.  She left to my care her only child, a
--**--**--
 soldier she presumed not to censure it.
 
 "Such," said Colonel Brandon, after a pause, "has been the unhappy
 resemblance between the fate of mother and daughter! and so imperfectly
 have I discharged my trust!"
 
 "Is she still in town?"
 
 "No; as soon as she recovered from her lying-in, for I found her near
 her delivery, I removed her and her child into the country, and there
 she remains."
 
 Recollecting, soon afterwards, that he was probably dividing Elinor
 from her sister, he put an end to his visit, receiving from her again
 the same grateful acknowledgments, and leaving her full of compassion
 and esteem for him.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER 32
 
 
 When the particulars of this conversation were repeated by Miss
 Dashwood to her sister, as they very soon were, the effect on her was
 not entirely such as the former had hoped to see.  Not that Marianne
 appeared to distrust the truth of any part of it, for she listened to
 it all with the most steady and submissive attention, made neither
 objection nor remark, attempted no vindication of Willoughby, and
 seemed to shew by her tears that she felt it to be impossible.  But
 though this behaviour assured Elinor that the conviction of this guilt
 WAS carried home to her mind, though she saw with satisfaction the
 effect of it, in her no longer avoiding Colonel Brandon when he called,
 in her speaking to him, even voluntarily speaking, with a kind of
 compassionate respect, and though she saw her spirits less violently
 irritated than before, she did not see her less wretched.  Her mind did
 become settled, but it was settled in a gloomy dejection.  She felt the
 loss of Willoughby's character yet more heavily than she had felt the
 loss of his heart; his seduction and desertion of Miss Williams, the
--**--**--
 "Not in the stage, I assure you," replied Miss Steele, with quick
 exultation; "we came post all the way, and had a very smart beau to
 attend us.  Dr. Davies was coming to town, and so we thought we'd join
 him in a post-chaise; and he behaved very genteelly, and paid ten or
 twelve shillings more than we did."
 
 "Oh, oh!" cried Mrs. Jennings; "very pretty, indeed! and the Doctor is
 a single man, I warrant you."
 
 "There now," said Miss Steele, affectedly simpering, "everybody laughs
 at me so about the Doctor, and I cannot think why.  My cousins say they
 are sure I have made a conquest; but for my part I declare I never
 think about him from one hour's end to another.  'Lord! here comes your
 beau, Nancy,' my cousin said t'other day, when she saw him crossing the
 street to the house.  My beau, indeed! said I--I cannot think who you
 mean.  The Doctor is no beau of mine."
 
 "Aye, aye, that is very pretty talking--but it won't do--the Doctor is
 the man, I see."
 
 "No, indeed!" replied her cousin, with affected earnestness, "and I beg
 you will contradict it, if you ever hear it talked of."
 
 Mrs. Jennings directly gave her the gratifying assurance that she
 certainly would NOT, and Miss Steele was made completely happy.
 
 "I suppose you will go and stay with your brother and sister, Miss
 Dashwood, when they come to town," said Lucy, returning, after a
 cessation of hostile hints, to the charge.
 
 "No, I do not think we shall."
 
 "Oh, yes, I dare say you will."
 
 Elinor would not humour her by farther opposition.
 
 "What a charming thing it is that Mrs. Dashwood can spare you both for
 so long a time together!"
 
 "Long a time, indeed!" interposed Mrs. Jennings.  "Why, their visit is
--**--**--
 Elinor did feel a little ashamed of her brother; and was not sorry to
 be spared the necessity of answering him, by the arrival of Mrs.
 Jennings's servant, who came to tell her that his mistress waited for
 them at the door.
 
 Mr. Dashwood attended them down stairs, was introduced to Mrs. Jennings
 at the door of her carriage, and repeating his hope of being able to
 call on them the next day, took leave.
 
 His visit was duly paid.  He came with a pretence at an apology from
 their sister-in-law, for not coming too; "but she was so much engaged
 with her mother, that really she had no leisure for going any where."
 Mrs. Jennings, however, assured him directly, that she should not stand
 upon ceremony, for they were all cousins, or something like it, and she
 should certainly wait on Mrs. John Dashwood very soon, and bring her
 sisters to see her.  His manners to THEM, though calm, were perfectly
 kind; to Mrs. Jennings, most attentively civil; and on Colonel
 Brandon's coming in soon after himself, he eyed him with a curiosity
 which seemed to say, that he only wanted to know him to be rich, to be
 equally civil to HIM.
 
 After staying with them half an hour, he asked Elinor to walk with him
 to Conduit Street, and introduce him to Sir John and Lady Middleton.
 The weather was remarkably fine, and she readily consented.  As soon as
 they were out of the house, his enquiries began.
 
 "Who is Colonel Brandon?  Is he a man of fortune?"
 
 "Yes; he has very good property in Dorsetshire."
 
 "I am glad of it.  He seems a most gentlemanlike man; and I think,
 Elinor, I may congratulate you on the prospect of a very respectable
 establishment in life."
 
 "Me, brother! what do you mean?"
--**--**--
 attract the man.  There was something in her style of beauty, to please
 them particularly.  I remember Fanny used to say that she would marry
 sooner and better than you did; not but what she is exceedingly fond of
 YOU, but so it happened to strike her.  She will be mistaken, however.
 I question whether Marianne NOW, will marry a man worth more than five
 or six hundred a-year, at the utmost, and I am very much deceived if
 YOU do not do better.  Dorsetshire!  I know very little of Dorsetshire;
 but, my dear Elinor, I shall be exceedingly glad to know more of it;
 and I think I can answer for your having Fanny and myself among the
 earliest and best pleased of your visitors."
 
 Elinor tried very seriously to convince him that there was no
 likelihood of her marrying Colonel Brandon; but it was an expectation
 of too much pleasure to himself to be relinquished, and he was really
 resolved on seeking an intimacy with that gentleman, and promoting the
 marriage by every possible attention.  He had just compunction enough
 for having done nothing for his sisters himself, to be exceedingly
 anxious that everybody else should do a great deal; and an offer from
 Colonel Brandon, or a legacy from Mrs. Jennings, was the easiest means
 of atoning for his own neglect.
 
 They were lucky enough to find Lady Middleton at home, and Sir John
 came in before their visit ended.  Abundance of civilities passed on
 all sides.  Sir John was ready to like anybody, and though Mr. Dashwood
 did not seem to know much about horses, he soon set him down as a very
 good-natured fellow: while Lady Middleton saw enough of fashion in his
 appearance to think his acquaintance worth having; and Mr. Dashwood
 went away delighted with both.
--**--**--
 breaking horses--but then it was all over; and one subject only engaged
 the ladies till coffee came in, which was the comparative heights of
 Harry Dashwood, and Lady Middleton's second son William, who were
 nearly of the same age.
 
 Had both the children been there, the affair might have been determined
 too easily by measuring them at once; but as Harry only was present, it
 was all conjectural assertion on both sides; and every body had a right
 to be equally positive in their opinion, and to repeat it over and over
 again as often as they liked.
 
 The parties stood thus:
 
 The two mothers, though each really convinced that her own son was the
 tallest, politely decided in favour of the other.
 
 The two grandmothers, with not less partiality, but more sincerity,
 were equally earnest in support of their own descendant.
 
 Lucy, who was hardly less anxious to please one parent than the other,
 thought the boys were both remarkably tall for their age, and could not
 conceive that there could be the smallest difference in the world
 between them; and Miss Steele, with yet greater address gave it, as
 fast as she could, in favour of each.
 
 Elinor, having once delivered her opinion on William's side, by which
 she offended Mrs. Ferrars and Fanny still more, did not see the
 necessity of enforcing it by any farther assertion; and Marianne, when
 called on for hers, offended them all, by declaring that she had no
 opinion to give, as she had never thought about it.
 
 Before her removing from Norland, Elinor had painted a very pretty pair
 of screens for her sister-in-law, which being now just mounted and
 brought home, ornamented her present drawing room; and these screens,
 catching the eye of John Dashwood on his following the other gentlemen
--**--**--
 often, for Lady Middleton's delighted with Mrs. Dashwood, so we shall
 be a good deal in Harley Street, I dare say, and Edward spends half his
 time with his sister--besides, Lady Middleton and Mrs. Ferrars will
 visit now;--and Mrs. Ferrars and your sister were both so good to say
 more than once, they should always be glad to see me.-- They are such
 charming women!--I am sure if ever you tell your sister what I think of
 her, you cannot speak too high."
 
 But Elinor would not give her any encouragement to hope that she SHOULD
 tell her sister.  Lucy continued.
 
 "I am sure I should have seen it in a moment, if Mrs. Ferrars had took
 a dislike to me.  If she had only made me a formal courtesy, for
 instance, without saying a word, and never after had took any notice of
 me, and never looked at me in a pleasant way--you know what I mean--if
 I had been treated in that forbidding sort of way, I should have gave
 it all up in despair.  I could not have stood it.  For where she DOES
 dislike, I know it is most violent."
 
 Elinor was prevented from making any reply to this civil triumph, by
 the door's being thrown open, the servant's announcing Mr. Ferrars, and
 Edward's immediately walking in.
 
 It was a very awkward moment; and the countenance of each shewed that
 it was so.  They all looked exceedingly foolish; and Edward seemed to
 have as great an inclination to walk out of the room again, as to
 advance farther into it.  The very circumstance, in its unpleasantest
 form, which they would each have been most anxious to avoid, had fallen
 on them.--They were not only all three together, but were together
 without the relief of any other person.  The ladies recovered
--**--**--
 he HAS the most delicate conscience in the world; the most scrupulous
 in performing every engagement, however minute, and however it may make
 against his interest or pleasure.  He is the most fearful of giving
 pain, of wounding expectation, and the most incapable of being selfish,
 of any body I ever saw.  Edward, it is so, and I will say it.  What!
 are you never to hear yourself praised!--Then you must be no friend of
 mine; for those who will accept of my love and esteem, must submit to
 my open commendation."
 
 The nature of her commendation, in the present case, however, happened
 to be particularly ill-suited to the feelings of two thirds of her
 auditors, and was so very unexhilarating to Edward, that he very soon
 got up to go away.
 
 "Going so soon!" said Marianne; "my dear Edward, this must not be."
 
 And drawing him a little aside, she whispered her persuasion that Lucy
 could not stay much longer.  But even this encouragement failed, for he
 would go; and Lucy, who would have outstaid him, had his visit lasted
 two hours, soon afterwards went away.
 
 "What can bring her here so often?" said Marianne, on her leaving them.
 "Could not she see that we wanted her gone!--how teazing to Edward!"
 
 "Why so?--we were all his friends, and Lucy has been the longest known
 to him of any.  It is but natural that he should like to see her as
 well as ourselves."
 
 Marianne looked at her steadily, and said, "You know, Elinor, that this
 is a kind of talking which I cannot bear.  If you only hope to have
 your assertion contradicted, as I must suppose to be the case, you
 ought to recollect that I am the last person in the world to do it.  I
--**--**--
 they would much rather have remained, at least all the morning, in Mrs.
 Jennings's house; but it was not a thing to be urged against the wishes
 of everybody. Their hours were therefore made over to Lady Middleton and
 the two Miss Steeles, by whom their company, in fact was as little
 valued, as it was professedly sought.
 
 They had too much sense to be desirable companions to the former; and
 by the latter they were considered with a jealous eye, as intruding on
 THEIR ground, and sharing the kindness which they wanted to monopolize.
 Though nothing could be more polite than Lady Middleton's behaviour to
 Elinor and Marianne, she did not really like them at all.  Because they
 neither flattered herself nor her children, she could not believe them
 good-natured; and because they were fond of reading, she fancied them
 satirical: perhaps without exactly knowing what it was to be satirical;
 but THAT did not signify.  It was censure in common use, and easily
 given.
 
 Their presence was a restraint both on her and on Lucy.  It checked the
 idleness of one, and the business of the other.  Lady Middleton was
 ashamed of doing nothing before them, and the flattery which Lucy was
 proud to think of and administer at other times, she feared they would
 despise her for offering.  Miss Steele was the least discomposed of the
 three, by their presence; and it was in their power to reconcile her to
 it entirely.  Would either of them only have given her a full and
 minute account of the whole affair between Marianne and Mr. Willoughby,
 she would have thought herself amply rewarded for the sacrifice of the
 best place by the fire after dinner, which their arrival occasioned.
 But this conciliation was not granted; for though she often threw out
--**--**--
 
 Elinor agreed to it all, for she did not think he deserved the
 compliment of rational opposition.
 
 As John Dashwood had no more pleasure in music than his eldest sister,
 his mind was equally at liberty to fix on any thing else; and a thought
 struck him during the evening, which he communicated to his wife, for
 her approbation, when they got home.  The consideration of Mrs.
 Dennison's mistake, in supposing his sisters their guests, had
 suggested the propriety of their being really invited to become such,
 while Mrs. Jennings's engagements kept her from home.  The expense would
 be nothing, the inconvenience not more; and it was altogether an
 attention which the delicacy of his conscience pointed out to be
 requisite to its complete enfranchisement from his promise to his
 father.  Fanny was startled at the proposal.
 
 "I do not see how it can be done," said she, "without affronting Lady
 Middleton, for they spend every day with her; otherwise I should be
 exceedingly glad to do it.  You know I am always ready to pay them any
 attention in my power, as my taking them out this evening shews.  But
 they are Lady Middleton's visitors.  How can I ask them away from her?"
 
 Her husband, but with great humility, did not see the force of her
 objection.  "They had already spent a week in this manner in Conduit
 Street, and Lady Middleton could not be displeased at their giving the
 same number of days to such near relations."
 
 Fanny paused a moment, and then, with fresh vigor, said,
 
 "My love I would ask them with all my heart, if it was in my power.
 But I had just settled within myself to ask the Miss Steeles to spend a
 few days with us.  They are very well behaved, good kind of girls; and
--**--**--
 
 
 CHAPTER 37
 
 
 Mrs. Palmer was so well at the end of a fortnight, that her mother felt
 it no longer necessary to give up the whole of her time to her; and,
 contenting herself with visiting her once or twice a day, returned from
 that period to her own home, and her own habits, in which she found the
 Miss Dashwoods very ready to resume their former share.
 
 About the third or fourth morning after their being thus resettled in
 Berkeley Street, Mrs. Jennings, on returning from her ordinary visit to
 Mrs. Palmer, entered the drawing-room, where Elinor was sitting by
 herself, with an air of such hurrying importance as prepared her to
 hear something wonderful; and giving her time only to form that idea,
 began directly to justify it, by saying,
 
 "Lord! my dear Miss Dashwood! have you heard the news?"
 
 "No, ma'am.  What is it?"
 
 "Something so strange!  But you shall hear it all.-- When I got to Mr.
 Palmer's, I found Charlotte quite in a fuss about the child.  She was
 sure it was very ill--it cried, and fretted, and was all over pimples.
 So I looked at it directly, and, 'Lord! my dear,' says I, 'it is
 nothing in the world, but the red gum--' and nurse said just the same.
 But Charlotte, she would not be satisfied, so Mr. Donavan was sent for;
 and luckily he happened to just come in from Harley Street, so he
 stepped over directly, and as soon as ever Mama, he said
 just as we did, that it was nothing in the world but the red gum, and
 then Charlotte was easy.  And so, just as he was going away again, it
 came into my head, I am sure I do not know how I happened to think of
--**--**--
 all the comfort that could be given by assurances of her own composure
 of mind, and a very earnest vindication of Edward from every charge but
 of imprudence, was readily offered.
 
 But Marianne for some time would give credit to neither.  Edward seemed
 a second Willoughby; and acknowledging as Elinor did, that she HAD
 loved him most sincerely, could she feel less than herself!  As for
 Lucy Steele, she considered her so totally unamiable, so absolutely
 incapable of attaching a sensible man, that she could not be persuaded
 at first to believe, and afterwards to pardon, any former affection of
 Edward for her.  She would not even admit it to have been natural; and
 Elinor left her to be convinced that it was so, by that which only
 could convince her, a better knowledge of mankind.
 
 Her first communication had reached no farther than to state the fact
 of the engagement, and the length of time it had existed.--Marianne's
 feelings had then broken in, and put an end to all regularity of
 detail; and for some time all that could be done was to soothe her
 distress, lessen her alarms, and combat her resentment.  The first
 question on her side, which led to farther particulars, was,--
 
 "How long has this been known to you, Elinor? has he written to you?"
 
 "I have known it these four months.  When Lucy first came to Barton
 Park last November, she told me in confidence of her engagement."
 
 At these words, Marianne's eyes expressed the astonishment which her
 lips could not utter.  After a pause of wonder, she exclaimed--
 
 "Four months!--Have you known of this four months?"
 
 Elinor confirmed it.
 
 "What!--while attending me in all my misery, has this been on your
 heart?--And I have reproached you for being happy!"--
 
 "It was not fit that you should then know how much I was the reverse!"
--**--**--
 short, I do not mean to reflect upon the behaviour of any person whom
 you have a regard for, Mrs. Jennings.  We all wish her extremely happy;
 and Mrs. Ferrars's conduct throughout the whole, has been such as every
 conscientious, good mother, in like circumstances, would adopt.  It has
 been dignified and liberal.  Edward has drawn his own lot, and I fear
 it will be a bad one."
 
 Marianne sighed out her similar apprehension; and Elinor's heart wrung
 for the feelings of Edward, while braving his mother's threats, for a
 woman who could not reward him.
 
 "Well, sir," said Mrs. Jennings, "and how did it end?"
 
 "I am sorry to say, ma'am, in a most unhappy rupture:-- Edward is
 dismissed for ever from his mother's notice.  He left her house
 yesterday, but where he is gone, or whether he is still in town, I do
 not know; for WE of course can make no inquiry."
 
 "Poor young man!--and what is to become of him?"
 
 "What, indeed, ma'am!  It is a melancholy consideration.  Born to the
 prospect of such affluence!  I cannot conceive a situation more
 deplorable.  The interest of two thousand pounds--how can a man live on
 it?--and when to that is added the recollection, that he might, but for
 his own folly, within three months have been in the receipt of two
 thousand, five hundred a-year (for Miss Morton has thirty thousand
 pounds,) I cannot picture to myself a more wretched condition.  We must
 all feel for him; and the more so, because it is totally out of our
 power to assist him."
 
 "Poor young man!" cried Mrs. Jennings, "I am sure he should be very
 welcome to bed and board at my house; and so I would tell him if I
 could see him.  It is not fit that he should be living about at his own
--**--**--
 A few minutes more spent in the same kind of effusion, concluded his
 visit; and with repeated assurances to his sisters that he really
 believed there was no material danger in Fanny's indisposition, and
 that they need not therefore be very uneasy about it, he went away;
 leaving the three ladies unanimous in their sentiments on the present
 occasion, as far at least as it regarded Mrs. Ferrars's conduct, the
 Dashwoods', and Edward's.
 
 Marianne's indignation burst forth as soon as he quitted the room; and
 as her vehemence made reserve impossible in Elinor, and unnecessary in
 Mrs. Jennings, they all joined in a very spirited critique upon the
 party.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER 38
 
 
 Mrs. Jennings was very warm in her praise of Edward's conduct, but only
 Elinor and Marianne understood its true merit.  THEY only knew how
 little he had had to tempt him to be disobedient, and how small was the
 consolation, beyond the consciousness of doing right, that could remain
 to him in the loss of friends and fortune.  Elinor gloried in his
 integrity; and Marianne forgave all his offences in compassion for his
 punishment.  But though confidence between them was, by this public
 discovery, restored to its proper state, it was not a subject on which
 either of them were fond of dwelling when alone.  Elinor avoided it
 upon principle, as tending to fix still more upon her thoughts, by the
 too warm, too positive assurances of Marianne, that belief of Edward's
 continued affection for herself which she rather wished to do away; and
 Marianne's courage soon failed her, in trying to converse upon a topic
 which always left her more dissatisfied with herself than ever, by the
 comparison it necessarily produced between Elinor's conduct and her own.
 
 She felt all the force of that comparison; but not as her sister had
--**--**--
 should happen to take you and your sister away, and Mrs. Jennings
 should want company, I am sure we should be very glad to come and stay
 with her for as long a time as she likes.  I suppose Lady Middleton
 won't ask us any more this bout.  Good-by; I am sorry Miss Marianne was
 not here.  Remember me kindly to her.  La! if you have not got your
 spotted muslin on!--I wonder you was not afraid of its being torn."
 
 Such was her parting concern; for after this, she had time only to pay
 her farewell compliments to Mrs. Jennings, before her company was
 claimed by Mrs. Richardson; and Elinor was left in possession of
 knowledge which might feed her powers of reflection some time, though
 she had learnt very little more than what had been already foreseen and
 foreplanned in her own mind.  Edward's marriage with Lucy was as firmly
 determined on, and the time of its taking place remained as absolutely
 uncertain, as she had concluded it would be;--every thing depended,
 exactly after her expectation, on his getting that preferment, of
 which, at present, there seemed not the smallest chance.
 
 As soon as they returned to the carriage, Mrs. Jennings was eager for
 information; but as Elinor wished to spread as little as possible
 intelligence that had in the first place been so unfairly obtained, she
 confined herself to the brief repetition of such simple particulars, as
 she felt assured that Lucy, for the sake of her own consequence, would
 choose to have known.  The continuance of their engagement, and the
 means that were able to be taken for promoting its end, was all her
 communication; and this produced from Mrs. Jennings the following
 natural remark.
 
 "Wait for his having a living!--ay, we all know how THAT will
--**--**--
      he consent to it; but he said it should never be,
      he did not regard his mother's anger, while he could
      have my affections; our prospects are not very
      bright, to be sure, but we must wait, and hope for
      the best; he will be ordained shortly; and should
      it ever be in your power to recommend him to any
      body that has a living to bestow, am very sure you
      will not forget us, and dear Mrs. Jennings too,
      trust she will speak a good word for us to Sir John,
      or Mr. Palmer, or any friend that may be able to
      assist us.--Poor Anne was much to blame for what
      she did, but she did it for the best, so I say
      nothing; hope Mrs. Jennings won't think it too much
      trouble to give us a call, should she come this way
      any morning, 'twould be a great kindness, and my
      cousins would be proud to know her.--My paper reminds
      me to conclude; and begging to be most gratefully
      and respectfully remembered to her, and to Sir John,
      and Lady Middleton, and the dear children, when you
      chance to see them, and love to Miss Marianne,
 
                                       "I am, &c."
 
 As soon as Elinor had finished it, she performed what she concluded to
 be its writer's real design, by placing it in the hands of Mrs.
 Jennings, who read it aloud with many comments of satisfaction and
 praise.
 
 "Very well indeed!--how prettily she writes!--aye, that was quite
 proper to let him be off if he would.  That was just like Lucy.--Poor
 soul! I wish I COULD get him a living, with all my heart.--She calls me
 dear Mrs. Jennings, you see.  She is a good-hearted girl as ever
 lived.--Very well upon my word.  That sentence is very prettily turned.
--**--**--
 
 Elinor told him that it was.
 
 "The cruelty, the impolitic cruelty,"--he replied, with great
 feeling,--"of dividing, or attempting to divide, two young people long
 attached to each other, is terrible.-- Mrs. Ferrars does not know what
 she may be doing--what she may drive her son to.  I have seen Mr.
 Ferrars two or three times in Harley Street, and am much pleased with
 him.  He is not a young man with whom one can be intimately acquainted
 in a short time, but I have seen enough of him to wish him well for his
 own sake, and as a friend of yours, I wish it still more.  I understand
 that he intends to take orders.  Will you be so good as to tell him
 that the living of Delaford, now just vacant, as I am informed by this
 day's post, is his, if he think it worth his acceptance--but THAT,
 perhaps, so unfortunately circumstanced as he is now, it may be
 nonsense to appear to doubt; I only wish it were more  valuable.-- It
 is a rectory, but a small one; the late incumbent, I believe, did not
 make more than 200 L per annum, and though it is certainly capable of
 improvement, I fear, not to such an amount as to afford him a very
 comfortable income.  Such as it is, however, my pleasure in presenting
 him to it, will be very great.  Pray assure him of it."
 
 Elinor's astonishment at this commission could hardly have been
 greater, had the Colonel been really making her an offer of his hand.
 The preferment, which only two days before she had considered as
 hopeless for Edward, was already provided to enable him to marry;--and
 SHE, of all people in the world, was fixed on to bestow it!--Her
 emotion was such as Mrs. Jennings had attributed to a very different
--**--**--
 properly worded than if it had arisen from an offer of marriage.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER 40
 
 
 "Well, Miss Dashwood," said Mrs. Jennings, sagaciously smiling, as soon
 as the gentleman had withdrawn, "I do not ask you what the Colonel has
 been saying to you; for though, upon my honour, I TRIED to keep out of
 hearing, I could not help catching enough to understand his business.
 And I assure you I never was better pleased in my life, and I wish you
 joy of it with all my heart."
 
 "Thank you, ma'am," said Elinor.  "It is a matter of great joy to me;
 and I feel the goodness of Colonel Brandon most sensibly.  There are
 not many men who would act as he has done.  Few people who have so
 compassionate a heart!  I never was more astonished in my life."
 
 "Lord! my dear, you are very modest.  I an't the least astonished at it
 in the world, for I have often thought of late, there was nothing more
 likely to happen."
 
 "You judged from your knowledge of the Colonel's general benevolence;
 but at least you could not foresee that the opportunity would so very
 soon occur."
 
 "Opportunity!" repeated Mrs. Jennings--"Oh! as to that, when a man has
 once made up his mind to such a thing, somehow or other he will soon
 find an opportunity.  Well, my dear, I wish you joy of it again and
 again; and if ever there was a happy couple in the world, I think I
 shall soon know where to look for them."
 
 "You mean to go to Delaford after them I suppose," said Elinor, with a
 faint smile.
 
 "Aye, my dear, that I do, indeed.  And as to the house being a bad one,
 I do not know what the Colonel would be at, for it is as good a one as
--**--**--
 the point of communicating by paper.  I am charged with a most
 agreeable office (breathing rather faster than usual as she spoke.)
 Colonel Brandon, who was here only ten minutes ago, has desired me to
 say, that understanding you mean to take orders, he has great pleasure
 in offering you the living of Delaford now just vacant, and only wishes
 it were more valuable.  Allow me to congratulate you on having so
 respectable and well-judging a friend, and to join in his wish that the
 living--it is about two hundred a-year--were much more considerable,
 and such as might better enable you to--as might be more than a
 temporary accommodation to yourself--such, in short, as might establish
 all your views of happiness."
 
 What Edward felt, as he could not say it himself, it cannot be expected
 that any one else should say for him.  He LOOKED all the astonishment
 which such unexpected, such unthought-of information could not fail of
 exciting; but he said only these two words,
 
 "Colonel Brandon!"
 
 "Yes," continued Elinor, gathering more resolution, as some of the
 worst was over, "Colonel Brandon means it as a testimony of his concern
 for what has lately passed--for the cruel situation in which the
 unjustifiable conduct of your family has placed you--a concern which I
 am sure Marianne, myself, and all your friends, must share; and
 likewise as a proof of his high esteem for your general character, and
 his particular approbation of your behaviour on the present occasion."
 
 "Colonel Brandon give ME a living!--Can it be possible?"
 
 "The unkindness of your own relations has made you astonished to find
 friendship any where."
 
 "No," replied he, with sudden consciousness, "not to find it in YOU;
 for I cannot be ignorant that to you, to your goodness, I owe it
 all.--I feel it--I would express it if I could--but, as you well know,
--**--**--
 Ferrars!"
 
 The deception could not continue after this; and an explanation
 immediately took place, by which both gained considerable amusement for
 the moment, without any material loss of happiness to either, for Mrs.
 Jennings only exchanged one form of delight for another, and still
 without forfeiting her expectation of the first.
 
 "Aye, aye, the parsonage is but a small one," said she, after the first
 ebullition of surprise and satisfaction was over, "and very likely MAY
 be out of repair; but to hear a man apologising, as I thought, for a
 house that to my knowledge has five sitting rooms on the ground-floor,
 and I think the housekeeper told me could make up fifteen beds!--and to
 you too, that had been used to live in Barton cottage!-- It seems quite
 ridiculous.  But, my dear, we must touch up the Colonel to do some
 thing to the parsonage, and make it comfortable for them, before Lucy
 goes to it."
 
 "But Colonel Brandon does not seem to have any idea of the living's
 being enough to allow them to marry."
 
 "The Colonel is a ninny, my dear; because he has two thousand a-year
 himself, he thinks that nobody else can marry on less.  Take my word
 for it, that, if I am alive, I shall be paying a visit at Delaford
 Parsonage before Michaelmas; and I am sure I shan't go if Lucy an't
 there."
 
 Elinor was quite of her opinion, as to the probability of their not
 waiting for any thing more.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER 41
 
 
 Edward, having carried his thanks to Colonel Brandon, proceeded with
 his happiness to Lucy; and such was the excess of it by the time he
 reached Bartlett's Buildings, that she was able to assure Mrs.
 Jennings, who called on her again the next day with her
--**--**--
 her to be secure of a comfortable provision, and therefore cannot allow
 herself to feel so much pain as pleasure. Every friend of Miss Taylor
 must be glad to have her so happily married."
 
 "And you have forgotten one matter of joy to me," said Emma, "and a very
 considerable one--that I made the match myself. I made the match, you
 know, four years ago; and to have it take place, and be proved in the
 right, when so many people said Mr. Weston would never marry again, may
 comfort me for any thing."
 
 Mr. Knightley shook his head at her. Her father fondly replied, "Ah!
 my dear, I wish you would not make matches and foretell things, for
 whatever you say always comes to pass. Pray do not make any more
 matches."
 
 "I promise you to make none for myself, papa; but I must, indeed, for
 other people. It is the greatest amusement in the world! And after such
 success, you know!--Every body said that Mr. Weston would never marry
 again. Oh dear, no! Mr. Weston, who had been a widower so long, and who
 seemed so perfectly comfortable without a wife, so constantly occupied
 either in his business in town or among his friends here, always
 acceptable wherever he went, always cheerful--Mr. Weston need not spend
 a single evening in the year alone if he did not like it. Oh no! Mr.
 Weston certainly would never marry again. Some people even talked of a
 promise to his wife on her deathbed, and others of the son and the
 uncle not letting him. All manner of solemn nonsense was talked on the
 subject, but I believed none of it.
 
 "Ever since the day--about four years ago--that Miss Taylor and I met
 with him in Broadway Lane, when, because it began to drizzle, he darted
--**--**--
 "Mr. Elton is a very pretty young man, to be sure, and a very good young
 man, and I have a great regard for him. But if you want to shew him any
 attention, my dear, ask him to come and dine with us some day. That will
 be a much better thing. I dare say Mr. Knightley will be so kind as to
 meet him."
 
 "With a great deal of pleasure, sir, at any time," said Mr. Knightley,
 laughing, "and I agree with you entirely, that it will be a much better
 thing. Invite him to dinner, Emma, and help him to the best of the fish
 and the chicken, but leave him to chuse his own wife. Depend upon it, a
 man of six or seven-and-twenty can take care of himself."
 
 
 
 CHAPTER II
 
 
 Mr. Weston was a native of Highbury, and born of a respectable family,
 which for the last two or three generations had been rising into
 gentility and property. He had received a good education, but, on
 succeeding early in life to a small independence, had become indisposed
 for any of the more homely pursuits in which his brothers were engaged,
 and had satisfied an active, cheerful mind and social temper by entering
 into the militia of his county, then embodied.
 
 Captain Weston was a general favourite; and when the chances of his
 military life had introduced him to Miss Churchill, of a great Yorkshire
 family, and Miss Churchill fell in love with him, nobody was surprized,
 except her brother and his wife, who had never seen him, and who were
 full of pride and importance, which the connexion would offend.
 
 Miss Churchill, however, being of age, and with the full command of her
 fortune--though her fortune bore no proportion to the family-estate--was
 not to be dissuaded from the marriage, and it took place, to the
--**--**--
 Now, upon his father's marriage, it was very generally proposed, as a
 most proper attention, that the visit should take place. There was not a
 dissentient voice on the subject, either when Mrs. Perry drank tea with
 Mrs. and Miss Bates, or when Mrs. and Miss Bates returned the visit. Now
 was the time for Mr. Frank Churchill to come among them; and the hope
 strengthened when it was understood that he had written to his new
 mother on the occasion. For a few days, every morning visit in Highbury
 included some mention of the handsome letter Mrs. Weston had received.
 "I suppose you have heard of the handsome letter Mr. Frank Churchill
 has written to Mrs. Weston? I understand it was a very handsome letter,
 indeed. Mr. Woodhouse told me of it. Mr. Woodhouse saw the letter, and
 he says he never saw such a handsome letter in his life."
 
 It was, indeed, a highly prized letter. Mrs. Weston had, of course,
 formed a very favourable idea of the young man; and such a pleasing
 attention was an irresistible proof of his great good sense, and a most
 welcome addition to every source and every expression of congratulation
 which her marriage had already secured. She felt herself a most
 fortunate woman; and she had lived long enough to know how fortunate
 she might well be thought, where the only regret was for a partial
 separation from friends whose friendship for her had never cooled, and
 who could ill bear to part with her.
 
 She knew that at times she must be missed; and could not think, without
 pain, of Emma's losing a single pleasure, or suffering an hour's ennui,
 from the want of her companionableness: but dear Emma was of no feeble
 character; she was more equal to her situation than most girls would
--**--**--
 walk, or his short, as the year varied; and since Mrs. Weston's marriage
 her exercise had been too much confined. She had ventured once alone to
 Randalls, but it was not pleasant; and a Harriet Smith, therefore,
 one whom she could summon at any time to a walk, would be a valuable
 addition to her privileges. But in every respect, as she saw more of
 her, she approved her, and was confirmed in all her kind designs.
 
 Harriet certainly was not clever, but she had a sweet, docile, grateful
 disposition, was totally free from conceit, and only desiring to be
 guided by any one she looked up to. Her early attachment to herself
 was very amiable; and her inclination for good company, and power of
 appreciating what was elegant and clever, shewed that there was no
 want of taste, though strength of understanding must not be expected.
 Altogether she was quite convinced of Harriet Smith's being exactly the
 young friend she wanted--exactly the something which her home required.
 Such a friend as Mrs. Weston was out of the question. Two such could
 never be granted. Two such she did not want. It was quite a different
 sort of thing, a sentiment distinct and independent. Mrs. Weston was the
 object of a regard which had its basis in gratitude and esteem. Harriet
 would be loved as one to whom she could be useful. For Mrs. Weston there
 was nothing to be done; for Harriet every thing.
 
 Her first attempts at usefulness were in an endeavour to find out who
 were the parents, but Harriet could not tell. She was ready to tell
 every thing in her power, but on this subject questions were vain. Emma
 was obliged to fancy what she liked--but she could never believe that in
 the same situation _she_ should not have discovered the truth. Harriet
--**--**--
 perfectly right not to be in a hurry. They seem very comfortable as they
 are, and if she were to take any pains to marry him, she would probably
 repent it. Six years hence, if he could meet with a good sort of young
 woman in the same rank as his own, with a little money, it might be very
 desirable."
 
 "Six years hence! Dear Miss Woodhouse, he would be thirty years old!"
 
 "Well, and that is as early as most men can afford to marry, who are not
 born to an independence. Mr. Martin, I imagine, has his fortune entirely
 to make--cannot be at all beforehand with the world. Whatever money he
 might come into when his father died, whatever his share of the family
 property, it is, I dare say, all afloat, all employed in his stock, and
 so forth; and though, with diligence and good luck, he may be rich in
 time, it is next to impossible that he should have realised any thing
 yet."
 
 "To be sure, so it is. But they live very comfortably. They have no
 indoors man, else they do not want for any thing; and Mrs. Martin talks
 of taking a boy another year."
 
 "I wish you may not get into a scrape, Harriet, whenever he does
 marry;--I mean, as to being acquainted with his wife--for though his
 sisters, from a superior education, are not to be altogether objected
 to, it does not follow that he might marry any body at all fit for you
 to notice. The misfortune of your birth ought to make you particularly
 careful as to your associates. There can be no doubt of your being a
 gentleman's daughter, and you must support your claim to that station by
 every thing within your own power, or there will be plenty of people who
--**--**--
 she trusted there was no other hold, and that there would be no serious
 difficulty, on Harriet's side, to oppose any friendly arrangement of her
 own.
 
 They met Mr. Martin the very next day, as they were walking on the
 Donwell road. He was on foot, and after looking very respectfully at
 her, looked with most unfeigned satisfaction at her companion. Emma was
 not sorry to have such an opportunity of survey; and walking a few
 yards forward, while they talked together, soon made her quick eye
 sufficiently acquainted with Mr. Robert Martin. His appearance was very
 neat, and he looked like a sensible young man, but his person had no
 other advantage; and when he came to be contrasted with gentlemen,
 she thought he must lose all the ground he had gained in Harriet's
 inclination. Harriet was not insensible of manner; she had voluntarily
 noticed her father's gentleness with admiration as well as wonder. Mr.
 Martin looked as if he did not know what manner was.
 
 They remained but a few minutes together, as Miss Woodhouse must not be
 kept waiting; and Harriet then came running to her with a smiling face,
 and in a flutter of spirits, which Miss Woodhouse hoped very soon to
 compose.
 
 "Only think of our happening to meet him!--How very odd! It was quite
 a chance, he said, that he had not gone round by Randalls. He did not
 think we ever walked this road. He thought we walked towards Randalls
 most days. He has not been able to get the Romance of the Forest yet.
 He was so busy the last time he was at Kingston that he quite forgot it,
 but he goes again to-morrow. So very odd we should happen to meet! Well,
 Miss Woodhouse, is he like what you expected? What do you think of him?
--**--**--
 you. Did not I tell you what he said of you the other day?"
 
 She then repeated some warm personal praise which she had drawn from Mr.
 Elton, and now did full justice to; and Harriet blushed and smiled, and
 said she had always thought Mr. Elton very agreeable.
 
 Mr. Elton was the very person fixed on by Emma for driving the young
 farmer out of Harriet's head. She thought it would be an excellent
 match; and only too palpably desirable, natural, and probable, for her
 to have much merit in planning it. She feared it was what every body
 else must think of and predict. It was not likely, however, that any
 body should have equalled her in the date of the plan, as it had
 entered her brain during the very first evening of Harriet's coming to
 Hartfield. The longer she considered it, the greater was her sense
 of its expediency. Mr. Elton's situation was most suitable, quite the
 gentleman himself, and without low connexions; at the same time, not of
 any family that could fairly object to the doubtful birth of Harriet.
 He had a comfortable home for her, and Emma imagined a very sufficient
 income; for though the vicarage of Highbury was not large, he was known
 to have some independent property; and she thought very highly of him
 as a good-humoured, well-meaning, respectable young man, without any
 deficiency of useful understanding or knowledge of the world.
 
 She had already satisfied herself that he thought Harriet a beautiful
 girl, which she trusted, with such frequent meetings at Hartfield, was
 foundation enough on his side; and on Harriet's there could be little
 doubt that the idea of being preferred by him would have all the usual
 weight and efficacy. And he was really a very pleasing young man, a
--**--**--
 expected that Emma, accountable to nobody but her father, who perfectly
 approves the acquaintance, should put an end to it, so long as it is a
 source of pleasure to herself. It has been so many years my province to
 give advice, that you cannot be surprized, Mr. Knightley, at this little
 remains of office."
 
 "Not at all," cried he; "I am much obliged to you for it. It is very
 good advice, and it shall have a better fate than your advice has often
 found; for it shall be attended to."
 
 "Mrs. John Knightley is easily alarmed, and might be made unhappy about
 her sister."
 
 "Be satisfied," said he, "I will not raise any outcry. I will keep my
 ill-humour to myself. I have a very sincere interest in Emma. Isabella
 does not seem more my sister; has never excited a greater interest;
 perhaps hardly so great. There is an anxiety, a curiosity in what one
 feels for Emma. I wonder what will become of her!"
 
 "So do I," said Mrs. Weston gently, "very much."
 
 "She always declares she will never marry, which, of course, means just
 nothing at all. But I have no idea that she has yet ever seen a man she
 cared for. It would not be a bad thing for her to be very much in love
 with a proper object. I should like to see Emma in love, and in some
 doubt of a return; it would do her good. But there is nobody hereabouts
 to attach her; and she goes so seldom from home."
 
 "There does, indeed, seem as little to tempt her to break her resolution
 at present," said Mrs. Weston, "as can well be; and while she is so
 happy at Hartfield, I cannot wish her to be forming any attachment which
--**--**--
 She must allow him to be still frequently coming to look; any thing less
 would certainly have been too little in a lover; and he was ready at the
 smallest intermission of the pencil, to jump up and see the progress,
 and be charmed.--There was no being displeased with such an encourager,
 for his admiration made him discern a likeness almost before it
 was possible. She could not respect his eye, but his love and his
 complaisance were unexceptionable.
 
 The sitting was altogether very satisfactory; she was quite enough
 pleased with the first day's sketch to wish to go on. There was no want
 of likeness, she had been fortunate in the attitude, and as she meant
 to throw in a little improvement to the figure, to give a little more
 height, and considerably more elegance, she had great confidence of
 its being in every way a pretty drawing at last, and of its filling
 its destined place with credit to them both--a standing memorial of the
 beauty of one, the skill of the other, and the friendship of both;
 with as many other agreeable associations as Mr. Elton's very promising
 attachment was likely to add.
 
 Harriet was to sit again the next day; and Mr. Elton, just as he ought,
 entreated for the permission of attending and reading to them again.
 
 "By all means. We shall be most happy to consider you as one of the
 party."
 
 The same civilities and courtesies, the same success and satisfaction,
 took place on the morrow, and accompanied the whole progress of the
 picture, which was rapid and happy. Every body who saw it was pleased,
 but Mr. Elton was in continual raptures, and defended it through every
 criticism.
 
 "Miss Woodhouse has given her friend the only beauty she
 wanted,"--observed Mrs. Weston to him--not in the least suspecting that
--**--**--
 
 "What a precious deposit!" said he with a tender sigh, as he received
 it.
 
 "This man is almost too gallant to be in love," thought Emma. "I should
 say so, but that I suppose there may be a hundred different ways of
 being in love. He is an excellent young man, and will suit Harriet
 exactly; it will be an 'Exactly so,' as he says himself; but he does
 sigh and languish, and study for compliments rather more than I could
 endure as a principal. I come in for a pretty good share as a second.
 But it is his gratitude on Harriet's account."
 
 
 
 CHAPTER VII
 
 
 The very day of Mr. Elton's going to London produced a fresh occasion
 for Emma's services towards her friend. Harriet had been at Hartfield,
 as usual, soon after breakfast; and, after a time, had gone home to
 return again to dinner: she returned, and sooner than had been
 talked of, and with an agitated, hurried look, announcing something
 extraordinary to have happened which she was longing to tell. Half a
 minute brought it all out. She had heard, as soon as she got back to
 Mrs. Goddard's, that Mr. Martin had been there an hour before, and
 finding she was not at home, nor particularly expected, had left a
 little parcel for her from one of his sisters, and gone away; and on
 opening this parcel, she had actually found, besides the two songs which
 she had lent Elizabeth to copy, a letter to herself; and this letter was
 from him, from Mr. Martin, and contained a direct proposal of marriage.
 "Who could have thought it? She was so surprized she did not know what
 to do. Yes, quite a proposal of marriage; and a very good letter,
 at least she thought so. And he wrote as if he really loved her very
--**--**--
 
 CHAPTER VIII
 
 
 Harriet slept at Hartfield that night. For some weeks past she had been
 spending more than half her time there, and gradually getting to have
 a bed-room appropriated to herself; and Emma judged it best in every
 respect, safest and kindest, to keep her with them as much as possible
 just at present. She was obliged to go the next morning for an hour or
 two to Mrs. Goddard's, but it was then to be settled that she should
 return to Hartfield, to make a regular visit of some days.
 
 While she was gone, Mr. Knightley called, and sat some time with Mr.
 Woodhouse and Emma, till Mr. Woodhouse, who had previously made up his
 mind to walk out, was persuaded by his daughter not to defer it, and was
 induced by the entreaties of both, though against the scruples of his
 own civility, to leave Mr. Knightley for that purpose. Mr. Knightley,
 who had nothing of ceremony about him, was offering by his short,
 decided answers, an amusing contrast to the protracted apologies and
 civil hesitations of the other.
 
 "Well, I believe, if you will excuse me, Mr. Knightley, if you will not
 consider me as doing a very rude thing, I shall take Emma's advice and
 go out for a quarter of an hour. As the sun is out, I believe I had
 better take my three turns while I can. I treat you without ceremony,
 Mr. Knightley. We invalids think we are privileged people."
 
 "My dear sir, do not make a stranger of me."
 
 "I leave an excellent substitute in my daughter. Emma will be happy to
 entertain you. And therefore I think I will beg your excuse and take my
 three turns--my winter walk."
 
 "You cannot do better, sir."
 
 "I would ask for the pleasure of your company, Mr. Knightley, but I am a
--**--**--
 you have told me. He did speak yesterday--that is, he wrote, and was
 refused."
 
 This was obliged to be repeated before it could be believed; and Mr.
 Knightley actually looked red with surprize and displeasure, as he stood
 up, in tall indignation, and said,
 
 "Then she is a greater simpleton than I ever believed her. What is the
 foolish girl about?"
 
 "Oh! to be sure," cried Emma, "it is always incomprehensible to a man
 that a woman should ever refuse an offer of marriage. A man always
 imagines a woman to be ready for any body who asks her."
 
 "Nonsense! a man does not imagine any such thing. But what is the
 meaning of this? Harriet Smith refuse Robert Martin? madness, if it is
 so; but I hope you are mistaken."
 
 "I saw her answer!--nothing could be clearer."
 
 "You saw her answer!--you wrote her answer too. Emma, this is your
 doing. You persuaded her to refuse him."
 
 "And if I did, (which, however, I am far from allowing) I should not
 feel that I had done wrong. Mr. Martin is a very respectable young man,
 but I cannot admit him to be Harriet's equal; and am rather surprized
 indeed that he should have ventured to address her. By your account, he
 does seem to have had some scruples. It is a pity that they were ever
 got over."
 
 "Not Harriet's equal!" exclaimed Mr. Knightley loudly and warmly; and
 with calmer asperity, added, a few moments afterwards, "No, he is
 not her equal indeed, for he is as much her superior in sense as in
 situation. Emma, your infatuation about that girl blinds you. What are
 Harriet Smith's claims, either of birth, nature or education, to any
 connexion higher than Robert Martin? She is the natural daughter of
 nobody knows whom, with probably no settled provision at all, and
--**--**--
 contemptible as you represent them. She is not a clever girl, but she
 has better sense than you are aware of, and does not deserve to have her
 understanding spoken of so slightingly. Waiving that point, however, and
 supposing her to be, as you describe her, only pretty and good-natured,
 let me tell you, that in the degree she possesses them, they are not
 trivial recommendations to the world in general, for she is, in fact, a
 beautiful girl, and must be thought so by ninety-nine people out of an
 hundred; and till it appears that men are much more philosophic on the
 subject of beauty than they are generally supposed; till they do fall
 in love with well-informed minds instead of handsome faces, a girl, with
 such loveliness as Harriet, has a certainty of being admired and sought
 after, of having the power of chusing from among many, consequently a
 claim to be nice. Her good-nature, too, is not so very slight a claim,
 comprehending, as it does, real, thorough sweetness of temper and
 manner, a very humble opinion of herself, and a great readiness to
 be pleased with other people. I am very much mistaken if your sex in
 general would not think such beauty, and such temper, the highest claims
 a woman could possess."
 
 "Upon my word, Emma, to hear you abusing the reason you have, is almost
 enough to make me think so too. Better be without sense, than misapply
 it as you do."
 
 "To be sure!" cried she playfully. "I know _that_ is the feeling of
 you all. I know that such a girl as Harriet is exactly what every
 man delights in--what at once bewitches his senses and satisfies his
 judgment. Oh! Harriet may pick and chuse. Were you, yourself, ever to
 marry, she is the very woman for you. And is she, at seventeen, just
--**--**--
 moment:--after another moment's pause,
 
 "Take it," said Emma, smiling, and pushing the paper towards
 Harriet--"it is for you. Take your own."
 
 But Harriet was in a tremor, and could not touch it; and Emma, never
 loth to be first, was obliged to examine it herself.
 
         To Miss--
 
           CHARADE.
 
     My first displays the wealth and pomp of kings,
       Lords of the earth! their luxury and ease.
     Another view of man, my second brings,
       Behold him there, the monarch of the seas!
 
     But ah! united, what reverse we have!
       Man's boasted power and freedom, all are flown;
     Lord of the earth and sea, he bends a slave,
       And woman, lovely woman, reigns alone.
 
       Thy ready wit the word will soon supply,
       May its approval beam in that soft eye!
 
 She cast her eye over it, pondered, caught the meaning, read it through
 again to be quite certain, and quite mistress of the lines, and then
 passing it to Harriet, sat happily smiling, and saying to herself, while
 Harriet was puzzling over the paper in all the confusion of hope and
 dulness, "Very well, Mr. Elton, very well indeed. I have read worse
 charades. _Courtship_--a very good hint. I give you credit for it. This
 is feeling your way. This is saying very plainly--'Pray, Miss Smith,
 give me leave to pay my addresses to you. Approve my charade and my
 intentions in the same glance.'
 
       May its approval beam in that soft eye!
 
 Harriet exactly. Soft is the very word for her eye--of all epithets, the
 justest that could be given.
 
       Thy ready wit the word will soon supply.
 
 Humph--Harriet's ready wit! All the better. A man must be very much in
 love, indeed, to describe her so. Ah! Mr. Knightley, I wish you had the
 benefit of this; I think this would convince you. For once in your life
--**--**--
 
 Emma could not have desired a more spirited rejection of Mr. Martin's
 prose.
 
 "Such sweet lines!" continued Harriet--"these two last!--But how shall I
 ever be able to return the paper, or say I have found it out?--Oh! Miss
 Woodhouse, what can we do about that?"
 
 "Leave it to me. You do nothing. He will be here this evening, I dare
 say, and then I will give it him back, and some nonsense or other will
 pass between us, and you shall not be committed.--Your soft eyes shall
 chuse their own time for beaming. Trust to me."
 
 "Oh! Miss Woodhouse, what a pity that I must not write this beautiful
 charade into my book! I am sure I have not got one half so good."
 
 "Leave out the two last lines, and there is no reason why you should not
 write it into your book."
 
 "Oh! but those two lines are"--
 
 --"The best of all. Granted;--for private enjoyment; and for private
 enjoyment keep them. They are not at all the less written you know,
 because you divide them. The couplet does not cease to be, nor does its
 meaning change. But take it away, and all _appropriation_ ceases, and a
 very pretty gallant charade remains, fit for any collection. Depend upon
 it, he would not like to have his charade slighted, much better than his
 passion. A poet in love must be encouraged in both capacities, or
 neither. Give me the book, I will write it down, and then there can be
 no possible reflection on you."
 
 Harriet submitted, though her mind could hardly separate the parts,
 so as to feel quite sure that her friend were not writing down a
 declaration of love. It seemed too precious an offering for any degree
 of publicity.
 
 "I shall never let that book go out of my own hands," said she.
--**--**--
 "Aye, very true.--I wish I could recollect more of it.
 
     Kitty, a fair but frozen maid.
 
 The name makes me think of poor Isabella; for she was very near being
 christened Catherine after her grandmama. I hope we shall have her here
 next week. Have you thought, my dear, where you shall put her--and what
 room there will be for the children?"
 
 "Oh! yes--she will have her own room, of course; the room she always
 has;--and there is the nursery for the children,--just as usual, you
 know. Why should there be any change?"
 
 "I do not know, my dear--but it is so long since she was here!--not
 since last Easter, and then only for a few days.--Mr. John Knightley's
 being a lawyer is very inconvenient.--Poor Isabella!--she is sadly taken
 away from us all!--and how sorry she will be when she comes, not to see
 Miss Taylor here!"
 
 "She will not be surprized, papa, at least."
 
 "I do not know, my dear. I am sure I was very much surprized when I
 first heard she was going to be married."
 
 "We must ask Mr. and Mrs. Weston to dine with us, while Isabella is
 here."
 
 "Yes, my dear, if there is time.--But--(in a very depressed tone)--she
 is coming for only one week. There will not be time for any thing."
 
 "It is unfortunate that they cannot stay longer--but it seems a case of
 necessity. Mr. John Knightley must be in town again on the 28th, and we
 ought to be thankful, papa, that we are to have the whole of the time
 they can give to the country, that two or three days are not to be taken
 out for the Abbey. Mr. Knightley promises to give up his claim this
 Christmas--though you know it is longer since they were with him, than
--**--**--
 "If I know myself, Harriet, mine is an active, busy mind, with a great
 many independent resources; and I do not perceive why I should be more
 in want of employment at forty or fifty than one-and-twenty. Woman's
 usual occupations of hand and mind will be as open to me then as they
 are now; or with no important variation. If I draw less, I shall read
 more; if I give up music, I shall take to carpet-work. And as for
 objects of interest, objects for the affections, which is in truth the
 great point of inferiority, the want of which is really the great evil
 to be avoided in _not_ marrying, I shall be very well off, with all the
 children of a sister I love so much, to care about. There will be enough
 of them, in all probability, to supply every sort of sensation that
 declining life can need. There will be enough for every hope and every
 fear; and though my attachment to none can equal that of a parent, it
 suits my ideas of comfort better than what is warmer and blinder. My
 nephews and nieces!--I shall often have a niece with me."
 
 "Do you know Miss Bates's niece? That is, I know you must have seen her
 a hundred times--but are you acquainted?"
 
 "Oh! yes; we are always forced to be acquainted whenever she comes to
 Highbury. By the bye, _that_ is almost enough to put one out of conceit
 with a niece. Heaven forbid! at least, that I should ever bore people
 half so much about all the Knightleys together, as she does about Jane
 Fairfax. One is sick of the very name of Jane Fairfax. Every letter from
 her is read forty times over; her compliments to all friends go round
--**--**--
 And dear Emma, too!--What a dreadful loss to you both!--I have been so
 grieved for you.--I could not imagine how you could possibly do without
 her.--It is a sad change indeed.--But I hope she is pretty well, sir."
 
 "Pretty well, my dear--I hope--pretty well.--I do not know but that the
 place agrees with her tolerably."
 
 Mr. John Knightley here asked Emma quietly whether there were any doubts
 of the air of Randalls.
 
 "Oh! no--none in the least. I never saw Mrs. Weston better in my
 life--never looking so well. Papa is only speaking his own regret."
 
 "Very much to the honour of both," was the handsome reply.
 
 "And do you see her, sir, tolerably often?" asked Isabella in the
 plaintive tone which just suited her father.
 
 Mr. Woodhouse hesitated.--"Not near so often, my dear, as I could wish."
 
 "Oh! papa, we have missed seeing them but one entire day since they
 married. Either in the morning or evening of every day, excepting one,
 have we seen either Mr. Weston or Mrs. Weston, and generally both,
 either at Randalls or here--and as you may suppose, Isabella, most
 frequently here. They are very, very kind in their visits. Mr. Weston
 is really as kind as herself. Papa, if you speak in that melancholy way,
 you will be giving Isabella a false idea of us all. Every body must be
 aware that Miss Taylor must be missed, but every body ought also to be
 assured that Mr. and Mrs. Weston do really prevent our missing her by
 any means to the extent we ourselves anticipated--which is the exact
 truth."
 
 "Just as it should be," said Mr. John Knightley, "and just as I hoped
 it was from your letters. Her wish of shewing you attention could not be
 doubted, and his being a disengaged and social man makes it all easy. I
--**--**--
 about in her aunt's arms. It did assist; for though he began with grave
 looks and short questions, he was soon led on to talk of them all in
 the usual way, and to take the child out of her arms with all the
 unceremoniousness of perfect amity. Emma felt they were friends again;
 and the conviction giving her at first great satisfaction, and then
 a little sauciness, she could not help saying, as he was admiring the
 baby,
 
 "What a comfort it is, that we think alike about our nephews and nieces.
 As to men and women, our opinions are sometimes very different; but with
 regard to these children, I observe we never disagree."
 
 "If you were as much guided by nature in your estimate of men and women,
 and as little under the power of fancy and whim in your dealings with
 them, as you are where these children are concerned, we might always
 think alike."
 
 "To be sure--our discordancies must always arise from my being in the
 wrong."
 
 "Yes," said he, smiling--"and reason good. I was sixteen years old when
 you were born."
 
 "A material difference then," she replied--"and no doubt you were much
 my superior in judgment at that period of our lives; but does not the
 lapse of one-and-twenty years bring our understandings a good deal
 nearer?"
 
 "Yes--a good deal _nearer_."
 
 "But still, not near enough to give me a chance of being right, if we
 think differently."
 
 "I have still the advantage of you by sixteen years' experience, and by
 not being a pretty young woman and a spoiled child. Come, my dear Emma,
 let us be friends, and say no more about it. Tell your aunt, little
 Emma, that she ought to set you a better example than to be renewing old
--**--**--
 regret excessively on dear Emma's account that she cannot be more at
 Highbury; but now their daughter is married, I suppose Colonel and Mrs.
 Campbell will not be able to part with her at all. She would be such a
 delightful companion for Emma."
 
 Mr. Woodhouse agreed to it all, but added,
 
 "Our little friend Harriet Smith, however, is just such another pretty
 kind of young person. You will like Harriet. Emma could not have a
 better companion than Harriet."
 
 "I am most happy to hear it--but only Jane Fairfax one knows to be so
 very accomplished and superior!--and exactly Emma's age."
 
 This topic was discussed very happily, and others succeeded of similar
 moment, and passed away with similar harmony; but the evening did not
 close without a little return of agitation. The gruel came and supplied
 a great deal to be said--much praise and many comments--undoubting
 decision of its wholesomeness for every constitution, and pretty
 severe Philippics upon the many houses where it was never met with
 tolerable;--but, unfortunately, among the failures which the daughter
 had to instance, the most recent, and therefore most prominent, was in
 her own cook at South End, a young woman hired for the time, who never
 had been able to understand what she meant by a basin of nice smooth
 gruel, thin, but not too thin. Often as she had wished for and ordered
 it, she had never been able to get any thing tolerable. Here was a
 dangerous opening.
 
 "Ah!" said Mr. Woodhouse, shaking his head and fixing his eyes on her
 with tender concern.--The ejaculation in Emma's ear expressed, "Ah!
 there is no end of the sad consequences of your going to South End. It
 does not bear talking of." And for a little while she hoped he would not
--**--**--
 he sighed and smiled himself off in a way that left the balance of
 approbation much in his favour.
 
 After a few minutes of entire silence between them, John Knightley began
 with--
 
 "I never in my life saw a man more intent on being agreeable than Mr.
 Elton. It is downright labour to him where ladies are concerned. With
 men he can be rational and unaffected, but when he has ladies to please,
 every feature works."
 
 "Mr. Elton's manners are not perfect," replied Emma; "but where there is
 a wish to please, one ought to overlook, and one does overlook a great
 deal. Where a man does his best with only moderate powers, he will
 have the advantage over negligent superiority. There is such perfect
 good-temper and good-will in Mr. Elton as one cannot but value."
 
 "Yes," said Mr. John Knightley presently, with some slyness, "he seems
 to have a great deal of good-will towards you."
 
 "Me!" she replied with a smile of astonishment, "are you imagining me to
 be Mr. Elton's object?"
 
 "Such an imagination has crossed me, I own, Emma; and if it never
 occurred to you before, you may as well take it into consideration now."
 
 "Mr. Elton in love with me!--What an idea!"
 
 "I do not say it is so; but you will do well to consider whether it
 is so or not, and to regulate your behaviour accordingly. I think your
 manners to him encouraging. I speak as a friend, Emma. You had better
 look about you, and ascertain what you do, and what you mean to do."
 
 "I thank you; but I assure you you are quite mistaken. Mr. Elton and
 I are very good friends, and nothing more;" and she walked on, amusing
 herself in the consideration of the blunders which often arise from a
--**--**--
 quiet Mr. Elton, the subject was so completely past that any reviving
 question from her would have been awkward.
 
 Now, it so happened that in spite of Emma's resolution of never
 marrying, there was something in the name, in the idea of Mr.
 Frank Churchill, which always interested her. She had frequently
 thought--especially since his father's marriage with Miss Taylor--that
 if she _were_ to marry, he was the very person to suit her in age,
 character and condition. He seemed by this connexion between the
 families, quite to belong to her. She could not but suppose it to be
 a match that every body who knew them must think of. That Mr. and Mrs.
 Weston did think of it, she was very strongly persuaded; and though
 not meaning to be induced by him, or by any body else, to give up a
 situation which she believed more replete with good than any she could
 change it for, she had a great curiosity to see him, a decided intention
 of finding him pleasant, of being liked by him to a certain degree, and
 a sort of pleasure in the idea of their being coupled in their friends'
 imaginations.
 
 With such sensations, Mr. Elton's civilities were dreadfully ill-timed;
 but she had the comfort of appearing very polite, while feeling very
 cross--and of thinking that the rest of the visit could not possibly
 pass without bringing forward the same information again, or the
 substance of it, from the open-hearted Mr. Weston.--So it proved;--for
 when happily released from Mr. Elton, and seated by Mr. Weston,
 at dinner, he made use of the very first interval in the cares of
 hospitality, the very first leisure from the saddle of mutton, to say to
 her,
 
 "We want only two more to be just the right number. I should like to see
--**--**--
 CHAPTER XV
 
 
 Mr. Woodhouse was soon ready for his tea; and when he had drank his
 tea he was quite ready to go home; and it was as much as his three
 companions could do, to entertain away his notice of the lateness of
 the hour, before the other gentlemen appeared. Mr. Weston was chatty and
 convivial, and no friend to early separations of any sort; but at last
 the drawing-room party did receive an augmentation. Mr. Elton, in very
 good spirits, was one of the first to walk in. Mrs. Weston and Emma
 were sitting together on a sofa. He joined them immediately, and, with
 scarcely an invitation, seated himself between them.
 
 Emma, in good spirits too, from the amusement afforded her mind by
 the expectation of Mr. Frank Churchill, was willing to forget his late
 improprieties, and be as well satisfied with him as before, and on his
 making Harriet his very first subject, was ready to listen with most
 friendly smiles.
 
 He professed himself extremely anxious about her fair friend--her fair,
 lovely, amiable friend. "Did she know?--had she heard any thing about
 her, since their being at Randalls?--he felt much anxiety--he must
 confess that the nature of her complaint alarmed him considerably."
 And in this style he talked on for some time very properly, not much
 attending to any answer, but altogether sufficiently awake to the terror
 of a bad sore throat; and Emma was quite in charity with him.
 
 But at last there seemed a perverse turn; it seemed all at once as if he
 were more afraid of its being a bad sore throat on her account, than on
 Harriet's--more anxious that she should escape the infection, than
 that there should be no infection in the complaint. He began with great
 earnestness to entreat her to refrain from visiting the sick-chamber
--**--**--
 in her imagination; and fancying the road to be now just passable for
 adventurous people, but in a state that admitted no delay, she was eager
 to have it settled, that her father and Emma should remain at Randalls,
 while she and her husband set forward instantly through all the possible
 accumulations of drifted snow that might impede them.
 
 "You had better order the carriage directly, my love," said she; "I dare
 say we shall be able to get along, if we set off directly; and if we
 do come to any thing very bad, I can get out and walk. I am not at all
 afraid. I should not mind walking half the way. I could change my shoes,
 you know, the moment I got home; and it is not the sort of thing that
 gives me cold."
 
 "Indeed!" replied he. "Then, my dear Isabella, it is the most
 extraordinary sort of thing in the world, for in general every thing
 does give you cold. Walk home!--you are prettily shod for walking home,
 I dare say. It will be bad enough for the horses."
 
 Isabella turned to Mrs. Weston for her approbation of the plan. Mrs.
 Weston could only approve. Isabella then went to Emma; but Emma could
 not so entirely give up the hope of their being all able to get away;
 and they were still discussing the point, when Mr. Knightley, who had
 left the room immediately after his brother's first report of the snow,
 came back again, and told them that he had been out of doors to examine,
 and could answer for there not being the smallest difficulty in their
 getting home, whenever they liked it, either now or an hour hence. He
 had gone beyond the sweep--some way along the Highbury road--the snow
--**--**--
 all to confuse his intellects. He perfectly knew his own meaning; and
 having warmly protested against her suspicion as most injurious, and
 slightly touched upon his respect for Miss Smith as her friend,--but
 acknowledging his wonder that Miss Smith should be mentioned at all,--he
 resumed the subject of his own passion, and was very urgent for a
 favourable answer.
 
 As she thought less of his inebriety, she thought more of his
 inconstancy and presumption; and with fewer struggles for politeness,
 replied,
 
 "It is impossible for me to doubt any longer. You have made yourself
 too clear. Mr. Elton, my astonishment is much beyond any thing I can
 express. After such behaviour, as I have witnessed during the last
 month, to Miss Smith--such attentions as I have been in the daily
 habit of observing--to be addressing me in this manner--this is an
 unsteadiness of character, indeed, which I had not supposed possible!
 Believe me, sir, I am far, very far, from gratified in being the object
 of such professions."
 
 "Good Heaven!" cried Mr. Elton, "what can be the meaning of this?--Miss
 Smith!--I never thought of Miss Smith in the whole course of my
 existence--never paid her any attentions, but as your friend: never
 cared whether she were dead or alive, but as your friend. If she
 has fancied otherwise, her own wishes have misled her, and I am very
 sorry--extremely sorry--But, Miss Smith, indeed!--Oh! Miss Woodhouse!
 who can think of Miss Smith, when Miss Woodhouse is near! No, upon my
 honour, there is no unsteadiness of character. I have thought only of
 you. I protest against having paid the smallest attention to any one
 else. Every thing that I have said or done, for many weeks past, has
 been with the sole view of marking my adoration of yourself. You
--**--**--
 There she was welcomed, with the utmost delight, by her father, who
 had been trembling for the dangers of a solitary drive from Vicarage
 Lane--turning a corner which he could never bear to think of--and in
 strange hands--a mere common coachman--no James; and there it seemed as
 if her return only were wanted to make every thing go well: for Mr.
 John Knightley, ashamed of his ill-humour, was now all kindness and
 attention; and so particularly solicitous for the comfort of her
 father, as to seem--if not quite ready to join him in a basin of
 gruel--perfectly sensible of its being exceedingly wholesome; and the
 day was concluding in peace and comfort to all their little party,
 except herself.--But her mind had never been in such perturbation; and
 it needed a very strong effort to appear attentive and cheerful till the
 usual hour of separating allowed her the relief of quiet reflection.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XVI
 
 
 The hair was curled, and the maid sent away, and Emma sat down to think
 and be miserable.--It was a wretched business indeed!--Such an overthrow
 of every thing she had been wishing for!--Such a development of every
 thing most unwelcome!--Such a blow for Harriet!--that was the worst
 of all. Every part of it brought pain and humiliation, of some sort or
 other; but, compared with the evil to Harriet, all was light; and
 she would gladly have submitted to feel yet more mistaken--more in
 error--more disgraced by mis-judgment, than she actually was, could the
 effects of her blunders have been confined to herself.
 
 "If I had not persuaded Harriet into liking the man, I could have
 borne any thing. He might have doubled his presumption to me--but poor
 Harriet!"
 
 How she could have been so deceived!--He protested that he had never
 thought seriously of Harriet--never! She looked back as well as
--**--**--
 She stopt to blush and laugh at her own relapse, and then resumed a more
 serious, more dispiriting cogitation upon what had been, and might be,
 and must be. The distressing explanation she had to make to Harriet, and
 all that poor Harriet would be suffering, with the awkwardness of
 future meetings, the difficulties of continuing or discontinuing the
 acquaintance, of subduing feelings, concealing resentment, and avoiding
 eclat, were enough to occupy her in most unmirthful reflections some
 time longer, and she went to bed at last with nothing settled but the
 conviction of her having blundered most dreadfully.
 
 To youth and natural cheerfulness like Emma's, though under temporary
 gloom at night, the return of day will hardly fail to bring return of
 spirits. The youth and cheerfulness of morning are in happy analogy,
 and of powerful operation; and if the distress be not poignant enough
 to keep the eyes unclosed, they will be sure to open to sensations of
 softened pain and brighter hope.
 
 Emma got up on the morrow more disposed for comfort than she had gone
 to bed, more ready to see alleviations of the evil before her, and to
 depend on getting tolerably out of it.
 
 It was a great consolation that Mr. Elton should not be really in
 love with her, or so particularly amiable as to make it shocking to
 disappoint him--that Harriet's nature should not be of that superior
 sort in which the feelings are most acute and retentive--and that there
 could be no necessity for any body's knowing what had passed except the
 three principals, and especially for her father's being given a moment's
 uneasiness about it.
 
 These were very cheering thoughts; and the sight of a great deal of snow
 on the ground did her further service, for any thing was welcome that
--**--**--
 Woodhouse having, as usual, tried to persuade his daughter to stay
 behind with all her children, was obliged to see the whole party
 set off, and return to his lamentations over the destiny of poor
 Isabella;--which poor Isabella, passing her life with those she doated
 on, full of their merits, blind to their faults, and always innocently
 busy, might have been a model of right feminine happiness.
 
 The evening of the very day on which they went brought a note from Mr.
 Elton to Mr. Woodhouse, a long, civil, ceremonious note, to say, with
 Mr. Elton's best compliments, "that he was proposing to leave Highbury
 the following morning in his way to Bath; where, in compliance with
 the pressing entreaties of some friends, he had engaged to spend a few
 weeks, and very much regretted the impossibility he was under, from
 various circumstances of weather and business, of taking a personal
 leave of Mr. Woodhouse, of whose friendly civilities he should ever
 retain a grateful sense--and had Mr. Woodhouse any commands, should be
 happy to attend to them."
 
 Emma was most agreeably surprized.--Mr. Elton's absence just at this
 time was the very thing to be desired. She admired him for contriving
 it, though not able to give him much credit for the manner in which it
 was announced. Resentment could not have been more plainly spoken than
 in a civility to her father, from which she was so pointedly excluded.
 She had not even a share in his opening compliments.--Her name was not
 mentioned;--and there was so striking a change in all this, and such an
 ill-judged solemnity of leave-taking in his graceful acknowledgments, as
 she thought, at first, could not escape her father's suspicion.
 
 It did, however.--Her father was quite taken up with the surprize of so
 sudden a journey, and his fears that Mr. Elton might never get safely to
--**--**--
 Their being fixed, so absolutely fixed, in the same place, was bad for
 each, for all three. Not one of them had the power of removal, or of
 effecting any material change of society. They must encounter each
 other, and make the best of it.
 
 Harriet was farther unfortunate in the tone of her companions at Mrs.
 Goddard's; Mr. Elton being the adoration of all the teachers and great
 girls in the school; and it must be at Hartfield only that she could
 have any chance of hearing him spoken of with cooling moderation or
 repellent truth. Where the wound had been given, there must the cure be
 found if anywhere; and Emma felt that, till she saw her in the way of
 cure, there could be no true peace for herself.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XVIII
 
 
 Mr. Frank Churchill did not come. When the time proposed drew near, Mrs.
 Weston's fears were justified in the arrival of a letter of excuse. For
 the present, he could not be spared, to his "very great mortification
 and regret; but still he looked forward with the hope of coming to
 Randalls at no distant period."
 
 Mrs. Weston was exceedingly disappointed--much more disappointed, in
 fact, than her husband, though her dependence on seeing the young man
 had been so much more sober: but a sanguine temper, though for ever
 expecting more good than occurs, does not always pay for its hopes by
 any proportionate depression. It soon flies over the present failure,
 and begins to hope again. For half an hour Mr. Weston was surprized and
 sorry; but then he began to perceive that Frank's coming two or three
 months later would be a much better plan; better time of year;
 better weather; and that he would be able, without any doubt, to stay
 considerably longer with them than if he had come sooner.
--**--**--
 "It is not to be conceived that a man of three or four-and-twenty
 should not have liberty of mind or limb to that amount. He cannot want
 money--he cannot want leisure. We know, on the contrary, that he has so
 much of both, that he is glad to get rid of them at the idlest haunts in
 the kingdom. We hear of him for ever at some watering-place or other. A
 little while ago, he was at Weymouth. This proves that he can leave the
 Churchills."
 
 "Yes, sometimes he can."
 
 "And those times are whenever he thinks it worth his while; whenever
 there is any temptation of pleasure."
 
 "It is very unfair to judge of any body's conduct, without an intimate
 knowledge of their situation. Nobody, who has not been in the interior
 of a family, can say what the difficulties of any individual of that
 family may be. We ought to be acquainted with Enscombe, and with Mrs.
 Churchill's temper, before we pretend to decide upon what her nephew
 can do. He may, at times, be able to do a great deal more than he can at
 others."
 
 "There is one thing, Emma, which a man can always do, if he chuses, and
 that is, his duty; not by manoeuvring and finessing, but by vigour and
 resolution. It is Frank Churchill's duty to pay this attention to his
 father. He knows it to be so, by his promises and messages; but if he
 wished to do it, it might be done. A man who felt rightly would say at
 once, simply and resolutely, to Mrs. Churchill--'Every sacrifice of
 mere pleasure you will always find me ready to make to your convenience;
 but I must go and see my father immediately. I know he would be hurt by
 my failing in such a mark of respect to him on the present occasion.
--**--**--
 of other people: nothing really amiable about him."
 
 "You seem determined to think ill of him."
 
 "Me!--not at all," replied Mr. Knightley, rather displeased; "I do not
 want to think ill of him. I should be as ready to acknowledge his merits
 as any other man; but I hear of none, except what are merely personal;
 that he is well-grown and good-looking, with smooth, plausible manners."
 
 "Well, if he have nothing else to recommend him, he will be a treasure
 at Highbury. We do not often look upon fine young men, well-bred and
 agreeable. We must not be nice and ask for all the virtues into the
 bargain. Cannot you imagine, Mr. Knightley, what a _sensation_ his
 coming will produce? There will be but one subject throughout the
 parishes of Donwell and Highbury; but one interest--one object of
 curiosity; it will be all Mr. Frank Churchill; we shall think and speak
 of nobody else."
 
 "You will excuse my being so much over-powered. If I find him
 conversable, I shall be glad of his acquaintance; but if he is only a
 chattering coxcomb, he will not occupy much of my time or thoughts."
 
 "My idea of him is, that he can adapt his conversation to the taste of
 every body, and has the power as well as the wish of being universally
 agreeable. To you, he will talk of farming; to me, of drawing or music;
 and so on to every body, having that general information on all subjects
 which will enable him to follow the lead, or take the lead, just as
 propriety may require, and to speak extremely well on each; that is my
 idea of him."
 
 "And mine," said Mr. Knightley warmly, "is, that if he turn out any
 thing like it, he will be the most insufferable fellow breathing! What!
--**--**--
 letter over again, and settle how long he had been gone, and how much
 he was engaged in company, and what a favourite he was wherever he went,
 and how full the Master of the Ceremonies' ball had been; and she went
 through it very well, with all the interest and all the commendation
 that could be requisite, and always putting forward to prevent Harriet's
 being obliged to say a word.
 
 This she had been prepared for when she entered the house; but meant,
 having once talked him handsomely over, to be no farther incommoded by
 any troublesome topic, and to wander at large amongst all the Mistresses
 and Misses of Highbury, and their card-parties. She had not been
 prepared to have Jane Fairfax succeed Mr. Elton; but he was actually
 hurried off by Miss Bates, she jumped away from him at last abruptly to
 the Coles, to usher in a letter from her niece.
 
 "Oh! yes--Mr. Elton, I understand--certainly as to dancing--Mrs. Cole
 was telling me that dancing at the rooms at Bath was--Mrs. Cole was so
 kind as to sit some time with us, talking of Jane; for as soon as
 she came in, she began inquiring after her, Jane is so very great a
 favourite there. Whenever she is with us, Mrs. Cole does not know how to
 shew her kindness enough; and I must say that Jane deserves it as much
 as any body can. And so she began inquiring after her directly, saying,
 'I know you cannot have heard from Jane lately, because it is not her
 time for writing;' and when I immediately said, 'But indeed we have, we
 had a letter this very morning,' I do not know that I ever saw any body
 more surprized. 'Have you, upon your honour?' said she; 'well, that is
--**--**--
 and Miss Jane Bates, had had its day of fame and pleasure, hope
 and interest; but nothing now remained of it, save the melancholy
 remembrance of him dying in action abroad--of his widow sinking under
 consumption and grief soon afterwards--and this girl.
 
 By birth she belonged to Highbury: and when at three years old, on
 losing her mother, she became the property, the charge, the consolation,
 the fondling of her grandmother and aunt, there had seemed every
 probability of her being permanently fixed there; of her being taught
 only what very limited means could command, and growing up with no
 advantages of connexion or improvement, to be engrafted on what
 nature had given her in a pleasing person, good understanding, and
 warm-hearted, well-meaning relations.
 
 But the compassionate feelings of a friend of her father gave a change
 to her destiny. This was Colonel Campbell, who had very highly regarded
 Fairfax, as an excellent officer and most deserving young man; and
 farther, had been indebted to him for such attentions, during a severe
 camp-fever, as he believed had saved his life. These were claims which
 he did not learn to overlook, though some years passed away from the
 death of poor Fairfax, before his own return to England put any thing in
 his power. When he did return, he sought out the child and took notice
 of her. He was a married man, with only one living child, a girl, about
 Jane's age: and Jane became their guest, paying them long visits and
 growing a favourite with all; and before she was nine years old, his
 daughter's great fondness for her, and his own wish of being a real
 friend, united to produce an offer from Colonel Campbell of undertaking
 the whole charge of her education. It was accepted; and from that period
--**--**--
 only, "Miss Fairfax is reserved."
 
 "I always told you she was--a little; but you will soon overcome all
 that part of her reserve which ought to be overcome, all that has its
 foundation in diffidence. What arises from discretion must be honoured."
 
 "You think her diffident. I do not see it."
 
 "My dear Emma," said he, moving from his chair into one close by her,
 "you are not going to tell me, I hope, that you had not a pleasant
 evening."
 
 "Oh! no; I was pleased with my own perseverance in asking questions; and
 amused to think how little information I obtained."
 
 "I am disappointed," was his only answer.
 
 "I hope every body had a pleasant evening," said Mr. Woodhouse, in his
 quiet way. "I had. Once, I felt the fire rather too much; but then I
 moved back my chair a little, a very little, and it did not disturb me.
 Miss Bates was very chatty and good-humoured, as she always is, though
 she speaks rather too quick. However, she is very agreeable, and Mrs.
 Bates too, in a different way. I like old friends; and Miss Jane
 Fairfax is a very pretty sort of young lady, a very pretty and a
 very well-behaved young lady indeed. She must have found the evening
 agreeable, Mr. Knightley, because she had Emma."
 
 "True, sir; and Emma, because she had Miss Fairfax."
 
 Emma saw his anxiety, and wishing to appease it, at least for the
 present, said, and with a sincerity which no one could question--
 
 "She is a sort of elegant creature that one cannot keep one's eyes from.
 I am always watching her to admire; and I do pity her from my heart."
 
 Mr. Knightley looked as if he were more gratified than he cared to
 express; and before he could make any reply, Mr. Woodhouse, whose
--**--**--
 my dear,' said I--well, and just then came the note. A Miss
 Hawkins--that's all I know. A Miss Hawkins of Bath. But, Mr. Knightley,
 how could you possibly have heard it? for the very moment Mr. Cole told
 Mrs. Cole of it, she sat down and wrote to me. A Miss Hawkins--"
 
 "I was with Mr. Cole on business an hour and a half ago. He had just
 read Elton's letter as I was shewn in, and handed it to me directly."
 
 "Well! that is quite--I suppose there never was a piece of news more
 generally interesting. My dear sir, you really are too bountiful. My
 mother desires her very best compliments and regards, and a thousand
 thanks, and says you really quite oppress her."
 
 "We consider our Hartfield pork," replied Mr. Woodhouse--"indeed it
 certainly is, so very superior to all other pork, that Emma and I cannot
 have a greater pleasure than--"
 
 "Oh! my dear sir, as my mother says, our friends are only too good
 to us. If ever there were people who, without having great wealth
 themselves, had every thing they could wish for, I am sure it is us.
 We may well say that 'our lot is cast in a goodly heritage.' Well, Mr.
 Knightley, and so you actually saw the letter; well--"
 
 "It was short--merely to announce--but cheerful, exulting, of course."--
 Here was a sly glance at Emma. "He had been so fortunate as to--I forget
 the precise words--one has no business to remember them. The information
 was, as you state, that he was going to be married to a Miss Hawkins. By
 his style, I should imagine it just settled."
 
 "Mr. Elton going to be married!" said Emma, as soon as she could speak.
 "He will have every body's wishes for his happiness."
--**--**--
 hardly knowing herself whether to rejoice or be angry, ashamed or only
 amused, at such a state of mind in poor Harriet--such a conclusion of
 Mr. Elton's importance with her!
 
 Mr. Elton's rights, however, gradually revived. Though she did not feel
 the first intelligence as she might have done the day before, or an hour
 before, its interest soon increased; and before their first conversation
 was over, she had talked herself into all the sensations of curiosity,
 wonder and regret, pain and pleasure, as to this fortunate Miss Hawkins,
 which could conduce to place the Martins under proper subordination in
 her fancy.
 
 Emma learned to be rather glad that there had been such a meeting. It
 had been serviceable in deadening the first shock, without retaining any
 influence to alarm. As Harriet now lived, the Martins could not get
 at her, without seeking her, where hitherto they had wanted either the
 courage or the condescension to seek her; for since her refusal of the
 brother, the sisters never had been at Mrs. Goddard's; and a twelvemonth
 might pass without their being thrown together again, with any
 necessity, or even any power of speech.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER IV
 
 
 Human nature is so well disposed towards those who are in interesting
 situations, that a young person, who either marries or dies, is sure of
 being kindly spoken of.
 
 A week had not passed since Miss Hawkins's name was first mentioned in
 Highbury, before she was, by some means or other, discovered to have
 every recommendation of person and mind; to be handsome, elegant, highly
 accomplished, and perfectly amiable: and when Mr. Elton himself arrived
 to triumph in his happy prospects, and circulate the fame of her merits,
 there was very little more for him to do, than to tell her Christian
 name, and say whose music she principally played.
--**--**--
 the Martins in a higher rank of life. They were so deserving, that a
 _little_ higher should have been enough: but as it was, how could she
 have done otherwise?--Impossible!--She could not repent. They must be
 separated; but there was a great deal of pain in the process--so much
 to herself at this time, that she soon felt the necessity of a little
 consolation, and resolved on going home by way of Randalls to
 procure it. Her mind was quite sick of Mr. Elton and the Martins. The
 refreshment of Randalls was absolutely necessary.
 
 It was a good scheme; but on driving to the door they heard that neither
 "master nor mistress was at home;" they had both been out some time; the
 man believed they were gone to Hartfield.
 
 "This is too bad," cried Emma, as they turned away. "And now we shall
 just miss them; too provoking!--I do not know when I have been so
 disappointed." And she leaned back in the corner, to indulge her
 murmurs, or to reason them away; probably a little of both--such being
 the commonest process of a not ill-disposed mind. Presently the carriage
 stopt; she looked up; it was stopt by Mr. and Mrs. Weston, who were
 standing to speak to her. There was instant pleasure in the sight of
 them, and still greater pleasure was conveyed in sound--for Mr. Weston
 immediately accosted her with,
 
 "How d'ye do?--how d'ye do?--We have been sitting with your father--glad
 to see him so well. Frank comes to-morrow--I had a letter this
 morning--we see him to-morrow by dinner-time to a certainty--he is at
 Oxford to-day, and he comes for a whole fortnight; I knew it would be
 so. If he had come at Christmas he could not have staid three days; I
 was always glad he did not come at Christmas; now we are going to have
--**--**--
 
 The morning of the interesting day arrived, and Mrs. Weston's faithful
 pupil did not forget either at ten, or eleven, or twelve o'clock, that
 she was to think of her at four.
 
 "My dear, dear anxious friend,"--said she, in mental soliloquy, while
 walking downstairs from her own room, "always overcareful for every
 body's comfort but your own; I see you now in all your little fidgets,
 going again and again into his room, to be sure that all is right."
 The clock struck twelve as she passed through the hall. "'Tis twelve;
 I shall not forget to think of you four hours hence; and by this
 time to-morrow, perhaps, or a little later, I may be thinking of the
 possibility of their all calling here. I am sure they will bring him
 soon."
 
 She opened the parlour door, and saw two gentlemen sitting with her
 father--Mr. Weston and his son. They had been arrived only a few
 minutes, and Mr. Weston had scarcely finished his explanation of Frank's
 being a day before his time, and her father was yet in the midst of his
 very civil welcome and congratulations, when she appeared, to have her
 share of surprize, introduction, and pleasure.
 
 The Frank Churchill so long talked of, so high in interest, was actually
 before her--he was presented to her, and she did not think too much had
 been said in his praise; he was a _very_ good looking young man; height,
 air, address, all were unexceptionable, and his countenance had a great
 deal of the spirit and liveliness of his father's; he looked quick and
 sensible. She felt immediately that she should like him; and there was
 a well-bred ease of manner, and a readiness to talk, which convinced her
 that he came intending to be acquainted with her, and that acquainted
--**--**--
 He agreed to it, but with so quiet a "Yes," as inclined her almost to
 doubt his real concurrence; and yet there must be a very distinct sort
 of elegance for the fashionable world, if Jane Fairfax could be thought
 only ordinarily gifted with it.
 
 "If you were never particularly struck by her manners before," said she,
 "I think you will to-day. You will see her to advantage; see her and
 hear her--no, I am afraid you will not hear her at all, for she has an
 aunt who never holds her tongue."
 
 "You are acquainted with Miss Jane Fairfax, sir, are you?" said Mr.
 Woodhouse, always the last to make his way in conversation; "then give
 me leave to assure you that you will find her a very agreeable young
 lady. She is staying here on a visit to her grandmama and aunt, very
 worthy people; I have known them all my life. They will be extremely
 glad to see you, I am sure; and one of my servants shall go with you to
 shew you the way."
 
 "My dear sir, upon no account in the world; my father can direct me."
 
 "But your father is not going so far; he is only going to the Crown,
 quite on the other side of the street, and there are a great many
 houses; you might be very much at a loss, and it is a very dirty walk,
 unless you keep on the footpath; but my coachman can tell you where you
 had best cross the street."
 
 Mr. Frank Churchill still declined it, looking as serious as he could,
 and his father gave his hearty support by calling out, "My good friend,
 this is quite unnecessary; Frank knows a puddle of water when he sees
 it, and as to Mrs. Bates's, he may get there from the Crown in a hop,
--**--**--
 obliged to you for your preparatory hint. If the talking aunt had taken
 me quite by surprize, it must have been the death of me. As it was, I
 was only betrayed into paying a most unreasonable visit. Ten minutes
 would have been all that was necessary, perhaps all that was proper; and
 I had told my father I should certainly be at home before him--but there
 was no getting away, no pause; and, to my utter astonishment, I found,
 when he (finding me nowhere else) joined me there at last, that I had
 been actually sitting with them very nearly three-quarters of an hour.
 The good lady had not given me the possibility of escape before."
 
 "And how did you think Miss Fairfax looking?"
 
 "Ill, very ill--that is, if a young lady can ever be allowed to look
 ill. But the expression is hardly admissible, Mrs. Weston, is it? Ladies
 can never look ill. And, seriously, Miss Fairfax is naturally so
 pale, as almost always to give the appearance of ill health.--A most
 deplorable want of complexion."
 
 Emma would not agree to this, and began a warm defence of Miss Fairfax's
 complexion. "It was certainly never brilliant, but she would not
 allow it to have a sickly hue in general; and there was a softness and
 delicacy in her skin which gave peculiar elegance to the character of
 her face." He listened with all due deference; acknowledged that he had
 heard many people say the same--but yet he must confess, that to him
 nothing could make amends for the want of the fine glow of health. Where
 features were indifferent, a fine complexion gave beauty to them all;
 and where they were good, the effect was--fortunately he need not
 attempt to describe what the effect was.
 
 "Well," said Emma, "there is no disputing about taste.--At least you
--**--**--
 There was certainly no harm in his travelling sixteen miles twice over
 on such an errand; but there was an air of foppery and nonsense in it
 which she could not approve. It did not accord with the rationality of
 plan, the moderation in expense, or even the unselfish warmth of heart,
 which she had believed herself to discern in him yesterday. Vanity,
 extravagance, love of change, restlessness of temper, which must be
 doing something, good or bad; heedlessness as to the pleasure of his
 father and Mrs. Weston, indifferent as to how his conduct might appear
 in general; he became liable to all these charges. His father only
 called him a coxcomb, and thought it a very good story; but that Mrs.
 Weston did not like it, was clear enough, by her passing it over as
 quickly as possible, and making no other comment than that "all young
 people would have their little whims."
 
 With the exception of this little blot, Emma found that his visit
 hitherto had given her friend only good ideas of him. Mrs. Weston
 was very ready to say how attentive and pleasant a companion he made
 himself--how much she saw to like in his disposition altogether. He
 appeared to have a very open temper--certainly a very cheerful and
 lively one; she could observe nothing wrong in his notions, a great deal
 decidedly right; he spoke of his uncle with warm regard, was fond of
 talking of him--said he would be the best man in the world if he were
 left to himself; and though there was no being attached to the aunt, he
 acknowledged her kindness with gratitude, and seemed to mean always to
 speak of her with respect. This was all very promising; and, but for
 such an unfortunate fancy for having his hair cut, there was nothing to
--**--**--
 you for reminding me. I should be extremely sorry to be giving them any
 pain. I know what worthy people they are. Perry tells me that Mr. Cole
 never touches malt liquor. You would not think it to look at him, but
 he is bilious--Mr. Cole is very bilious. No, I would not be the means
 of giving them any pain. My dear Emma, we must consider this. I am sure,
 rather than run the risk of hurting Mr. and Mrs. Cole, you would stay a
 little longer than you might wish. You will not regard being tired. You
 will be perfectly safe, you know, among your friends."
 
 "Oh yes, papa. I have no fears at all for myself; and I should have no
 scruples of staying as late as Mrs. Weston, but on your account. I am
 only afraid of your sitting up for me. I am not afraid of your not being
 exceedingly comfortable with Mrs. Goddard. She loves piquet, you
 know; but when she is gone home, I am afraid you will be sitting up by
 yourself, instead of going to bed at your usual time--and the idea of
 that would entirely destroy my comfort. You must promise me not to sit
 up."
 
 He did, on the condition of some promises on her side: such as that,
 if she came home cold, she would be sure to warm herself thoroughly; if
 hungry, that she would take something to eat; that her own maid should
 sit up for her; and that Serle and the butler should see that every
 thing were safe in the house, as usual.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER VIII
 
 
 Frank Churchill came back again; and if he kept his father's dinner
 waiting, it was not known at Hartfield; for Mrs. Weston was too anxious
 for his being a favourite with Mr. Woodhouse, to betray any imperfection
--**--**--
 should be the tribute of warm female friendship. And now I can see it in
 no other light than as an offering of love."
 
 There was no occasion to press the matter farther. The conviction seemed
 real; he looked as if he felt it. She said no more, other subjects
 took their turn; and the rest of the dinner passed away; the dessert
 succeeded, the children came in, and were talked to and admired amid the
 usual rate of conversation; a few clever things said, a few downright
 silly, but by much the larger proportion neither the one nor the
 other--nothing worse than everyday remarks, dull repetitions, old news,
 and heavy jokes.
 
 The ladies had not been long in the drawing-room, before the other
 ladies, in their different divisions, arrived. Emma watched the entree
 of her own particular little friend; and if she could not exult in her
 dignity and grace, she could not only love the blooming sweetness and
 the artless manner, but could most heartily rejoice in that light,
 cheerful, unsentimental disposition which allowed her so many
 alleviations of pleasure, in the midst of the pangs of disappointed
 affection. There she sat--and who would have guessed how many tears she
 had been lately shedding? To be in company, nicely dressed herself and
 seeing others nicely dressed, to sit and smile and look pretty, and say
 nothing, was enough for the happiness of the present hour. Jane Fairfax
 did look and move superior; but Emma suspected she might have been
 glad to change feelings with Harriet, very glad to have purchased the
 mortification of having loved--yes, of having loved even Mr. Elton in
 vain--by the surrender of all the dangerous pleasure of knowing herself
 beloved by the husband of her friend.
 
 In so large a party it was not necessary that Emma should approach her.
--**--**--
 
 "Very well; and if he had intended to give her one, he would have told
 her so."
 
 "There might be scruples of delicacy, my dear Emma. I have a very strong
 notion that it comes from him. I am sure he was particularly silent when
 Mrs. Cole told us of it at dinner."
 
 "You take up an idea, Mrs. Weston, and run away with it; as you have
 many a time reproached me with doing. I see no sign of attachment--I
 believe nothing of the pianoforte--and proof only shall convince me that
 Mr. Knightley has any thought of marrying Jane Fairfax."
 
 They combated the point some time longer in the same way; Emma rather
 gaining ground over the mind of her friend; for Mrs. Weston was the most
 used of the two to yield; till a little bustle in the room shewed them
 that tea was over, and the instrument in preparation;--and at the same
 moment Mr. Cole approaching to entreat Miss Woodhouse would do them the
 honour of trying it. Frank Churchill, of whom, in the eagerness of her
 conversation with Mrs. Weston, she had been seeing nothing, except that
 he had found a seat by Miss Fairfax, followed Mr. Cole, to add his very
 pressing entreaties; and as, in every respect, it suited Emma best to
 lead, she gave a very proper compliance.
 
 She knew the limitations of her own powers too well to attempt more than
 she could perform with credit; she wanted neither taste nor spirit in
 the little things which are generally acceptable, and could accompany
 her own voice well. One accompaniment to her song took her agreeably by
 surprize--a second, slightly but correctly taken by Frank Churchill. Her
 pardon was duly begged at the close of the song, and every thing usual
 followed. He was accused of having a delightful voice, and a perfect
--**--**--
 vigorously an hour and a half.
 
 She was then interrupted by Harriet's coming in; and if Harriet's praise
 could have satisfied her, she might soon have been comforted.
 
 "Oh! if I could but play as well as you and Miss Fairfax!"
 
 "Don't class us together, Harriet. My playing is no more like her's,
 than a lamp is like sunshine."
 
 "Oh! dear--I think you play the best of the two. I think you play quite
 as well as she does. I am sure I had much rather hear you. Every body
 last night said how well you played."
 
 "Those who knew any thing about it, must have felt the difference. The
 truth is, Harriet, that my playing is just good enough to be praised,
 but Jane Fairfax's is much beyond it."
 
 "Well, I always shall think that you play quite as well as she does, or
 that if there is any difference nobody would ever find it out. Mr. Cole
 said how much taste you had; and Mr. Frank Churchill talked a great deal
 about your taste, and that he valued taste much more than execution."
 
 "Ah! but Jane Fairfax has them both, Harriet."
 
 "Are you sure? I saw she had execution, but I did not know she had any
 taste. Nobody talked about it. And I hate Italian singing.--There is no
 understanding a word of it. Besides, if she does play so very well, you
 know, it is no more than she is obliged to do, because she will have to
 teach. The Coxes were wondering last night whether she would get into
 any great family. How did you think the Coxes looked?"
 
 "Just as they always do--very vulgar."
 
 "They told me something," said Harriet rather hesitatingly; "but it is
 nothing of any consequence."
 
 Emma was obliged to ask what they had told her, though fearful of its
--**--**--
 "How do you do, Mrs. Ford? I beg your pardon. I did not see you before.
 I hear you have a charming collection of new ribbons from town. Jane
 came back delighted yesterday. Thank ye, the gloves do very well--only a
 little too large about the wrist; but Jane is taking them in."
 
 "What was I talking of?" said she, beginning again when they were all in
 the street.
 
 Emma wondered on what, of all the medley, she would fix.
 
 "I declare I cannot recollect what I was talking of.--Oh! my mother's
 spectacles. So very obliging of Mr. Frank Churchill! 'Oh!' said he,
 'I do think I can fasten the rivet; I like a job of this kind
 excessively.'--Which you know shewed him to be so very.... Indeed I must
 say that, much as I had heard of him before and much as I had expected,
 he very far exceeds any thing.... I do congratulate you, Mrs. Weston,
 most warmly. He seems every thing the fondest parent could....
 'Oh!' said he, 'I can fasten the rivet. I like a job of that sort
 excessively.' I never shall forget his manner. And when I brought out
 the baked apples from the closet, and hoped our friends would be so very
 obliging as to take some, 'Oh!' said he directly, 'there is nothing
 in the way of fruit half so good, and these are the finest-looking
 home-baked apples I ever saw in my life.' That, you know, was so
 very.... And I am sure, by his manner, it was no compliment. Indeed they
 are very delightful apples, and Mrs. Wallis does them full justice--only
 we do not have them baked more than twice, and Mr. Woodhouse made us
 promise to have them done three times--but Miss Woodhouse will be so
 good as not to mention it. The apples themselves are the very finest
--**--**--
 discrimination, was pronounced to be altogether of the highest promise.
 
 "Whoever Colonel Campbell might employ," said Frank Churchill, with a
 smile at Emma, "the person has not chosen ill. I heard a good deal of
 Colonel Campbell's taste at Weymouth; and the softness of the upper
 notes I am sure is exactly what he and _all_ _that_ _party_ would
 particularly prize. I dare say, Miss Fairfax, that he either gave his
 friend very minute directions, or wrote to Broadwood himself. Do not you
 think so?"
 
 Jane did not look round. She was not obliged to hear. Mrs. Weston had
 been speaking to her at the same moment.
 
 "It is not fair," said Emma, in a whisper; "mine was a random guess. Do
 not distress her."
 
 He shook his head with a smile, and looked as if he had very little
 doubt and very little mercy. Soon afterwards he began again,
 
 "How much your friends in Ireland must be enjoying your pleasure on this
 occasion, Miss Fairfax. I dare say they often think of you, and wonder
 which will be the day, the precise day of the instrument's coming to
 hand. Do you imagine Colonel Campbell knows the business to be going
 forward just at this time?--Do you imagine it to be the consequence
 of an immediate commission from him, or that he may have sent only
 a general direction, an order indefinite as to time, to depend upon
 contingencies and conveniences?"
 
 He paused. She could not but hear; she could not avoid answering,
 
 "Till I have a letter from Colonel Campbell," said she, in a voice of
 forced calmness, "I can imagine nothing with any confidence. It must be
 all conjecture."
 
 "Conjecture--aye, sometimes one conjectures right, and sometimes one
 conjectures wrong. I wish I could conjecture how soon I shall make this
--**--**--
 are a new set of Irish melodies. That, from such a quarter, one might
 expect. This was all sent with the instrument. Very thoughtful of
 Colonel Campbell, was not it?--He knew Miss Fairfax could have no music
 here. I honour that part of the attention particularly; it shews it to
 have been so thoroughly from the heart. Nothing hastily done; nothing
 incomplete. True affection only could have prompted it."
 
 Emma wished he would be less pointed, yet could not help being amused;
 and when on glancing her eye towards Jane Fairfax she caught the remains
 of a smile, when she saw that with all the deep blush of consciousness,
 there had been a smile of secret delight, she had less scruple in the
 amusement, and much less compunction with respect to her.--This
 amiable, upright, perfect Jane Fairfax was apparently cherishing very
 reprehensible feelings.
 
 He brought all the music to her, and they looked it over together.--Emma
 took the opportunity of whispering,
 
 "You speak too plain. She must understand you."
 
 "I hope she does. I would have her understand me. I am not in the least
 ashamed of my meaning."
 
 "But really, I am half ashamed, and wish I had never taken up the idea."
 
 "I am very glad you did, and that you communicated it to me. I have now
 a key to all her odd looks and ways. Leave shame to her. If she does
 wrong, she ought to feel it."
 
 "She is not entirely without it, I think."
 
 "I do not see much sign of it. She is playing _Robin_ _Adair_ at this
 moment--_his_ favourite."
 
 Shortly afterwards Miss Bates, passing near the window, descried Mr.
 Knightley on horse-back not far off.
 
 "Mr. Knightley I declare!--I must speak to him if possible, just to
 thank him. I will not open the window here; it would give you all cold;
--**--**--
 "We were too magnificent," said he. "We allowed unnecessary room. Ten
 couple may stand here very well."
 
 Emma demurred. "It would be a crowd--a sad crowd; and what could be
 worse than dancing without space to turn in?"
 
 "Very true," he gravely replied; "it was very bad." But still he went on
 measuring, and still he ended with,
 
 "I think there will be very tolerable room for ten couple."
 
 "No, no," said she, "you are quite unreasonable. It would be dreadful
 to be standing so close! Nothing can be farther from pleasure than to be
 dancing in a crowd--and a crowd in a little room!"
 
 "There is no denying it," he replied. "I agree with you exactly. A crowd
 in a little room--Miss Woodhouse, you have the art of giving pictures
 in a few words. Exquisite, quite exquisite!--Still, however, having
 proceeded so far, one is unwilling to give the matter up. It would be
 a disappointment to my father--and altogether--I do not know that--I am
 rather of opinion that ten couple might stand here very well."
 
 Emma perceived that the nature of his gallantry was a little
 self-willed, and that he would rather oppose than lose the pleasure of
 dancing with her; but she took the compliment, and forgave the rest.
 Had she intended ever to _marry_ him, it might have been worth while to
 pause and consider, and try to understand the value of his preference,
 and the character of his temper; but for all the purposes of their
 acquaintance, he was quite amiable enough.
 
 Before the middle of the next day, he was at Hartfield; and he entered
 the room with such an agreeable smile as certified the continuance of
 the scheme. It soon appeared that he came to announce an improvement.
 
 "Well, Miss Woodhouse," he almost immediately began, "your inclination
--**--**--
 "There, papa!--Now you must be satisfied--Our own dear Mrs. Weston, who
 is carefulness itself. Do not you remember what Mr. Perry said, so many
 years ago, when I had the measles? 'If _Miss_ _Taylor_ undertakes to
 wrap Miss Emma up, you need not have any fears, sir.' How often have I
 heard you speak of it as such a compliment to her!"
 
 "Aye, very true. Mr. Perry did say so. I shall never forget it. Poor
 little Emma! You were very bad with the measles; that is, you would have
 been very bad, but for Perry's great attention. He came four times a day
 for a week. He said, from the first, it was a very good sort--which
 was our great comfort; but the measles are a dreadful complaint. I hope
 whenever poor Isabella's little ones have the measles, she will send for
 Perry."
 
 "My father and Mrs. Weston are at the Crown at this moment," said Frank
 Churchill, "examining the capabilities of the house. I left them there
 and came on to Hartfield, impatient for your opinion, and hoping you
 might be persuaded to join them and give your advice on the spot. I was
 desired to say so from both. It would be the greatest pleasure to
 them, if you could allow me to attend you there. They can do nothing
 satisfactorily without you."
 
 Emma was most happy to be called to such a council; and her father,
 engaging to think it all over while she was gone, the two young people
 set off together without delay for the Crown. There were Mr. and Mrs.
 Weston; delighted to see her and receive her approbation, very busy and
 very happy in their different way; she, in some little distress; and he,
 finding every thing perfect.
 
 "Emma," said she, "this paper is worse than I expected. Look! in places
--**--**--
 
 "Ah!--(shaking his head)--the uncertainty of when I may be able to
 return!--I shall try for it with a zeal!--It will be the object of
 all my thoughts and cares!--and if my uncle and aunt go to town this
 spring--but I am afraid--they did not stir last spring--I am afraid it
 is a custom gone for ever."
 
 "Our poor ball must be quite given up."
 
 "Ah! that ball!--why did we wait for any thing?--why not seize the
 pleasure at once?--How often is happiness destroyed by preparation,
 foolish preparation!--You told us it would be so.--Oh! Miss Woodhouse,
 why are you always so right?"
 
 "Indeed, I am very sorry to be right in this instance. I would much
 rather have been merry than wise."
 
 "If I can come again, we are still to have our ball. My father depends
 on it. Do not forget your engagement."
 
 Emma looked graciously.
 
 "Such a fortnight as it has been!" he continued; "every day more
 precious and more delightful than the day before!--every day making
 me less fit to bear any other place. Happy those, who can remain at
 Highbury!"
 
 "As you do us such ample justice now," said Emma, laughing, "I will
 venture to ask, whether you did not come a little doubtfully at first?
 Do not we rather surpass your expectations? I am sure we do. I am sure
 you did not much expect to like us. You would not have been so long in
 coming, if you had had a pleasant idea of Highbury."
 
 He laughed rather consciously; and though denying the sentiment, Emma
 was convinced that it had been so.
 
 "And you must be off this very morning?"
 
 "Yes; my father is to join me here: we shall walk back together, and I
 must be off immediately. I am almost afraid that every moment will bring
--**--**--
 charity to impute some of her unbecoming indifference to the languor of
 ill-health.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XIII
 
 
 Emma continued to entertain no doubt of her being in love. Her ideas
 only varied as to the how much. At first, she thought it was a good
 deal; and afterwards, but little. She had great pleasure in hearing
 Frank Churchill talked of; and, for his sake, greater pleasure than ever
 in seeing Mr. and Mrs. Weston; she was very often thinking of him, and
 quite impatient for a letter, that she might know how he was, how were
 his spirits, how was his aunt, and what was the chance of his coming to
 Randalls again this spring. But, on the other hand, she could not admit
 herself to be unhappy, nor, after the first morning, to be less disposed
 for employment than usual; she was still busy and cheerful; and,
 pleasing as he was, she could yet imagine him to have faults; and
 farther, though thinking of him so much, and, as she sat drawing or
 working, forming a thousand amusing schemes for the progress and close
 of their attachment, fancying interesting dialogues, and inventing
 elegant letters; the conclusion of every imaginary declaration on his
 side was that she _refused_ _him_. Their affection was always to subside
 into friendship. Every thing tender and charming was to mark their
 parting; but still they were to part. When she became sensible of this,
 it struck her that she could not be very much in love; for in spite of
 her previous and fixed determination never to quit her father, never
 to marry, a strong attachment certainly must produce more of a struggle
 than she could foresee in her own feelings.
 
 "I do not find myself making any use of the word _sacrifice_," said
 she.--"In not one of all my clever replies, my delicate negatives, is
--**--**--
 of heart, with an affectionate, open manner, will beat all the
 clearness of head in the world, for attraction, I am sure it will. It
 is tenderness of heart which makes my dear father so generally
 beloved--which gives Isabella all her popularity.--I have it not--but
 I know how to prize and respect it.--Harriet is my superior in all the
 charm and all the felicity it gives. Dear Harriet!--I would not change
 you for the clearest-headed, longest-sighted, best-judging female
 breathing. Oh! the coldness of a Jane Fairfax!--Harriet is worth a
 hundred such--And for a wife--a sensible man's wife--it is invaluable. I
 mention no names; but happy the man who changes Emma for Harriet!"
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XIV
 
 
 Mrs. Elton was first seen at church: but though devotion might be
 interrupted, curiosity could not be satisfied by a bride in a pew, and
 it must be left for the visits in form which were then to be paid, to
 settle whether she were very pretty indeed, or only rather pretty, or
 not pretty at all.
 
 Emma had feelings, less of curiosity than of pride or propriety, to make
 her resolve on not being the last to pay her respects; and she made a
 point of Harriet's going with her, that the worst of the business might
 be gone through as soon as possible.
 
 She could not enter the house again, could not be in the same room to
 which she had with such vain artifice retreated three months ago, to
 lace up her boot, without _recollecting_. A thousand vexatious thoughts
 would recur. Compliments, charades, and horrible blunders; and it was
 not to be supposed that poor Harriet should not be recollecting too; but
 she behaved very well, and was only rather pale and silent. The visit
 was of course short; and there was so much embarrassment and occupation
--**--**--
 perfectly understand your situation, however, Miss Woodhouse--(looking
 towards Mr. Woodhouse), Your father's state of health must be a great
 drawback. Why does not he try Bath?--Indeed he should. Let me recommend
 Bath to you. I assure you I have no doubt of its doing Mr. Woodhouse
 good."
 
 "My father tried it more than once, formerly; but without receiving any
 benefit; and Mr. Perry, whose name, I dare say, is not unknown to you,
 does not conceive it would be at all more likely to be useful now."
 
 "Ah! that's a great pity; for I assure you, Miss Woodhouse, where the
 waters do agree, it is quite wonderful the relief they give. In my Bath
 life, I have seen such instances of it! And it is so cheerful a place,
 that it could not fail of being of use to Mr. Woodhouse's spirits,
 which, I understand, are sometimes much depressed. And as to its
 recommendations to _you_, I fancy I need not take much pains to dwell
 on them. The advantages of Bath to the young are pretty generally
 understood. It would be a charming introduction for you, who have lived
 so secluded a life; and I could immediately secure you some of the best
 society in the place. A line from me would bring you a little host of
 acquaintance; and my particular friend, Mrs. Partridge, the lady I have
 always resided with when in Bath, would be most happy to shew you any
 attentions, and would be the very person for you to go into public
 with."
 
 It was as much as Emma could bear, without being impolite. The idea
 of her being indebted to Mrs. Elton for what was called an
 _introduction_--of her going into public under the auspices of a friend
 of Mrs. Elton's--probably some vulgar, dashing widow, who, with the
--**--**--
 merely when a state of warfare with one young lady might be supposed to
 recommend the other, but from the very first; and she was not satisfied
 with expressing a natural and reasonable admiration--but without
 solicitation, or plea, or privilege, she must be wanting to assist and
 befriend her.--Before Emma had forfeited her confidence, and about the
 third time of their meeting, she heard all Mrs. Elton's knight-errantry
 on the subject.--
 
 "Jane Fairfax is absolutely charming, Miss Woodhouse.--I quite rave
 about Jane Fairfax.--A sweet, interesting creature. So mild and
 ladylike--and with such talents!--I assure you I think she has very
 extraordinary talents. I do not scruple to say that she plays extremely
 well. I know enough of music to speak decidedly on that point. Oh! she
 is absolutely charming! You will laugh at my warmth--but, upon my word,
 I talk of nothing but Jane Fairfax.--And her situation is so calculated
 to affect one!--Miss Woodhouse, we must exert ourselves and endeavour
 to do something for her. We must bring her forward. Such talent as hers
 must not be suffered to remain unknown.--I dare say you have heard those
 charming lines of the poet,
 
         'Full many a flower is born to blush unseen,
           'And waste its fragrance on the desert air.'
 
 We must not allow them to be verified in sweet Jane Fairfax."
 
 "I cannot think there is any danger of it," was Emma's calm answer--"and
 when you are better acquainted with Miss Fairfax's situation and
 understand what her home has been, with Colonel and Mrs. Campbell, I
 have no idea that you will suppose her talents can be unknown."
 
 "Oh! but dear Miss Woodhouse, she is now in such retirement, such
 obscurity, so thrown away.--Whatever advantages she may have enjoyed
 with the Campbells are so palpably at an end! And I think she feels it.
--**--**--
 And besides the operation of this, as a general principle, you may be
 sure that Miss Fairfax awes Mrs. Elton by her superiority both of mind
 and manner; and that, face to face, Mrs. Elton treats her with all the
 respect which she has a claim to. Such a woman as Jane Fairfax probably
 never fell in Mrs. Elton's way before--and no degree of vanity can
 prevent her acknowledging her own comparative littleness in action, if
 not in consciousness."
 
 "I know how highly you think of Jane Fairfax," said Emma. Little Henry
 was in her thoughts, and a mixture of alarm and delicacy made her
 irresolute what else to say.
 
 "Yes," he replied, "any body may know how highly I think of her."
 
 "And yet," said Emma, beginning hastily and with an arch look, but soon
 stopping--it was better, however, to know the worst at once--she hurried
 on--"And yet, perhaps, you may hardly be aware yourself how highly it
 is. The extent of your admiration may take you by surprize some day or
 other."
 
 Mr. Knightley was hard at work upon the lower buttons of his thick
 leather gaiters, and either the exertion of getting them together, or
 some other cause, brought the colour into his face, as he answered,
 
 "Oh! are you there?--But you are miserably behindhand. Mr. Cole gave me
 a hint of it six weeks ago."
 
 He stopped.--Emma felt her foot pressed by Mrs. Weston, and did not
 herself know what to think. In a moment he went on--
 
 "That will never be, however, I can assure you. Miss Fairfax, I dare
 say, would not have me if I were to ask her--and I am very sure I shall
 never ask her."
 
 Emma returned her friend's pressure with interest; and was pleased
 enough to exclaim,
 
 "You are not vain, Mr. Knightley. I will say that for you."
--**--**--
 her card-tables should be set out with their separate candles and
 unbroken packs in the true style--and more waiters engaged for the
 evening than their own establishment could furnish, to carry round the
 refreshments at exactly the proper hour, and in the proper order.
 
 Emma, in the meanwhile, could not be satisfied without a dinner at
 Hartfield for the Eltons. They must not do less than others, or she
 should be exposed to odious suspicions, and imagined capable of pitiful
 resentment. A dinner there must be. After Emma had talked about it for
 ten minutes, Mr. Woodhouse felt no unwillingness, and only made the
 usual stipulation of not sitting at the bottom of the table himself,
 with the usual regular difficulty of deciding who should do it for him.
 
 The persons to be invited, required little thought. Besides the
 Eltons, it must be the Westons and Mr. Knightley; so far it was all of
 course--and it was hardly less inevitable that poor little Harriet must
 be asked to make the eighth:--but this invitation was not given with
 equal satisfaction, and on many accounts Emma was particularly pleased
 by Harriet's begging to be allowed to decline it. "She would rather not
 be in his company more than she could help. She was not yet quite
 able to see him and his charming happy wife together, without feeling
 uncomfortable. If Miss Woodhouse would not be displeased, she would
 rather stay at home." It was precisely what Emma would have wished, had
 she deemed it possible enough for wishing. She was delighted with the
 fortitude of her little friend--for fortitude she knew it was in her to
 give up being in company and stay at home; and she could now invite the
 very person whom she really wanted to make the eighth, Jane Fairfax.--
--**--**--
 
 "Yes," said his brother hesitatingly, "there is a likeness. I know what
 you mean--but Emma's hand is the strongest."
 
 "Isabella and Emma both write beautifully," said Mr. Woodhouse; "and
 always did. And so does poor Mrs. Weston"--with half a sigh and half a
 smile at her.
 
 "I never saw any gentleman's handwriting"--Emma began, looking also at
 Mrs. Weston; but stopped, on perceiving that Mrs. Weston was attending
 to some one else--and the pause gave her time to reflect, "Now, how am
 I going to introduce him?--Am I unequal to speaking his name at once
 before all these people? Is it necessary for me to use any roundabout
 phrase?--Your Yorkshire friend--your correspondent in Yorkshire;--that
 would be the way, I suppose, if I were very bad.--No, I can pronounce
 his name without the smallest distress. I certainly get better and
 better.--Now for it."
 
 Mrs. Weston was disengaged and Emma began again--"Mr. Frank Churchill
 writes one of the best gentleman's hands I ever saw."
 
 "I do not admire it," said Mr. Knightley. "It is too small--wants
 strength. It is like a woman's writing."
 
 This was not submitted to by either lady. They vindicated him against
 the base aspersion. "No, it by no means wanted strength--it was not a
 large hand, but very clear and certainly strong. Had not Mrs. Weston any
 letter about her to produce?" No, she had heard from him very lately,
 but having answered the letter, had put it away.
 
 "If we were in the other room," said Emma, "if I had my writing-desk, I
 am sure I could produce a specimen. I have a note of his.--Do not you
 remember, Mrs. Weston, employing him to write for you one day?"
 
 "He chose to say he was employed"--
 
 "Well, well, I have that note; and can shew it after dinner to convince
--**--**--
 to want others to talk, was very well satisfied with what she did say,
 and soon moved away to make the rest of his friends happy by a partial
 communication of what the whole room must have overheard already.
 
 It was well that he took every body's joy for granted, or he might
 not have thought either Mr. Woodhouse or Mr. Knightley particularly
 delighted. They were the first entitled, after Mrs. Weston and Emma, to
 be made happy;--from them he would have proceeded to Miss Fairfax, but
 she was so deep in conversation with John Knightley, that it would have
 been too positive an interruption; and finding himself close to Mrs.
 Elton, and her attention disengaged, he necessarily began on the subject
 with her.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XVIII
 
 
 "I hope I shall soon have the pleasure of introducing my son to you,"
 said Mr. Weston.
 
 Mrs. Elton, very willing to suppose a particular compliment intended her
 by such a hope, smiled most graciously.
 
 "You have heard of a certain Frank Churchill, I presume," he
 continued--"and know him to be my son, though he does not bear my name."
 
 "Oh! yes, and I shall be very happy in his acquaintance. I am sure Mr.
 Elton will lose no time in calling on him; and we shall both have great
 pleasure in seeing him at the Vicarage."
 
 "You are very obliging.--Frank will be extremely happy, I am sure.--
 He is to be in town next week, if not sooner. We have notice of it in a
 letter to-day. I met the letters in my way this morning, and seeing my
 son's hand, presumed to open it--though it was not directed to me--it
 was to Mrs. Weston. She is his principal correspondent, I assure you. I
 hardly ever get a letter."
 
 "And so you absolutely opened what was directed to her! Oh! Mr.
--**--**--
 leave them early the next day; and he soon began with--
 
 "Well, Emma, I do not believe I have any thing more to say about the
 boys; but you have your sister's letter, and every thing is down at full
 length there we may be sure. My charge would be much more concise than
 her's, and probably not much in the same spirit; all that I have to
 recommend being comprised in, do not spoil them, and do not physic
 them."
 
 "I rather hope to satisfy you both," said Emma, "for I shall do all
 in my power to make them happy, which will be enough for Isabella; and
 happiness must preclude false indulgence and physic."
 
 "And if you find them troublesome, you must send them home again."
 
 "That is very likely. You think so, do not you?"
 
 "I hope I am aware that they may be too noisy for your father--or even
 may be some encumbrance to you, if your visiting engagements continue to
 increase as much as they have done lately."
 
 "Increase!"
 
 "Certainly; you must be sensible that the last half-year has made a
 great difference in your way of life."
 
 "Difference! No indeed I am not."
 
 "There can be no doubt of your being much more engaged with company than
 you used to be. Witness this very time. Here am I come down for only
 one day, and you are engaged with a dinner-party!--When did it happen
 before, or any thing like it? Your neighbourhood is increasing, and you
 mix more with it. A little while ago, every letter to Isabella brought
 an account of fresh gaieties; dinners at Mr. Cole's, or balls at the
 Crown. The difference which Randalls, Randalls alone makes in your
 goings-on, is very great."
 
 "Yes," said his brother quickly, "it is Randalls that does it all."
--**--**--
 man what he ought to be.--She could fancy such a man. The whole party
 walked about, and looked, and praised again; and then, having nothing
 else to do, formed a sort of half-circle round the fire, to observe
 in their various modes, till other subjects were started, that, though
 _May_, a fire in the evening was still very pleasant.
 
 Emma found that it was not Mr. Weston's fault that the number of privy
 councillors was not yet larger. They had stopped at Mrs. Bates's door
 to offer the use of their carriage, but the aunt and niece were to be
 brought by the Eltons.
 
 Frank was standing by her, but not steadily; there was a restlessness,
 which shewed a mind not at ease. He was looking about, he was going to
 the door, he was watching for the sound of other carriages,--impatient
 to begin, or afraid of being always near her.
 
 Mrs. Elton was spoken of. "I think she must be here soon," said he. "I
 have a great curiosity to see Mrs. Elton, I have heard so much of her.
 It cannot be long, I think, before she comes."
 
 A carriage was heard. He was on the move immediately; but coming back,
 said,
 
 "I am forgetting that I am not acquainted with her. I have never seen
 either Mr. or Mrs. Elton. I have no business to put myself forward."
 
 Mr. and Mrs. Elton appeared; and all the smiles and the proprieties
 passed.
 
 "But Miss Bates and Miss Fairfax!" said Mr. Weston, looking about. "We
 thought you were to bring them."
 
 The mistake had been slight. The carriage was sent for them now. Emma
 longed to know what Frank's first opinion of Mrs. Elton might be; how
 he was affected by the studied elegance of her dress, and her smiles of
--**--**--
 take her shawl--for the evenings are not warm--her large new shawl--
 Mrs. Dixon's wedding-present.--So kind of her to think of my mother!
 Bought at Weymouth, you know--Mr. Dixon's choice. There were three
 others, Jane says, which they hesitated about some time. Colonel
 Campbell rather preferred an olive. My dear Jane, are you sure you did
 not wet your feet?--It was but a drop or two, but I am so afraid:--but
 Mr. Frank Churchill was so extremely--and there was a mat to step
 upon--I shall never forget his extreme politeness.--Oh! Mr. Frank
 Churchill, I must tell you my mother's spectacles have never been in
 fault since; the rivet never came out again. My mother often talks of
 your good-nature. Does not she, Jane?--Do not we often talk of Mr. Frank
 Churchill?--Ah! here's Miss Woodhouse.--Dear Miss Woodhouse, how do
 you do?--Very well I thank you, quite well. This is meeting quite
 in fairy-land!--Such a transformation!--Must not compliment, I know
 (eyeing Emma most complacently)--that would be rude--but upon my word,
 Miss Woodhouse, you do look--how do you like Jane's hair?--You are
 a judge.--She did it all herself. Quite wonderful how she does her
 hair!--No hairdresser from London I think could.--Ah! Dr. Hughes I
 declare--and Mrs. Hughes. Must go and speak to Dr. and Mrs. Hughes for a
 moment.--How do you do? How do you do?--Very well, I thank you. This
 is delightful, is not it?--Where's dear Mr. Richard?--Oh! there he is.
 Don't disturb him. Much better employed talking to the young ladies. How
 do you do, Mr. Richard?--I saw you the other day as you rode through
 the town--Mrs. Otway, I protest!--and good Mr. Otway, and Miss Otway
 and Miss Caroline.--Such a host of friends!--and Mr. George and Mr.
 Arthur!--How do you do? How do you all do?--Quite well, I am much
--**--**--
 must be asked to begin the ball; that she would expect it; which
 interfered with all their wishes of giving Emma that distinction.--Emma
 heard the sad truth with fortitude.
 
 "And what are we to do for a proper partner for her?" said Mr. Weston.
 "She will think Frank ought to ask her."
 
 Frank turned instantly to Emma, to claim her former promise; and
 boasted himself an engaged man, which his father looked his most perfect
 approbation of--and it then appeared that Mrs. Weston was wanting _him_
 to dance with Mrs. Elton himself, and that their business was to help to
 persuade him into it, which was done pretty soon.--Mr. Weston and Mrs.
 Elton led the way, Mr. Frank Churchill and Miss Woodhouse followed.
 Emma must submit to stand second to Mrs. Elton, though she had always
 considered the ball as peculiarly for her. It was almost enough to make
 her think of marrying. Mrs. Elton had undoubtedly the advantage, at this
 time, in vanity completely gratified; for though she had intended to
 begin with Frank Churchill, she could not lose by the change. Mr. Weston
 might be his son's superior.--In spite of this little rub, however,
 Emma was smiling with enjoyment, delighted to see the respectable length
 of the set as it was forming, and to feel that she had so many hours
 of unusual festivity before her.--She was more disturbed by Mr.
 Knightley's not dancing than by any thing else.--There he was, among
 the standers-by, where he ought not to be; he ought to be dancing,--not
 classing himself with the husbands, and fathers, and whist-players, who
 were pretending to feel an interest in the dance till their rubbers were
 made up,--so young as he looked!--He could not have appeared to greater
 advantage perhaps anywhere, than where he had placed himself. His tall,
--**--**--
 it. He did not omit being sometimes directly before Miss Smith, or
 speaking to those who were close to her.--Emma saw it. She was not yet
 dancing; she was working her way up from the bottom, and had therefore
 leisure to look around, and by only turning her head a little she saw
 it all. When she was half-way up the set, the whole group were exactly
 behind her, and she would no longer allow her eyes to watch; but Mr.
 Elton was so near, that she heard every syllable of a dialogue which
 just then took place between him and Mrs. Weston; and she perceived that
 his wife, who was standing immediately above her, was not only
 listening also, but even encouraging him by significant glances.--The
 kind-hearted, gentle Mrs. Weston had left her seat to join him and say,
 "Do not you dance, Mr. Elton?" to which his prompt reply was, "Most
 readily, Mrs. Weston, if you will dance with me."
 
 "Me!--oh! no--I would get you a better partner than myself. I am no
 dancer."
 
 "If Mrs. Gilbert wishes to dance," said he, "I shall have great
 pleasure, I am sure--for, though beginning to feel myself rather an old
 married man, and that my dancing days are over, it would give me very
 great pleasure at any time to stand up with an old friend like Mrs.
 Gilbert."
 
 "Mrs. Gilbert does not mean to dance, but there is a young lady
 disengaged whom I should be very glad to see dancing--Miss Smith." "Miss
 Smith!--oh!--I had not observed.--You are extremely obliging--and if I
 were not an old married man.--But my dancing days are over, Mrs. Weston.
 You will excuse me. Any thing else I should be most happy to do, at your
 command--but my dancing days are over."
 
 Mrs. Weston said no more; and Emma could imagine with what surprize and
--**--**--
 growing very like her;--_she_ spoke some of her feelings, by observing
 audibly to her partner,
 
 "Knightley has taken pity on poor little Miss Smith!--Very good-natured,
 I declare."
 
 Supper was announced. The move began; and Miss Bates might be heard from
 that moment, without interruption, till her being seated at table and
 taking up her spoon.
 
 "Jane, Jane, my dear Jane, where are you?--Here is your tippet. Mrs.
 Weston begs you to put on your tippet. She says she is afraid there will
 be draughts in the passage, though every thing has been done--One door
 nailed up--Quantities of matting--My dear Jane, indeed you must.
 Mr. Churchill, oh! you are too obliging! How well you put it on!--so
 gratified! Excellent dancing indeed!--Yes, my dear, I ran home, as I
 said I should, to help grandmama to bed, and got back again, and
 nobody missed me.--I set off without saying a word, just as I told you.
 Grandmama was quite well, had a charming evening with Mr. Woodhouse, a
 vast deal of chat, and backgammon.--Tea was made downstairs, biscuits
 and baked apples and wine before she came away: amazing luck in some
 of her throws: and she inquired a great deal about you, how you were
 amused, and who were your partners. 'Oh!' said I, 'I shall not forestall
 Jane; I left her dancing with Mr. George Otway; she will love to tell
 you all about it herself to-morrow: her first partner was Mr. Elton,
 I do not know who will ask her next, perhaps Mr. William Cox.' My dear
 sir, you are too obliging.--Is there nobody you would not rather?--I am
 not helpless. Sir, you are most kind. Upon my word, Jane on one arm, and
 me on the other!--Stop, stop, let us stand a little back, Mrs. Elton is
 going; dear Mrs. Elton, how elegant she looks!--Beautiful lace!--Now we
--**--**--
 exceedingly terrified, she had been obliged to remain.
 
 How the trampers might have behaved, had the young ladies been more
 courageous, must be doubtful; but such an invitation for attack could
 not be resisted; and Harriet was soon assailed by half a dozen children,
 headed by a stout woman and a great boy, all clamorous, and impertinent
 in look, though not absolutely in word.--More and more frightened, she
 immediately promised them money, and taking out her purse, gave them a
 shilling, and begged them not to want more, or to use her ill.--She
 was then able to walk, though but slowly, and was moving away--but her
 terror and her purse were too tempting, and she was followed, or rather
 surrounded, by the whole gang, demanding more.
 
 In this state Frank Churchill had found her, she trembling and
 conditioning, they loud and insolent. By a most fortunate chance his
 leaving Highbury had been delayed so as to bring him to her assistance
 at this critical moment. The pleasantness of the morning had induced
 him to walk forward, and leave his horses to meet him by another road,
 a mile or two beyond Highbury--and happening to have borrowed a pair
 of scissors the night before of Miss Bates, and to have forgotten to
 restore them, he had been obliged to stop at her door, and go in for a
 few minutes: he was therefore later than he had intended; and being
 on foot, was unseen by the whole party till almost close to them. The
 terror which the woman and boy had been creating in Harriet was then
 their own portion. He had left them completely frightened; and Harriet
 eagerly clinging to him, and hardly able to speak, had just strength
 enough to reach Hartfield, before her spirits were quite overcome.
--**--**--
 it will not give me another moment's pang: and to convince you that I
 have been speaking truth, I am now going to destroy--what I ought to
 have destroyed long ago--what I ought never to have kept--I know that
 very well (blushing as she spoke).--However, now I will destroy it
 all--and it is my particular wish to do it in your presence, that you
 may see how rational I am grown. Cannot you guess what this parcel
 holds?" said she, with a conscious look.
 
 "Not the least in the world.--Did he ever give you any thing?"
 
 "No--I cannot call them gifts; but they are things that I have valued
 very much."
 
 She held the parcel towards her, and Emma read the words _Most_
 _precious_ _treasures_ on the top. Her curiosity was greatly excited.
 Harriet unfolded the parcel, and she looked on with impatience. Within
 abundance of silver paper was a pretty little Tunbridge-ware box,
 which Harriet opened: it was well lined with the softest cotton; but,
 excepting the cotton, Emma saw only a small piece of court-plaister.
 
 "Now," said Harriet, "you _must_ recollect."
 
 "No, indeed I do not."
 
 "Dear me! I should not have thought it possible you could forget what
 passed in this very room about court-plaister, one of the very last
 times we ever met in it!--It was but a very few days before I had my
 sore throat--just before Mr. and Mrs. John Knightley came--I think the
 very evening.--Do not you remember his cutting his finger with your new
 penknife, and your recommending court-plaister?--But, as you had none
 about you, and knew I had, you desired me to supply him; and so I took
 mine out and cut him a piece; but it was a great deal too large, and he
 cut it smaller, and kept playing some time with what was left, before he
--**--**--
 
 Your most obliged and affectionate sister,
 
 S. VERNON.
 
 
 
 
 
 II
 
 
 LADY SUSAN VERNON TO MRS. JOHNSON
 
 
 Langford.
 
 
 You were mistaken, my dear Alicia, in supposing me fixed at this place
 for the rest of the winter: it grieves me to say how greatly you were
 mistaken, for I have seldom spent three months more agreeably than
 those which have just flown away. At present, nothing goes smoothly; the
 females of the family are united against me. You foretold how it would
 be when I first came to Langford, and Mainwaring is so uncommonly
 pleasing that I was not without apprehensions for myself. I remember
 saying to myself, as I drove to the house, "I like this man, pray Heaven
 no harm come of it!" But I was determined to be discreet, to bear in
 mind my being only four months a widow, and to be as quiet as possible:
 and I have been so, my dear creature; I have admitted no one's
 attentions but Mainwaring's. I have avoided all general flirtation
 whatever; I have distinguished no creature besides, of all the numbers
 resorting hither, except Sir James Martin, on whom I bestowed a little
 notice, in order to detach him from Miss Mainwaring; but, if the world
 could know my motive THERE they would honour me. I have been called an
 unkind mother, but it was the sacred impulse of maternal affection, it
 was the advantage of my daughter that led me on; and if that daughter
 were not the greatest simpleton on earth, I might have been rewarded for
 my exertions as I ought.
 
 Sir James did make proposals to me for Frederica; but Frederica, who
 was born to be the torment of my life, chose to set herself so violently
 against the match that I thought it better to lay aside the scheme for
--**--**--
 
 
 
 
 III
 
 
 MRS. VERNON TO LADY DE COURCY
 
 
 Churchhill.
 
 
 My dear Mother,--I am very sorry to tell you that it will not be in our
 power to keep our promise of spending our Christmas with you; and we are
 prevented that happiness by a circumstance which is not likely to
 make us any amends. Lady Susan, in a letter to her brother-in-law, has
 declared her intention of visiting us almost immediately; and as such
 a visit is in all probability merely an affair of convenience, it is
 impossible to conjecture its length. I was by no means prepared for such
 an event, nor can I now account for her ladyship's conduct; Langford
 appeared so exactly the place for her in every respect, as well from
 the elegant and expensive style of living there, as from her particular
 attachment to Mr. Mainwaring, that I was very far from expecting so
 speedy a distinction, though I always imagined from her increasing
 friendship for us since her husband's death that we should, at some
 future period, be obliged to receive her. Mr. Vernon, I think, was a
 great deal too kind to her when he was in Staffordshire; her behaviour
 to him, independent of her general character, has been so inexcusably
 artful and ungenerous since our marriage was first in agitation that no
 one less amiable and mild than himself could have overlooked it all;
 and though, as his brother's widow, and in narrow circumstances, it was
 proper to render her pecuniary assistance, I cannot help thinking
 his pressing invitation to her to visit us at Churchhill perfectly
 unnecessary. Disposed, however, as he always is to think the best of
 everyone, her display of grief, and professions of regret, and general
 resolutions of prudence, were sufficient to soften his heart and make
 him really confide in her sincerity; but, as for myself, I am still
--**--**--
 
 
 Parklands.
 
 
 My dear Sister,--I congratulate you and Mr. Vernon on being about to
 receive into your family the most accomplished coquette in England. As a
 very distinguished flirt I have always been taught to consider her, but
 it has lately fallen in my way to hear some particulars of her conduct
 at Langford: which prove that she does not confine herself to that sort
 of honest flirtation which satisfies most people, but aspires to the
 more delicious gratification of making a whole family miserable. By her
 behaviour to Mr. Mainwaring she gave jealousy and wretchedness to his
 wife, and by her attentions to a young man previously attached to Mr.
 Mainwaring's sister deprived an amiable girl of her lover.
 
 I learnt all this from Mr. Smith, now in this neighbourhood (I have
 dined with him, at Hurst and Wilford), who is just come from Langford
 where he was a fortnight with her ladyship, and who is therefore well
 qualified to make the communication.
 
 What a woman she must be! I long to see her, and shall certainly accept
 your kind invitation, that I may form some idea of those bewitching
 powers which can do so much--engaging at the same time, and in the same
 house, the affections of two men, who were neither of them at liberty to
 bestow them--and all this without the charm of youth! I am glad to find
 Miss Vernon does not accompany her mother to Churchhill, as she has not
 even manners to recommend her; and, according to Mr. Smith's account, is
 equally dull and proud. Where pride and stupidity unite there can be
 no dissimulation worthy notice, and Miss Vernon shall be consigned to
 unrelenting contempt; but by all that I can gather Lady Susan possesses
 a degree of captivating deceit which it must be pleasing to witness and
--**--**--
 prevent my brother-in-law's marrying her, this want of cordiality is not
 very surprizing, and yet it shows an illiberal and vindictive spirit
 to resent a project which influenced me six years ago, and which never
 succeeded at last.
 
 I am sometimes disposed to repent that I did not let Charles buy
 Vernon Castle, when we were obliged to sell it; but it was a trying
 circumstance, especially as the sale took place exactly at the time
 of his marriage; and everybody ought to respect the delicacy of those
 feelings which could not endure that my husband's dignity should be
 lessened by his younger brother's having possession of the family
 estate. Could matters have been so arranged as to prevent the necessity
 of our leaving the castle, could we have lived with Charles and kept
 him single, I should have been very far from persuading my husband to
 dispose of it elsewhere; but Charles was on the point of marrying
 Miss De Courcy, and the event has justified me. Here are children in
 abundance, and what benefit could have accrued to me from his purchasing
 Vernon? My having prevented it may perhaps have given his wife an
 unfavourable impression, but where there is a disposition to dislike,
 a motive will never be wanting; and as to money matters it has not
 withheld him from being very useful to me. I really have a regard
 for him, he is so easily imposed upon! The house is a good one, the
 furniture fashionable, and everything announces plenty and elegance.
 Charles is very rich I am sure; when a man has once got his name in a
 banking-house he rolls in money; but they do not know what to do with
 it, keep very little company, and never go to London but on business. We
--**--**--
 she has always disliked me for marrying Mr. Vernon, and that we had
 never met before, I should have imagined her an attached friend. One
 is apt, I believe, to connect assurance of manner with coquetry, and to
 expect that an impudent address will naturally attend an impudent mind;
 at least I was myself prepared for an improper degree of confidence in
 Lady Susan; but her countenance is absolutely sweet, and her voice and
 manner winningly mild. I am sorry it is so, for what is this but deceit?
 Unfortunately, one knows her too well. She is clever and agreeable, has
 all that knowledge of the world which makes conversation easy, and talks
 very well, with a happy command of language, which is too often used, I
 believe, to make black appear white. She has already almost persuaded me
 of her being warmly attached to her daughter, though I have been so long
 convinced to the contrary. She speaks of her with so much tenderness and
 anxiety, lamenting so bitterly the neglect of her education, which she
 represents however as wholly unavoidable, that I am forced to recollect
 how many successive springs her ladyship spent in town, while her
 daughter was left in Staffordshire to the care of servants, or a
 governess very little better, to prevent my believing what she says.
 
 If her manners have so great an influence on my resentful heart, you
 may judge how much more strongly they operate on Mr. Vernon's generous
 temper. I wish I could be as well satisfied as he is, that it was really
 her choice to leave Langford for Churchhill; and if she had not stayed
 there for months before she discovered that her friend's manner of
 living did not suit her situation or feelings, I might have believed
--**--**--
 
 My dear Alicia,--You are very good in taking notice of Frederica, and
 I am grateful for it as a mark of your friendship; but as I cannot have
 any doubt of the warmth of your affection, I am far from exacting so
 heavy a sacrifice. She is a stupid girl, and has nothing to recommend
 her. I would not, therefore, on my account, have you encumber one moment
 of your precious time by sending for her to Edward Street, especially
 as every visit is so much deducted from the grand affair of education,
 which I really wish to have attended to while she remains at Miss
 Summers's. I want her to play and sing with some portion of taste and
 a good deal of assurance, as she has my hand and arm and a tolerable
 voice. I was so much indulged in my infant years that I was never
 obliged to attend to anything, and consequently am without the
 accomplishments which are now necessary to finish a pretty woman. Not
 that I am an advocate for the prevailing fashion of acquiring a perfect
 knowledge of all languages, arts, and sciences. It is throwing time
 away to be mistress of French, Italian, and German: music, singing,
 and drawing, &c., will gain a woman some applause, but will not add
 one lover to her list--grace and manner, after all, are of the greatest
 importance. I do not mean, therefore, that Frederica's acquirements
 should be more than superficial, and I flatter myself that she will not
 remain long enough at school to understand anything thoroughly. I hope
 to see her the wife of Sir James within a twelvemonth. You know on what
 I ground my hope, and it is certainly a good foundation, for school must
 be very humiliating to a girl of Frederica's age. And, by-the-by, you
--**--**--
 bestowed in vain, and to persuade Reginald that she has scandalously
 belied me. This project will serve at least to amuse me, and prevent
 my feeling so acutely this dreadful separation from you and all whom I
 love.
 
 Yours ever,
 
 S. VERNON.
 
 
 
 
 
 VIII
 
 
 MRS. VERNON TO LADY DE COURCY
 
 
 Churchhill.
 
 
 My dear Mother,--You must not expect Reginald back again for some time.
 He desires me to tell you that the present open weather induces him to
 accept Mr. Vernon's invitation to prolong his stay in Sussex, that
 they may have some hunting together. He means to send for his horses
 immediately, and it is impossible to say when you may see him in Kent. I
 will not disguise my sentiments on this change from you, my dear mother,
 though I think you had better not communicate them to my father, whose
 excessive anxiety about Reginald would subject him to an alarm which
 might seriously affect his health and spirits. Lady Susan has certainly
 contrived, in the space of a fortnight, to make my brother like her.
 In short, I am persuaded that his continuing here beyond the time
 originally fixed for his return is occasioned as much by a degree of
 fascination towards her, as by the wish of hunting with Mr. Vernon, and
 of course I cannot receive that pleasure from the length of his visit
 which my brother's company would otherwise give me. I am, indeed,
 provoked at the artifice of this unprincipled woman; what stronger
 proof of her dangerous abilities can be given than this perversion of
 Reginald's judgment, which when he entered the house was so decidedly
 against her! In his last letter he actually gave me some particulars of
 her behaviour at Langford, such as he received from a gentleman who knew
 her perfectly well, which, if true, must raise abhorrence against her,
--**--**--
 
 
 MRS. JOHNSON TO LADY S. VERNON
 
 
 Edward Street.
 
 
 My dearest Friend,--I congratulate you on Mr. De Courcy's arrival, and
 I advise you by all means to marry him; his father's estate is, we know,
 considerable, and I believe certainly entailed. Sir Reginald is very
 infirm, and not likely to stand in your way long. I hear the young man
 well spoken of; and though no one can really deserve you, my dearest
 Susan, Mr. De Courcy may be worth having. Mainwaring will storm of
 course, but you easily pacify him; besides, the most scrupulous point of
 honour could not require you to wait for HIS emancipation. I have seen
 Sir James; he came to town for a few days last week, and called several
 times in Edward Street. I talked to him about you and your daughter, and
 he is so far from having forgotten you, that I am sure he would marry
 either of you with pleasure. I gave him hopes of Frederica's relenting,
 and told him a great deal of her improvements. I scolded him for making
 love to Maria Mainwaring; he protested that he had been only in joke,
 and we both laughed heartily at her disappointment; and, in short, were
 very agreeable. He is as silly as ever.
 
 Yours faithfully,
 
 ALICIA.
 
 
 
 
 
 X
 
 
 LADY SUSAN VERNON TO MRS. JOHNSON
 
 
 Churchhill.
 
 
 I am much obliged to you, my dear Friend, for your advice respecting
 Mr. De Courcy, which I know was given with the full conviction of its
 expediency, though I am not quite determined on following it. I cannot
 easily resolve on anything so serious as marriage; especially as I
 am not at present in want of money, and might perhaps, till the old
 gentleman's death, be very little benefited by the match. It is true
--**--**--
 and to make many of those hours pass very pleasantly which would
 otherwise be spent in endeavouring to overcome my sister-in-law's
 reserve, and listening to the insipid talk of her husband. Your account
 of Sir James is most satisfactory, and I mean to give Miss Frederica a
 hint of my intentions very soon.
 
 Yours, &c.,
 
 S. VERNON.
 
 
 
 
 
 XI
 
 
 MRS. VERNON TO LADY DE COURCY
 
 
 Churchhill
 
 
 I really grow quite uneasy, my dearest mother, about Reginald, from
 witnessing the very rapid increase of Lady Susan's influence. They are
 now on terms of the most particular friendship, frequently engaged in
 long conversations together; and she has contrived by the most artful
 coquetry to subdue his judgment to her own purposes. It is impossible
 to see the intimacy between them so very soon established without some
 alarm, though I can hardly suppose that Lady Susan's plans extend to
 marriage. I wish you could get Reginald home again on any plausible
 pretence; he is not at all disposed to leave us, and I have given him as
 many hints of my father's precarious state of health as common decency
 will allow me to do in my own house. Her power over him must now be
 boundless, as she has entirely effaced all his former ill-opinion,
 and persuaded him not merely to forget but to justify her conduct. Mr.
 Smith's account of her proceedings at Langford, where he accused her of
 having made Mr. Mainwaring and a young man engaged to Miss Mainwaring
 distractedly in love with her, which Reginald firmly believed when he
 came here, is now, he is persuaded, only a scandalous invention. He
 has told me so with a warmth of manner which spoke his regret at having
 believed the contrary himself. How sincerely do I grieve that she
 ever entered this house! I always looked forward to her coming with
--**--**--
 their nearest relations into affairs of the heart, but I hope, my dear
 Reginald, that you will be superior to such as allow nothing for a
 father's anxiety, and think themselves privileged to refuse him their
 confidence and slight his advice. You must be sensible that as an only
 son, and the representative of an ancient family, your conduct in life
 is most interesting to your connections; and in the very important
 concern of marriage especially, there is everything at stake--your own
 happiness, that of your parents, and the credit of your name. I do not
 suppose that you would deliberately form an absolute engagement of that
 nature without acquainting your mother and myself, or at least, without
 being convinced that we should approve of your choice; but I cannot help
 fearing that you may be drawn in, by the lady who has lately attached
 you, to a marriage which the whole of your family, far and near, must
 highly reprobate. Lady Susan's age is itself a material objection, but
 her want of character is one so much more serious, that the difference
 of even twelve years becomes in comparison of small amount. Were you not
 blinded by a sort of fascination, it would be ridiculous in me to repeat
 the instances of great misconduct on her side so very generally known.
 
 Her neglect of her husband, her encouragement of other men, her
 extravagance and dissipation, were so gross and notorious that no one
 could be ignorant of them at the time, nor can now have forgotten them.
 To our family she has always been represented in softened colours by
 the benevolence of Mr. Charles Vernon, and yet, in spite of his generous
 endeavours to excuse her, we know that she did, from the most selfish
 motives, take all possible pains to prevent his marriage with Catherine.
--**--**--
 you can give me your assurance of having no design beyond enjoying
 the conversation of a clever woman for a short period, and of yielding
 admiration only to her beauty and abilities, without being blinded by
 them to her faults, you will restore me to happiness; but, if you cannot
 do this, explain to me, at least, what has occasioned so great an
 alteration in your opinion of her.
 
 I am, &c., &c,
 
 REGINALD DE COURCY
 
 
 
 
 
 XIII
 
 
 LADY DE COURCY TO MRS. VERNON
 
 
 Parklands.
 
 
 My dear Catherine,--Unluckily I was confined to my room when your last
 letter came, by a cold which affected my eyes so much as to prevent my
 reading it myself, so I could not refuse your father when he offered
 to read it to me, by which means he became acquainted, to my great
 vexation, with all your fears about your brother. I had intended to
 write to Reginald myself as soon as my eyes would let me, to point out,
 as well as I could, the danger of an intimate acquaintance, with so
 artful a woman as Lady Susan, to a young man of his age, and high
 expectations. I meant, moreover, to have reminded him of our being quite
 alone now, and very much in need of him to keep up our spirits these
 long winter evenings. Whether it would have done any good can never be
 settled now, but I am excessively vexed that Sir Reginald should know
 anything of a matter which we foresaw would make him so uneasy. He
 caught all your fears the moment he had read your letter, and I am sure
 he has not had the business out of his head since. He wrote by the same
 post to Reginald a long letter full of it all, and particularly asking
--**--**--
 to her. Our difference of age must be an insuperable objection, and I
 entreat you, my dear father, to quiet your mind, and no longer harbour
 a suspicion which cannot be more injurious to your own peace than to our
 understandings. I can have no other view in remaining with Lady Susan,
 than to enjoy for a short time (as you have yourself expressed it) the
 conversation of a woman of high intellectual powers. If Mrs. Vernon
 would allow something to my affection for herself and her husband in the
 length of my visit, she would do more justice to us all; but my sister
 is unhappily prejudiced beyond the hope of conviction against Lady
 Susan. From an attachment to her husband, which in itself does honour to
 both, she cannot forgive the endeavours at preventing their union, which
 have been attributed to selfishness in Lady Susan; but in this case, as
 well as in many others, the world has most grossly injured that lady, by
 supposing the worst where the motives of her conduct have been doubtful.
 Lady Susan had heard something so materially to the disadvantage of my
 sister as to persuade her that the happiness of Mr. Vernon, to whom she
 was always much attached, would be wholly destroyed by the marriage. And
 this circumstance, while it explains the true motives of Lady Susan's
 conduct, and removes all the blame which has been so lavished on her,
 may also convince us how little the general report of anyone ought to
 be credited; since no character, however upright, can escape the
 malevolence of slander. If my sister, in the security of retirement,
 with as little opportunity as inclination to do evil, could not avoid
 censure, we must not rashly condemn those who, living in the world and
--**--**--
 I am, &c., &c.,
 
 R. DE COURCY.
 
 
 
 
 
 XV
 
 
 MRS. VERNON TO LADY DE COURCY
 
 
 Churchhill
 
 
 My dear Mother,--I return you Reginald's letter, and rejoice with all
 my heart that my father is made easy by it: tell him so, with my
 congratulations; but, between ourselves, I must own it has only
 convinced ME of my brother's having no PRESENT intention of marrying
 Lady Susan, not that he is in no danger of doing so three months hence.
 He gives a very plausible account of her behaviour at Langford; I wish
 it may be true, but his intelligence must come from herself, and I
 am less disposed to believe it than to lament the degree of intimacy
 subsisting between them, implied by the discussion of such a subject. I
 am sorry to have incurred his displeasure, but can expect nothing better
 while he is so very eager in Lady Susan's justification. He is very
 severe against me indeed, and yet I hope I have not been hasty in
 my judgment of her. Poor woman! though I have reasons enough for
 my dislike, I cannot help pitying her at present, as she is in real
 distress, and with too much cause. She had this morning a letter from
 the lady with whom she has placed her daughter, to request that Miss
 Vernon might be immediately removed, as she had been detected in an
 attempt to run away. Why, or whither she intended to go, does not
 appear; but, as her situation seems to have been unexceptionable, it is
 a sad thing, and of course highly distressing to Lady Susan. Frederica
 must be as much as sixteen, and ought to know better; but from what
 her mother insinuates, I am afraid she is a perverse girl. She has
 been sadly neglected, however, and her mother ought to remember it. Mr.
--**--**--
 
 
 XVI
 
 
 LADY SUSAN TO MRS. JOHNSON
 
 
 Churchhill.
 
 
 Never, my dearest Alicia, was I so provoked in my life as by a letter
 this morning from Miss Summers. That horrid girl of mine has been trying
 to run away. I had not a notion of her being such a little devil before,
 she seemed to have all the Vernon milkiness; but on receiving the letter
 in which I declared my intention about Sir James, she actually attempted
 to elope; at least, I cannot otherwise account for her doing it. She
 meant, I suppose, to go to the Clarkes in Staffordshire, for she has no
 other acquaintances. But she shall be punished, she shall have him. I
 have sent Charles to town to make matters up if he can, for I do not
 by any means want her here. If Miss Summers will not keep her, you must
 find me out another school, unless we can get her married immediately.
 Miss S. writes word that she could not get the young lady to assign
 any cause for her extraordinary conduct, which confirms me in my own
 previous explanation of it. Frederica is too shy, I think, and too much
 in awe of me to tell tales, but if the mildness of her uncle should get
 anything out of her, I am not afraid. I trust I shall be able to make my
 story as good as hers. If I am vain of anything, it is of my eloquence.
 Consideration and esteem as surely follow command of language as
 admiration waits on beauty, and here I have opportunity enough for the
 exercise of my talent, as the chief of my time is spent in conversation.
 
 Reginald is never easy unless we are by ourselves, and when the weather
 is tolerable, we pace the shrubbery for hours together. I like him on
--**--**--
 niece with him. Lady Susan had received a line from him by that day's
 post, informing her that Miss Summers had absolutely refused to allow of
 Miss Vernon's continuance in her academy; we were therefore prepared for
 her arrival, and expected them impatiently the whole evening. They came
 while we were at tea, and I never saw any creature look so frightened as
 Frederica when she entered the room. Lady Susan, who had been shedding
 tears before, and showing great agitation at the idea of the meeting,
 received her with perfect self-command, and without betraying the
 least tenderness of spirit. She hardly spoke to her, and on Frederica's
 bursting into tears as soon as we were seated, took her out of the room,
 and did not return for some time. When she did, her eyes looked very red
 and she was as much agitated as before. We saw no more of her daughter.
 Poor Reginald was beyond measure concerned to see his fair friend in
 such distress, and watched her with so much tender solicitude, that I,
 who occasionally caught her observing his countenance with exultation,
 was quite out of patience. This pathetic representation lasted the whole
 evening, and so ostentatious and artful a display has entirely convinced
 me that she did in fact feel nothing. I am more angry with her than ever
 since I have seen her daughter; the poor girl looks so unhappy that my
 heart aches for her. Lady Susan is surely too severe, for Frederica
 does not seem to have the sort of temper to make severity necessary.
 She looks perfectly timid, dejected, and penitent. She is very
 pretty, though not so handsome as her mother, nor at all like her. Her
 complexion is delicate, but neither so fair nor so blooming as Lady
--**--**--
 but while Miss Summers declares that Miss Vernon showed no signs of
 obstinacy or perverseness during her whole stay in Wigmore Street, till
 she was detected in this scheme, I cannot so readily credit what Lady
 Susan has made him, and wants to make me believe, that it was merely
 an impatience of restraint and a desire of escaping from the tuition of
 masters which brought on the plan of an elopement. O Reginald, how is
 your judgment enslaved! He scarcely dares even allow her to be handsome,
 and when I speak of her beauty, replies only that her eyes have no
 brilliancy! Sometimes he is sure she is deficient in understanding, and
 at others that her temper only is in fault. In short, when a person is
 always to deceive, it is impossible to be consistent. Lady Susan
 finds it necessary that Frederica should be to blame, and probably has
 sometimes judged it expedient to excuse her of ill-nature and sometimes
 to lament her want of sense. Reginald is only repeating after her
 ladyship.
 
 I remain, &c., &c.,
 
 CATHERINE VERNON.
 
 
 
 
 
 XVIII
 
 
 FROM THE SAME TO THE SAME
 
 
 Churchhill.
 
 
 My dear Mother,--I am very glad to find that my description of Frederica
 Vernon has interested you, for I do believe her truly deserving of your
 regard; and when I have communicated a notion which has recently struck
 me, your kind impressions in her favour will, I am sure, be heightened.
 I cannot help fancying that she is growing partial to my brother. I so
 very often see her eyes fixed on his face with a remarkable expression
 of pensive admiration. He is certainly very handsome; and yet more,
 there is an openness in his manner that must be highly prepossessing,
 and I am sure she feels it so. Thoughtful and pensive in general, her
--**--**--
 You will be eager, I know, to hear something further of Frederica, and
 perhaps may think me negligent for not writing before. She arrived with
 her uncle last Thursday fortnight, when, of course, I lost no time in
 demanding the cause of her behaviour; and soon found myself to have been
 perfectly right in attributing it to my own letter. The prospect of
 it frightened her so thoroughly, that, with a mixture of true girlish
 perverseness and folly, she resolved on getting out of the house and
 proceeding directly by the stage to her friends, the Clarkes; and had
 really got as far as the length of two streets in her journey when
 she was fortunately missed, pursued, and overtaken. Such was the first
 distinguished exploit of Miss Frederica Vernon; and, if we consider that
 it was achieved at the tender age of sixteen, we shall have room for
 the most flattering prognostics of her future renown. I am excessively
 provoked, however, at the parade of propriety which prevented Miss
 Summers from keeping the girl; and it seems so extraordinary a piece of
 nicety, considering my daughter's family connections, that I can only
 suppose the lady to be governed by the fear of never getting her money.
 Be that as it may, however, Frederica is returned on my hands; and,
 having nothing else to employ her, is busy in pursuing the plan of
 romance begun at Langford. She is actually falling in love with Reginald
 De Courcy! To disobey her mother by refusing an unexceptionable offer
 is not enough; her affections must also be given without her mother's
 approbation. I never saw a girl of her age bid fairer to be the sport
 of mankind. Her feelings are tolerably acute, and she is so charmingly
 artless in their display as to afford the most reasonable hope of her
--**--**--
 We have a very unexpected guest with us at present, my dear Mother: he
 arrived yesterday. I heard a carriage at the door, as I was sitting with
 my children while they dined; and supposing I should be wanted, left the
 nursery soon afterwards, and was half-way downstairs, when Frederica,
 as pale as ashes, came running up, and rushed by me into her own room.
 I instantly followed, and asked her what was the matter. "Oh!" said
 she, "he is come--Sir James is come, and what shall I do?" This was no
 explanation; I begged her to tell me what she meant. At that moment we
 were interrupted by a knock at the door: it was Reginald, who came, by
 Lady Susan's direction, to call Frederica down. "It is Mr. De Courcy!"
 said she, colouring violently. "Mamma has sent for me; I must go."
 We all three went down together; and I saw my brother examining the
 terrified face of Frederica with surprize. In the breakfast-room we
 found Lady Susan, and a young man of gentlemanlike appearance, whom she
 introduced by the name of Sir James Martin--the very person, as you may
 remember, whom it was said she had been at pains to detach from Miss
 Mainwaring; but the conquest, it seems, was not designed for herself,
 or she has since transferred it to her daughter; for Sir James is now
 desperately in love with Frederica, and with full encouragement from
 mamma. The poor girl, however, I am sure, dislikes him; and though his
 person and address are very well, he appears, both to Mr. Vernon and
 me, a very weak young man. Frederica looked so shy, so confused, when
 we entered the room, that I felt for her exceedingly. Lady Susan behaved
 with great attention to her visitor; and yet I thought I could perceive
--**--**--
 establishment for the comforts of life." She concluded by demanding
 my congratulations. I gave them somewhat awkwardly, I believe; for, in
 fact, the sudden disclosure of so important a matter took from me the
 power of speaking with any clearness. She thanked me, however, most
 affectionately, for my kind concern in the welfare of herself and
 daughter; and then said: "I am not apt to deal in professions, my
 dear Mrs. Vernon, and I never had the convenient talent of affecting
 sensations foreign to my heart; and therefore I trust you will believe
 me when I declare, that much as I had heard in your praise before I knew
 you, I had no idea that I should ever love you as I now do; and I
 must further say that your friendship towards me is more particularly
 gratifying because I have reason to believe that some attempts were made
 to prejudice you against me. I only wish that they, whoever they are,
 to whom I am indebted for such kind intentions, could see the terms on
 which we now are together, and understand the real affection we feel
 for each other; but I will not detain you any longer. God bless you, for
 your goodness to me and my girl, and continue to you all your present
 happiness." What can one say of such a woman, my dear mother? Such
 earnestness such solemnity of expression! and yet I cannot help
 suspecting the truth of everything she says. As for Reginald, I believe
 he does not know what to make of the matter. When Sir James came, he
 appeared all astonishment and perplexity; the folly of the young man and
 the confusion of Frederica entirely engrossed him; and though a little
 private discourse with Lady Susan has since had its effect, he is still
--**--**--
 
 MISS VERNON TO MR DE COURCY
 
 
 Sir,--I hope you will excuse this liberty; I am forced upon it by the
 greatest distress, or I should be ashamed to trouble you. I am very
 miserable about Sir James Martin, and have no other way in the world of
 helping myself but by writing to you, for I am forbidden even speaking
 to my uncle and aunt on the subject; and this being the case, I am
 afraid my applying to you will appear no better than equivocation, and
 as if I attended to the letter and not the spirit of mamma's commands.
 But if you do not take my part and persuade her to break it off, I shall
 be half distracted, for I cannot bear him. No human being but YOU could
 have any chance of prevailing with her. If you will, therefore, have the
 unspeakably great kindness of taking my part with her, and persuading
 her to send Sir James away, I shall be more obliged to you than it is
 possible for me to express. I always disliked him from the first: it is
 not a sudden fancy, I assure you, sir; I always thought him silly and
 impertinent and disagreeable, and now he is grown worse than ever. I
 would rather work for my bread than marry him. I do not know how
 to apologize enough for this letter; I know it is taking so great a
 liberty. I am aware how dreadfully angry it will make mamma, but I
 remember the risk.
 
 I am, Sir, your most humble servant,
 
 F. S. V.
 
 
 
 
 
 XXII
 
 
 LADY SUSAN TO MRS. JOHNSON
 
 
 Churchhill.
 
 
 This is insufferable! My dearest friend, I was never so enraged before,
 and must relieve myself by writing to you, who I know will enter into
--**--**--
 by whom commissioned, to reprimand me. He then told me, mixing in
 his speech a few insolent compliments and ill-timed expressions of
 tenderness, to which I listened with perfect indifference, that my
 daughter had acquainted him with some circumstances concerning herself,
 Sir James, and me which had given him great uneasiness. In short, I
 found that she had in the first place actually written to him to request
 his interference, and that, on receiving her letter, he had conversed
 with her on the subject of it, in order to understand the particulars,
 and to assure himself of her real wishes. I have not a doubt but that
 the girl took this opportunity of making downright love to him. I am
 convinced of it by the manner in which he spoke of her. Much good may
 such love do him! I shall ever despise the man who can be gratified by
 the passion which he never wished to inspire, nor solicited the avowal
 of. I shall always detest them both. He can have no true regard for
 me, or he would not have listened to her; and SHE, with her little
 rebellious heart and indelicate feelings, to throw herself into the
 protection of a young man with whom she has scarcely ever exchanged
 two words before! I am equally confounded at HER impudence and HIS
 credulity. How dared he believe what she told him in my disfavour! Ought
 he not to have felt assured that I must have unanswerable motives for
 all that I had done? Where was his reliance on my sense and goodness
 then? Where the resentment which true love would have dictated against
 the person defaming me--that person, too, a chit, a child, without
 talent or education, whom he had been always taught to despise? I
 was calm for some time; but the greatest degree of forbearance may be
--**--**--
 I am quite sorry that I ever imparted my apprehensions to you; for the
 pleasure of learning that the danger is over is perhaps dearly purchased
 by all that you have previously suffered. I am so much agitated by
 delight that I can scarcely hold a pen; but am determined to send you
 a few short lines by James, that you may have some explanation of what
 must so greatly astonish you, as that Reginald should be returning to
 Parklands. I was sitting about half an hour ago with Sir James in
 the breakfast parlour, when my brother called me out of the room. I
 instantly saw that something was the matter; his complexion was raised,
 and he spoke with great emotion; you know his eager manner, my dear
 mother, when his mind is interested. "Catherine," said he, "I am going
 home to-day; I am sorry to leave you, but I must go: it is a great while
 since I have seen my father and mother. I am going to send James forward
 with my hunters immediately; if you have any letter, therefore, he can
 take it. I shall not be at home myself till Wednesday or Thursday, as I
 shall go through London, where I have business; but before I leave you,"
 he continued, speaking in a lower tone, and with still greater energy,
 "I must warn you of one thing--do not let Frederica Vernon be made
 unhappy by that Martin. He wants to marry her; her mother promotes the
 match, but she cannot endure the idea of it. Be assured that I speak
 from the fullest conviction of the truth of what I say; I know that
 Frederica is made wretched by Sir James's continuing here. She is a
 sweet girl, and deserves a better fate. Send him away immediately; he is
--**--**--
 Yours ever, &c.,
 
 CATH. VERNON.
 
 
 
 
 
 XXIV
 
 
 FROM THE SAME TO THE SAME
 
 
 Churchhill.
 
 
 Little did I imagine, my dear Mother, when I sent off my last letter,
 that the delightful perturbation of spirits I was then in would undergo
 so speedy, so melancholy a reverse. I never can sufficiently regret that
 I wrote to you at all. Yet who could have foreseen what has happened?
 My dear mother, every hope which made me so happy only two hours ago has
 vanished. The quarrel between Lady Susan and Reginald is made up, and we
 are all as we were before. One point only is gained. Sir James Martin is
 dismissed. What are we now to look forward to? I am indeed disappointed;
 Reginald was all but gone, his horse was ordered and all but brought
 to the door; who would not have felt safe? For half an hour I was in
 momentary expectation of his departure. After I had sent off my letter
 to you, I went to Mr. Vernon, and sat with him in his room talking over
 the whole matter, and then determined to look for Frederica, whom I had
 not seen since breakfast. I met her on the stairs, and saw that she was
 crying. "My dear aunt," said she, "he is going--Mr. De Courcy is going,
 and it is all my fault. I am afraid you will be very angry with me, but
 indeed I had no idea it would end so." "My love," I replied, "do not
 think it necessary to apologize to me on that account. I shall feel
 myself under an obligation to anyone who is the means of sending my
 brother home, because," recollecting myself, "I know my father wants
 very much to see him. But what is it you have done to occasion all
--**--**--
 His confusion at seeing me was very evident. Frederica immediately
 disappeared. "Are you going?" I said; "you will find Mr. Vernon in his
 own room." "No, Catherine," he replied, "I am not going. Will you let
 me speak to you a moment?" We went into my room. "I find," he continued,
 his confusion increasing as he spoke, "that I have been acting with my
 usual foolish impetuosity. I have entirely misunderstood Lady Susan, and
 was on the point of leaving the house under a false impression of
 her conduct. There has been some very great mistake; we have been all
 mistaken, I fancy. Frederica does not know her mother. Lady Susan means
 nothing but her good, but she will not make a friend of her. Lady Susan
 does not always know, therefore, what will make her daughter happy.
 Besides, I could have no right to interfere. Miss Vernon was mistaken in
 applying to me. In short, Catherine, everything has gone wrong, but it
 is now all happily settled. Lady Susan, I believe, wishes to speak to
 you about it, if you are at leisure." "Certainly," I replied, deeply
 sighing at the recital of so lame a story. I made no comments, however,
 for words would have been vain.
 
 Reginald was glad to get away, and I went to Lady Susan, curious,
 indeed, to hear her account of it. "Did I not tell you," said she with
 a smile, "that your brother would not leave us after all?" "You did,
 indeed," replied I very gravely; "but I flattered myself you would be
 mistaken." "I should not have hazarded such an opinion," returned she,
 "if it had not at that moment occurred to me that his resolution of
 going might be occasioned by a conversation in which we had been this
--**--**--
 opinion you must have of me! Can you possibly suppose that I was
 aware of her unhappiness! that it was my object to make my own child
 miserable, and that I had forbidden her speaking to you on the subject
 from a fear of your interrupting the diabolical scheme? Do you think
 me destitute of every honest, every natural feeling? Am I capable of
 consigning HER to everlasting misery whose welfare it is my first
 earthly duty to promote? The idea is horrible!" "What, then, was your
 intention when you insisted on her silence?" "Of what use, my dear
 sister, could be any application to you, however the affair might stand?
 Why should I subject you to entreaties which I refused to attend to
 myself? Neither for your sake nor for hers, nor for my own, could such
 a thing be desirable. When my own resolution was taken I could not
 wish for the interference, however friendly, of another person. I was
 mistaken, it is true, but I believed myself right." "But what was this
 mistake to which your ladyship so often alludes! from whence arose so
 astonishing a misconception of your daughter's feelings! Did you not
 know that she disliked Sir James?" "I knew that he was not absolutely
 the man she would have chosen, but I was persuaded that her objections
 to him did not arise from any perception of his deficiency. You must
 not question me, however, my dear sister, too minutely on this point,"
 continued she, taking me affectionately by the hand; "I honestly own
 that there is something to conceal. Frederica makes me very unhappy! Her
 applying to Mr. De Courcy hurt me particularly." "What is it you mean
 to infer," said I, "by this appearance of mystery? If you think your
 daughter at all attached to Reginald, her objecting to Sir James could
--**--**--
 no hope for her. There is not a chance of her affection being returned.
 He thinks very differently of her from what he used to do; he does her
 some justice, but his reconciliation with her mother precludes every
 dearer hope. Prepare, my dear mother, for the worst! The probability of
 their marrying is surely heightened! He is more securely hers than ever.
 When that wretched event takes place, Frederica must belong wholly to
 us. I am thankful that my last letter will precede this by so little, as
 every moment that you can be saved from feeling a joy which leads only
 to disappointment is of consequence.
 
 Yours ever, &c.,
 
 CATHERINE VERNON.
 
 
 
 
 
 XXV
 
 
 LADY SUSAN TO MRS. JOHNSON
 
 
 Churchhill.
 
 
 I call on you, dear Alicia, for congratulations: I am my own self, gay
 and triumphant! When I wrote to you the other day I was, in truth, in
 high irritation, and with ample cause. Nay, I know not whether I ought
 to be quite tranquil now, for I have had more trouble in restoring
 peace than I ever intended to submit to--a spirit, too, resulting from
 a fancied sense of superior integrity, which is peculiarly insolent! I
 shall not easily forgive him, I assure you. He was actually on the point
 of leaving Churchhill! I had scarcely concluded my last, when Wilson
 brought me word of it. I found, therefore, that something must be done;
 for I did not choose to leave my character at the mercy of a man whose
 passions are so violent and so revengeful. It would have been trifling
 with my reputation to allow of his departing with such an impression in
 my disfavour; in this light, condescension was necessary. I sent
 Wilson to say that I desired to speak with him before he went; he came
--**--**--
 spoke! to see the struggle between returning tenderness and the remains
 of displeasure. There is something agreeable in feelings so easily
 worked on; not that I envy him their possession, nor would, for the
 world, have such myself; but they are very convenient when one wishes
 to influence the passions of another. And yet this Reginald, whom a
 very few words from me softened at once into the utmost submission, and
 rendered more tractable, more attached, more devoted than ever, would
 have left me in the first angry swelling of his proud heart without
 deigning to seek an explanation. Humbled as he now is, I cannot forgive
 him such an instance of pride, and am doubtful whether I ought not to
 punish him by dismissing him at once after this reconciliation, or
 by marrying and teazing him for ever. But these measures are each too
 violent to be adopted without some deliberation; at present my thoughts
 are fluctuating between various schemes. I have many things to compass:
 I must punish Frederica, and pretty severely too, for her application to
 Reginald; I must punish him for receiving it so favourably, and for the
 rest of his conduct. I must torment my sister-in-law for the insolent
 triumph of her look and manner since Sir James has been dismissed; for,
 in reconciling Reginald to me, I was not able to save that ill-fated
 young man; and I must make myself amends for the humiliation to which
 I have stooped within these few days. To effect all this I have various
 plans. I have also an idea of being soon in town; and whatever may be
 my determination as to the rest, I shall probably put THAT project
 in execution; for London will be always the fairest field of action,
 however my views may be directed; and at any rate I shall there be
--**--**--
 established by marrying Mr. De Courcy, than to irritate him and the rest
 of his family by making her marry Sir James. You should think more of
 yourself and less of your daughter. She is not of a disposition to do
 you credit in the world, and seems precisely in her proper place at
 Churchhill, with the Vernons. But you are fitted for society, and it
 is shameful to have you exiled from it. Leave Frederica, therefore,
 to punish herself for the plague she has given you, by indulging that
 romantic tender-heartedness which will always ensure her misery enough,
 and come to London as soon as you can. I have another reason for urging
 this: Mainwaring came to town last week, and has contrived, in spite
 of Mr. Johnson, to make opportunities of seeing me. He is absolutely
 miserable about you, and jealous to such a degree of De Courcy that it
 would be highly unadvisable for them to meet at present. And yet, if you
 do not allow him to see you here, I cannot answer for his not committing
 some great imprudence--such as going to Churchhill, for instance, which
 would be dreadful! Besides, if you take my advice, and resolve to marry
 De Courcy, it will be indispensably necessary to you to get Mainwaring
 out of the way; and you only can have influence enough to send him back
 to his wife. I have still another motive for your coming: Mr. Johnson
 leaves London next Tuesday; he is going for his health to Bath, where,
 if the waters are favourable to his constitution and my wishes, he will
 be laid up with the gout many weeks. During his absence we shall be able
 to chuse our own society, and to have true enjoyment. I would ask you to
--**--**--
 I could not bear to have her at the mercy of her mother; not all the
 masters in London could compensate for the ruin of her comfort. I
 should have feared, too, for her health, and for everything but her
 principles--there I believe she is not to be injured by her mother, or
 her mother's friends; but with those friends she must have mixed (a very
 bad set, I doubt not), or have been left in total solitude, and I can
 hardly tell which would have been worse for her. If she is with her
 mother, moreover, she must, alas! in all probability be with Reginald,
 and that would be the greatest evil of all. Here we shall in time be in
 peace, and our regular employments, our books and conversations, with
 exercise, the children, and every domestic pleasure in my power to
 procure her, will, I trust, gradually overcome this youthful attachment.
 I should not have a doubt of it were she slighted for any other woman in
 the world than her own mother. How long Lady Susan will be in town, or
 whether she returns here again, I know not. I could not be cordial in my
 invitation, but if she chuses to come no want of cordiality on my part
 will keep her away. I could not help asking Reginald if he intended
 being in London this winter, as soon as I found her ladyship's
 steps would be bent thither; and though he professed himself quite
 undetermined, there was something in his look and voice as he spoke
 which contradicted his words. I have done with lamentation; I look upon
 the event as so far decided that I resign myself to it in despair. If he
 leaves you soon for London everything will be concluded.
 
 Your affectionate, &c.,
--**--**--
 instead of at Bath that I can scarcely command myself at all. At Bath
 his old aunts would have nursed him, but here it all falls upon me; and
 he bears pain with such patience that I have not the common excuse for
 losing my temper.
 
 Yours ever,
 
 ALICIA.
 
 
 
 
 
 XXIX
 
 
 LADY SUSAN VERNON TO MRS. JOHNSON
 
 
 Upper Seymour Street.
 
 
 My dear Alicia,--There needed not this last fit of the gout to make
 me detest Mr. Johnson, but now the extent of my aversion is not to
 be estimated. To have you confined as nurse in his apartment! My dear
 Alicia, of what a mistake were you guilty in marrying a man of his age!
 just old enough to be formal, ungovernable, and to have the gout; too
 old to be agreeable, too young to die. I arrived last night about five,
 had scarcely swallowed my dinner when Mainwaring made his appearance.
 I will not dissemble what real pleasure his sight afforded me, nor how
 strongly I felt the contrast between his person and manners and those of
 Reginald, to the infinite disadvantage of the latter. For an hour or two
 I was even staggered in my resolution of marrying him, and though this
 was too idle and nonsensical an idea to remain long on my mind, I do not
 feel very eager for the conclusion of my marriage, nor look forward with
 much impatience to the time when Reginald, according to our agreement,
 is to be in town. I shall probably put off his arrival under some
 pretence or other. He must not come till Mainwaring is gone. I am still
 doubtful at times as to marrying; if the old man would die I might not
 hesitate, but a state of dependance on the caprice of Sir Reginald will
--**--**--
 have been unguarded in forming this hasty engagement, but we must not
 complete the imprudence by ratifying it while there is so much reason
 to fear the connection would be opposed by those friends on whom you
 depend. It is not for us to blame any expectations on your father's side
 of your marrying to advantage; where possessions are so extensive as
 those of your family, the wish of increasing them, if not strictly
 reasonable, is too common to excite surprize or resentment. He has a
 right to require; a woman of fortune in his daughter-in-law, and I am
 sometimes quarrelling with myself for suffering you to form a connection
 so imprudent; but the influence of reason is often acknowledged too late
 by those who feel like me. I have now been but a few months a widow,
 and, however little indebted to my husband's memory for any happiness
 derived from him during a union of some years, I cannot forget that the
 indelicacy of so early a second marriage must subject me to the censure
 of the world, and incur, what would be still more insupportable, the
 displeasure of Mr. Vernon. I might perhaps harden myself in time against
 the injustice of general reproach, but the loss of HIS valued esteem
 I am, as you well know, ill-fitted to endure; and when to this may be
 added the consciousness of having injured you with your family, how am I
 to support myself? With feelings so poignant as mine, the conviction of
 having divided the son from his parents would make me, even with you,
 the most miserable of beings. It will surely, therefore, be advisable to
 delay our union--to delay it till appearances are more promising--till
 affairs have taken a more favourable turn. To assist us in such a
--**--**--
 LADY SUSAN TO MRS. JOHNSON
 
 
 Upper Seymour Street.
 
 
 My dear Friend,--That tormenting creature, Reginald, is here. My letter,
 which was intended to keep him longer in the country, has hastened him
 to town. Much as I wish him away, however, I cannot help being pleased
 with such a proof of attachment. He is devoted to me, heart and soul.
 He will carry this note himself, which is to serve as an introduction to
 you, with whom he longs to be acquainted. Allow him to spend the evening
 with you, that I may be in no danger of his returning here. I have told
 him that I am not quite well, and must be alone; and should he call
 again there might be confusion, for it is impossible to be sure of
 servants. Keep him, therefore, I entreat you, in Edward Street. You will
 not find him a heavy companion, and I allow you to flirt with him as
 much as you like. At the same time, do not forget my real interest; say
 all that you can to convince him that I shall be quite wretched if he
 remains here; you know my reasons--propriety, and so forth. I would
 urge them more myself, but that I am impatient to be rid of him, as
 Mainwaring comes within half an hour. Adieu!
 
 S VERNON
 
 
 
 
 
 XXXII
 
 
 MRS. JOHNSON TO LADY SUSAN
 
 
 Edward Street.
 
 
 My dear Creature,--I am in agonies, and know not what to do. Mr. De
 Courcy arrived just when he should not. Mrs. Mainwaring had that instant
 entered the house, and forced herself into her guardian's presence,
 though I did not know a syllable of it till afterwards, for I was out
 when both she and Reginald came, or I should have sent him away at all
 events; but she was shut up with Mr. Johnson, while he waited in the
--**--**--
 
 
 This eclaircissement is rather provoking. How unlucky that you should
 have been from home! I thought myself sure of you at seven! I am
 undismayed however. Do not torment yourself with fears on my account;
 depend on it, I can make my story good with Reginald. Mainwaring is just
 gone; he brought me the news of his wife's arrival. Silly woman, what
 does she expect by such manoeuvres? Yet I wish she had stayed quietly
 at Langford. Reginald will be a little enraged at first, but by
 to-morrow's dinner, everything will be well again.
 
 Adieu!
 
 S. V.
 
 
 
 
 
 XXXIV
 
 
 MR. DE COURCY TO LADY SUSAN
 
 
 --Hotel
 
 
 I write only to bid you farewell, the spell is removed; I see you as
 you are. Since we parted yesterday, I have received from indisputable
 authority such a history of you as must bring the most mortifying
 conviction of the imposition I have been under, and the absolute
 necessity of an immediate and eternal separation from you. You
 cannot doubt to what I allude. Langford! Langford! that word will be
 sufficient. I received my information in Mr. Johnson's house, from Mrs.
 Mainwaring herself. You know how I have loved you; you can intimately
 judge of my present feelings, but I am not so weak as to find indulgence
 in describing them to a woman who will glory in having excited their
 anguish, but whose affection they have never been able to gain.
 
 R. DE COURCY.
 
 
 
 
 
 XXXV
 
 
 LADY SUSAN TO MR. DE COURCY
 
 
 Upper Seymour Street.
 
 
 I will not attempt to describe my astonishment in reading the note this
 moment received from you. I am bewildered in my endeavours to form
 some rational conjecture of what Mrs. Mainwaring can have told you
 to occasion so extraordinary a change in your sentiments. Have I not
--**--**--
 existed, and still continues to exist, between you and the man whose
 family you robbed of its peace in return for the hospitality with which
 you were received into it; that you have corresponded with him ever
 since your leaving Langford; not with his wife, but with him, and that
 he now visits you every day. Can you, dare you deny it? and all this at
 the time when I was an encouraged, an accepted lover! From what have I
 not escaped! I have only to be grateful. Far from me be all complaint,
 every sigh of regret. My own folly had endangered me, my preservation I
 owe to the kindness, the integrity of another; but the unfortunate Mrs.
 Mainwaring, whose agonies while she related the past seemed to threaten
 her reason, how is SHE to be consoled! After such a discovery as this,
 you will scarcely affect further wonder at my meaning in bidding you
 adieu. My understanding is at length restored, and teaches no less to
 abhor the artifices which had subdued me than to despise myself for the
 weakness on which their strength was founded.
 
 R. DE COURCY.
 
 
 
 
 
 XXXVII
 
 
 LADY SUSAN TO MR. DE COURCY
 
 
 Upper Seymour Street.
 
 
 I am satisfied, and will trouble you no more when these few lines are
 dismissed. The engagement which you were eager to form a fortnight ago
 is no longer compatible with your views, and I rejoice to find that
 the prudent advice of your parents has not been given in vain. Your
 restoration to peace will, I doubt not, speedily follow this act of
 filial obedience, and I flatter myself with the hope of surviving my
 share in this disappointment.
 
 S. V.
 
 
 
 
 
 XXXVIII
 
 
 MRS. JOHNSON TO LADY SUSAN VERNON
 
 
 Edward Street
 
 
 I am grieved, though I cannot be astonished at your rupture with Mr.
--**--**--
 ever. For this I shall impatiently wait, and meanwhile can safely assure
 you that I never was more at ease, or better satisfied with myself and
 everything about me than at the present hour. Your husband I abhor,
 Reginald I despise, and I am secure of never seeing either again. Have
 I not reason to rejoice? Mainwaring is more devoted to me than ever; and
 were we at liberty, I doubt if I could resist even matrimony offered by
 HIM. This event, if his wife live with you, it may be in your power to
 hasten. The violence of her feelings, which must wear her out, may be
 easily kept in irritation. I rely on your friendship for this. I am now
 satisfied that I never could have brought myself to marry Reginald, and
 am equally determined that Frederica never shall. To-morrow, I shall
 fetch her from Churchhill, and let Maria Mainwaring tremble for the
 consequence. Frederica shall be Sir James's wife before she quits my
 house, and she may whimper, and the Vernons may storm, I regard them
 not. I am tired of submitting my will to the caprices of others; of
 resigning my own judgment in deference to those to whom I owe no duty,
 and for whom I feel no respect. I have given up too much, have been too
 easily worked on, but Frederica shall now feel the difference. Adieu,
 dearest of friends; may the next gouty attack be more favourable! and
 may you always regard me as unalterably yours,
 
 S. VERNON
 
 
 
 
 
 XL
 
 
 LADY DE COURCY TO MRS. VERNON
 
 
 My dear Catherine,--I have charming news for you, and if I had not sent
 off my letter this morning you might have been spared the vexation of
 knowing of Reginald's being gone to London, for he is returned. Reginald
--**--**--
 true that they are really separated--and for ever? I should be overjoyed
 if I dared depend on it, but after all that I have seen how can one be
 secure. And Reginald really with you! My surprize is the greater because
 on Wednesday, the very day of his coming to Parklands, we had a most
 unexpected and unwelcome visit from Lady Susan, looking all cheerfulness
 and good-humour, and seeming more as if she were to marry him when she
 got to London than as if parted from him for ever. She stayed nearly two
 hours, was as affectionate and agreeable as ever, and not a syllable,
 not a hint was dropped, of any disagreement or coolness between them.
 I asked her whether she had seen my brother since his arrival in town;
 not, as you may suppose, with any doubt of the fact, but merely to see
 how she looked. She immediately answered, without any embarrassment,
 that he had been kind enough to call on her on Monday; but she believed
 he had already returned home, which I was very far from crediting. Your
 kind invitation is accepted by us with pleasure, and on Thursday next we
 and our little ones will be with you. Pray heaven, Reginald may not be
 in town again by that time! I wish we could bring dear Frederica too,
 but I am sorry to say that her mother's errand hither was to fetch her
 away; and, miserable as it made the poor girl, it was impossible to
 detain her. I was thoroughly unwilling to let her go, and so was her
 uncle; and all that could be urged we did urge; but Lady Susan declared
 that as she was now about to fix herself in London for several months,
 she could not be easy if her daughter were not with her for masters,
--**--**--
 unattempted that might offer a chance of obtaining her sister-in-law's
 consent to it. Her anxiety on the subject made her press for an early
 visit to London; and Mr. Vernon, who, as it must already have appeared,
 lived only to do whatever he was desired, soon found some accommodating
 business to call him thither. With a heart full of the matter, Mrs.
 Vernon waited on Lady Susan shortly after her arrival in town, and was
 met with such an easy and cheerful affection, as made her almost turn
 from her with horror. No remembrance of Reginald, no consciousness of
 guilt, gave one look of embarrassment; she was in excellent spirits, and
 seemed eager to show at once by ever possible attention to her brother
 and sister her sense of their kindness, and her pleasure in their
 society. Frederica was no more altered than Lady Susan; the same
 restrained manners, the same timid look in the presence of her mother as
 heretofore, assured her aunt of her situation being uncomfortable, and
 confirmed her in the plan of altering it. No unkindness, however, on the
 part of Lady Susan appeared. Persecution on the subject of Sir James was
 entirely at an end; his name merely mentioned to say that he was not in
 London; and indeed, in all her conversation, she was solicitous only for
 the welfare and improvement of her daughter, acknowledging, in terms of
 grateful delight, that Frederica was now growing every day more and more
 what a parent could desire. Mrs. Vernon, surprized and incredulous,
 knew not what to suspect, and, without any change in her own views,
 only feared greater difficulty in accomplishing them. The first hope
 of anything better was derived from Lady Susan's asking her whether she
 thought Frederica looked quite as well as she had done at Churchhill, as
--**--**--
 to an expense in clothes which impoverished her for two years, on
 purpose to secure him, was defrauded of her due by a woman ten years
 older than herself.
 
--**--**--
 Musgrove; but Anne, with an elegance of mind and sweetness of
 character, which must have placed her high with any people of real
 understanding, was nobody with either father or sister; her word had no
 weight, her convenience was always to give way--she was only Anne.
 
 To Lady Russell, indeed, she was a most dear and highly valued
 god-daughter, favourite, and friend.  Lady Russell loved them all; but
 it was only in Anne that she could fancy the mother to revive again.
 
 A few years before, Anne Elliot had been a very pretty girl, but her
 bloom had vanished early; and as even in its height, her father had
 found little to admire in her, (so totally different were her delicate
 features and mild dark eyes from his own), there could be nothing in
 them, now that she was faded and thin, to excite his esteem. He had
 never indulged much hope, he had now none, of ever reading her name in
 any other page of his favourite work.  All equality of alliance must
 rest with Elizabeth, for Mary had merely connected herself with an old
 country family of respectability and large fortune, and had therefore
 given all the honour and received none: Elizabeth would, one day or
 other, marry suitably.
 
 It sometimes happens that a woman is handsomer at twenty-nine than she
 was ten years before; and, generally speaking, if there has been
 neither ill health nor anxiety, it is a time of life at which scarcely
 any charm is lost.  It was so with Elizabeth, still the same handsome
 Miss Elliot that she had begun to be thirteen years ago, and Sir Walter
 might be excused, therefore, in forgetting her age, or, at least, be
 deemed only half a fool, for thinking himself and Elizabeth as blooming
--**--**--
 Commons."  His disapprobation was expressed, but apparently very little
 regarded.  Mr Elliot had attempted no apology, and shewn himself as
 unsolicitous of being longer noticed by the family, as Sir Walter
 considered him unworthy of it:  all acquaintance between them had
 ceased.
 
 This very awkward history of Mr Elliot was still, after an interval of
 several years, felt with anger by Elizabeth, who had liked the man for
 himself, and still more for being her father's heir, and whose strong
 family pride could see only in him a proper match for Sir Walter
 Elliot's eldest daughter.  There was not a baronet from A to Z whom her
 feelings could have so willingly acknowledged as an equal.  Yet so
 miserably had he conducted himself, that though she was at this present
 time (the summer of 1814) wearing black ribbons for his wife, she could
 not admit him to be worth thinking of again.  The disgrace of his first
 marriage might, perhaps, as there was no reason to suppose it
 perpetuated by offspring, have been got over, had he not done worse;
 but he had, as by the accustomary intervention of kind friends, they
 had been informed, spoken most disrespectfully of them all, most
 slightingly and contemptuously of the very blood he belonged to, and
 the honours which were hereafter to be his own.  This could not be
 pardoned.
 
 Such were Elizabeth Elliot's sentiments and sensations; such the cares
 to alloy, the agitations to vary, the sameness and the elegance, the
 prosperity and the nothingness of her scene of life; such the feelings
 to give interest to a long, uneventful residence in one country circle,
 to fill the vacancies which there were no habits of utility abroad, no
 talents or accomplishments for home, to occupy.
 
 But now, another occupation and solicitude of mind was beginning to be
--**--**--
 
 How Anne's more rigid requisitions might have been taken is of little
 consequence.  Lady Russell's had no success at all: could not be put up
 with, were not to be borne. "What! every comfort of life knocked off!
 Journeys, London, servants, horses, table--contractions and
 restrictions every where!  To live no longer with the decencies even of
 a private gentleman!  No, he would sooner quit Kellynch Hall at once,
 than remain in it on such disgraceful terms."
 
 "Quit Kellynch Hall."  The hint was immediately taken up by Mr
 Shepherd, whose interest was involved in the reality of Sir Walter's
 retrenching, and who was perfectly persuaded that nothing would be done
 without a change of abode.  "Since the idea had been started in the
 very quarter which ought to dictate, he had no scruple," he said, "in
 confessing his judgement to be entirely on that side.  It did not
 appear to him that Sir Walter could materially alter his style of
 living in a house which had such a character of hospitality and ancient
 dignity to support.  In any other place Sir Walter might judge for
 himself; and would be looked up to, as regulating the modes of life in
 whatever way he might choose to model his household."
 
 Sir Walter would quit Kellynch Hall; and after a very few days more of
 doubt and indecision, the great question of whither he should go was
 settled, and the first outline of this important change made out.
 
 There had been three alternatives, London, Bath, or another house in
 the country.  All Anne's wishes had been for the latter.  A small house
 in their own neighbourhood, where they might still have Lady Russell's
 society, still be near Mary, and still have the pleasure of sometimes
 seeing the lawns and groves of Kellynch, was the object of her
--**--**--
 been lately forming an intimacy, which she wished to see interrupted.
 It was with the daughter of Mr Shepherd, who had returned, after an
 unprosperous marriage, to her father's house, with the additional
 burden of two children.  She was a clever young woman, who understood
 the art of pleasing--the art of pleasing, at least, at Kellynch Hall;
 and who had made herself so acceptable to Miss Elliot, as to have been
 already staying there more than once, in spite of all that Lady
 Russell, who thought it a friendship quite out of place, could hint of
 caution and reserve.
 
 Lady Russell, indeed, had scarcely any influence with Elizabeth, and
 seemed to love her, rather because she would love her, than because
 Elizabeth deserved it.  She had never received from her more than
 outward attention, nothing beyond the observances of complaisance; had
 never succeeded in any point which she wanted to carry, against
 previous inclination.  She had been repeatedly very earnest in trying
 to get Anne included in the visit to London, sensibly open to all the
 injustice and all the discredit of the selfish arrangements which shut
 her out, and on many lesser occasions had endeavoured to give Elizabeth
 the advantage of her own better judgement and experience; but always in
 vain:  Elizabeth would go her own way; and never had she pursued it in
 more decided opposition to Lady Russell than in this selection of Mrs
 Clay; turning from the society of so deserving a sister, to bestow her
 affection and confidence on one who ought to have been nothing to her
 but the object of distant civility.
 
 From situation, Mrs Clay was, in Lady Russell's estimate, a very
 unequal, and in her character she believed a very dangerous companion;
 and a removal that would leave Mrs Clay behind, and bring a choice of
--**--**--
 to give place to Lord St Ives, and a certain Admiral Baldwin, the most
 deplorable-looking personage you can imagine; his face the colour of
 mahogany, rough and rugged to the last degree; all lines and wrinkles,
 nine grey hairs of a side, and nothing but a dab of powder at top.  'In
 the name of heaven, who is that old fellow?' said I to a friend of mine
 who was standing near, (Sir Basil Morley).  'Old fellow!' cried Sir
 Basil, 'it is Admiral Baldwin.  What do you take his age to be?'
 'Sixty,' said I, 'or perhaps sixty-two.' 'Forty,' replied Sir Basil,
 'forty, and no more.'  Picture to yourselves my amazement; I shall not
 easily forget Admiral Baldwin.  I never saw quite so wretched an
 example of what a sea-faring life can do; but to a degree, I know it is
 the same with them all:  they are all knocked about, and exposed to
 every climate, and every weather, till they are not fit to be seen.  It
 is a pity they are not knocked on the head at once, before they reach
 Admiral Baldwin's age."
 
 "Nay, Sir Walter," cried Mrs Clay, "this is being severe indeed.  Have
 a little mercy on the poor men.  We are not all born to be handsome.
 The sea is no beautifier, certainly; sailors do grow old betimes; I
 have observed it; they soon lose the look of youth.  But then, is not
 it the same with many other professions, perhaps most other?  Soldiers,
 in active service, are not at all better off:  and even in the quieter
 professions, there is a toil and a labour of the mind, if not of the
 body, which seldom leaves a man's looks to the natural effect of time.
 The lawyer plods, quite care-worn; the physician is up at all hours,
--**--**--
 terms, he was talked into allowing Mr Shepherd to proceed in the
 treaty, and authorising him to wait on Admiral Croft, who still
 remained at Taunton, and fix a day for the house being seen.
 
 Sir Walter was not very wise; but still he had experience enough of the
 world to feel, that a more unobjectionable tenant, in all essentials,
 than Admiral Croft bid fair to be, could hardly offer.  So far went his
 understanding; and his vanity supplied a little additional soothing, in
 the Admiral's situation in life, which was just high enough, and not
 too high.  "I have let my house to Admiral Croft," would sound
 extremely well; very much better than to any mere Mr--; a Mr (save,
 perhaps, some half dozen in the nation,) always needs a note of
 explanation.  An admiral speaks his own consequence, and, at the same
 time, can never make a baronet look small.  In all their dealings and
 intercourse, Sir Walter Elliot must ever have the precedence.
 
 Nothing could be done without a reference to Elizabeth: but her
 inclination was growing so strong for a removal, that she was happy to
 have it fixed and expedited by a tenant at hand; and not a word to
 suspend decision was uttered by her.
 
 Mr Shepherd was completely empowered to act; and no sooner had such an
 end been reached, than Anne, who had been a most attentive listener to
 the whole, left the room, to seek the comfort of cool air for her
 flushed cheeks; and as she walked along a favourite grove, said, with a
 gentle sigh, "A few months more, and he, perhaps, may be walking here."
 
 
 
 Chapter 4
 
 
 He was not Mr Wentworth, the former curate of Monkford, however
 suspicious appearances may be, but a Captain Frederick Wentworth, his
--**--**--
 happened, would have bestowed earlier prosperity than could be
 reasonably calculated on.  All his sanguine expectations, all his
 confidence had been justified.  His genius and ardour had seemed to
 foresee and to command his prosperous path.  He had, very soon after
 their engagement ceased, got employ: and all that he had told her would
 follow, had taken place.  He had distinguished himself, and early
 gained the other step in rank, and must now, by successive captures,
 have made a handsome fortune.  She had only navy lists and newspapers
 for her authority, but she could not doubt his being rich; and, in
 favour of his constancy, she had no reason to believe him married.
 
 How eloquent could Anne Elliot have been! how eloquent, at least, were
 her wishes on the side of early warm attachment, and a cheerful
 confidence in futurity, against that over-anxious caution which seems
 to insult exertion and distrust Providence!  She had been forced into
 prudence in her youth, she learned romance as she grew older: the
 natural sequel of an unnatural beginning.
 
 With all these circumstances, recollections and feelings, she could not
 hear that Captain Wentworth's sister was likely to live at Kellynch
 without a revival of former pain; and many a stroll, and many a sigh,
 were necessary to dispel the agitation of the idea.  She often told
 herself it was folly, before she could harden her nerves sufficiently
 to feel the continual discussion of the Crofts and their business no
 evil.  She was assisted, however, by that perfect indifference and
 apparent unconsciousness, among the only three of her own friends in
 the secret of the past, which seemed almost to deny any recollection of
 it.  She could do justice to the superiority of Lady Russell's motives
 in this, over those of her father and Elizabeth; she could honour all
--**--**--
 
 To be claimed as a good, though in an improper style, is at least
 better than being rejected as no good at all; and Anne, glad to be
 thought of some use, glad to have anything marked out as a duty, and
 certainly not sorry to have the scene of it in the country, and her own
 dear country, readily agreed to stay.
 
 This invitation of Mary's removed all Lady Russell's difficulties, and
 it was consequently soon settled that Anne should not go to Bath till
 Lady Russell took her, and that all the intervening time should be
 divided between Uppercross Cottage and Kellynch Lodge.
 
 So far all was perfectly right; but Lady Russell was almost startled by
 the wrong of one part of the Kellynch Hall plan, when it burst on her,
 which was, Mrs Clay's being engaged to go to Bath with Sir Walter and
 Elizabeth, as a most important and valuable assistant to the latter in
 all the business before her.  Lady Russell was extremely sorry that
 such a measure should have been resorted to at all, wondered, grieved,
 and feared; and the affront it contained to Anne, in Mrs Clay's being
 of so much use, while Anne could be of none, was a very sore
 aggravation.
 
 Anne herself was become hardened to such affronts; but she felt the
 imprudence of the arrangement quite as keenly as Lady Russell.  With a
 great deal of quiet observation, and a knowledge, which she often
 wished less, of her father's character, she was sensible that results
 the most serious to his family from the intimacy were more than
 possible.  She did not imagine that her father had at present an idea
 of the kind.  Mrs Clay had freckles, and a projecting tooth, and a
 clumsy wrist, which he was continually making severe remarks upon, in
--**--**--
 been completely in the old English style, containing only two houses
 superior in appearance to those of the yeomen and labourers; the
 mansion of the squire, with its high walls, great gates, and old trees,
 substantial and unmodernized, and the compact, tight parsonage,
 enclosed in its own neat garden, with a vine and a pear-tree trained
 round its casements; but upon the marriage of the young 'squire, it had
 received the improvement of a farm-house elevated into a cottage, for
 his residence, and Uppercross Cottage, with its veranda, French
 windows, and other prettiness, was quite as likely to catch the
 traveller's eye as the more consistent and considerable aspect and
 premises of the Great House, about a quarter of a mile farther on.
 
 Here Anne had often been staying. She knew the ways of Uppercross as
 well as those of Kellynch. The two families were so continually
 meeting, so much in the habit of running in and out of each other's
 house at all hours, that it was rather a surprise to her to find Mary
 alone; but being alone, her being unwell and out of spirits was almost
 a matter of course. Though better endowed than the elder sister, Mary
 had not Anne's understanding nor temper. While well, and happy, and
 properly attended to, she had great good humour and excellent spirits;
 but any indisposition sunk her completely. She had no resources for
 solitude; and inheriting a considerable share of the Elliot
 self-importance, was very prone to add to every other distress that of
 fancying herself neglected and ill-used. In person, she was inferior to
 both sisters, and had, even in her bloom, only reached the dignity of
 being "a fine girl." She was now lying on the faded sofa of the pretty
 little drawing-room, the once elegant furniture of which had been
--**--**--
 Anne's side produced nearly a cure on Mary's.  She could soon sit
 upright on the sofa, and began to hope she might be able to leave it by
 dinner-time.  Then, forgetting to think of it, she was at the other end
 of the room, beautifying a nosegay; then, she ate her cold meat; and
 then she was well enough to propose a little walk.
 
 "Where shall we go?" said she, when they were ready.  "I suppose you
 will not like to call at the Great House before they have been to see
 you?"
 
 "I have not the smallest objection on that account," replied Anne.  "I
 should never think of standing on such ceremony with people I know so
 well as Mrs and the Miss Musgroves."
 
 "Oh! but they ought to call upon you as soon as possible.  They ought
 to feel what is due to you as my sister.  However, we may as well go
 and sit with them a little  while, and when we have that over, we can
 enjoy our walk."
 
 Anne had always thought such a style of intercourse highly imprudent;
 but she had ceased to endeavour to check it, from believing that,
 though there were on each side continual subjects of offence, neither
 family could now do without it.  To the Great House accordingly they
 went, to sit the full half hour in the old-fashioned square parlour,
 with a small carpet and shining floor, to which the present daughters
 of the house were gradually giving the proper air of confusion by a
 grand piano-forte and a harp, flower-stands and little tables placed in
 every direction.  Oh! could the originals of the portraits against the
 wainscot, could the gentlemen in brown velvet and the ladies in blue
 satin have seen what was going on, have been conscious of such an
--**--**--
 
 She had no dread of these two months.  Mary was not so repulsive and
 unsisterly as Elizabeth, nor so inaccessible to all influence of hers;
 neither was there anything among the other component parts of the
 cottage inimical to comfort.  She was always on friendly terms with her
 brother-in-law; and in the children, who loved her nearly as well, and
 respected her a great deal more than their mother, she had an object of
 interest, amusement, and wholesome exertion.
 
 Charles Musgrove was civil and agreeable; in sense and temper he was
 undoubtedly superior to his wife, but not of powers, or conversation,
 or grace, to make the past, as they were connected together, at all a
 dangerous contemplation; though, at the same time, Anne could believe,
 with Lady Russell, that a more equal match might have greatly improved
 him; and that a woman of real understanding might have given more
 consequence to his character, and more usefulness, rationality, and
 elegance to his habits and pursuits.  As it was, he did nothing with
 much zeal, but sport; and his time was otherwise trifled away, without
 benefit from books or anything else.  He had very good spirits, which
 never seemed much affected by his wife's occasional lowness, bore with
 her unreasonableness sometimes to Anne's admiration, and upon the
 whole, though there was very often a little disagreement (in which she
 had sometimes more share than she wished, being appealed to by both
 parties), they might pass for a happy couple.  They were always
 perfectly agreed in the want of more money, and a strong inclination
 for a handsome present from his father; but here, as on most topics, he
 had the superiority, for while Mary thought it a great shame that such
 a present was not made, he always contended for his father's having
--**--**--
 only keep in tolerable order by more cake than is good for them."
 
 She had this communication, moreover, from Mary.  "Mrs Musgrove thinks
 all her servants so steady, that it would be high treason to call it in
 question; but I am sure, without exaggeration, that her upper
 house-maid and laundry-maid, instead of being in their business, are
 gadding about the village, all day long.  I meet them wherever I go;
 and I declare, I never go twice into my nursery without seeing
 something of them.  If Jemima were not the trustiest, steadiest
 creature in the world, it would be enough to spoil her; for she tells
 me, they are always tempting her to take a walk with them." And on Mrs
 Musgrove's side, it was, "I make a rule of never interfering in any of
 my daughter-in-law's concerns, for I know it would not do; but I shall
 tell you, Miss Anne, because you may be able to set things to rights,
 that I have no very good opinion of Mrs Charles's nursery-maid: I hear
 strange stories of her; she is always upon the gad; and from my own
 knowledge, I can declare, she is such a fine-dressing lady, that she is
 enough to ruin any servants she comes near.  Mrs Charles quite swears
 by her, I know; but I just give you this hint, that you may be upon the
 watch; because, if you see anything amiss, you need not be afraid of
 mentioning it."
 
 Again, it was Mary's complaint, that Mrs Musgrove was very apt not to
 give her the precedence that was her due, when they dined at the Great
 House with other families; and she did not see any reason why she was
 to be considered so much at home as to lose her place.  And one day
--**--**--
 much engrossed by proposals of carrying them away in his coat pockets,
 &c., to have another moment for finishing or recollecting what he had
 begun, Anne was left to persuade herself, as well as she could, that
 the same brother must still be in question.  She could not, however,
 reach such a degree of certainty, as not to be anxious to hear whether
 anything had been said on the subject at the other house, where the
 Crofts had previously been calling.
 
 The folks of the Great House were to spend the evening of this day at
 the Cottage; and it being now too late in the year for such visits to
 be made on foot, the coach was beginning to be listened for, when the
 youngest Miss Musgrove walked in.  That she was coming to apologize,
 and that they should have to spend the evening by themselves, was the
 first black idea; and Mary was quite ready to be affronted, when Louisa
 made all right by saying, that she only came on foot, to leave more
 room for the harp, which was bringing in the carriage.
 
 "And I will tell you our reason," she added, "and all about it.  I am
 come on to give you notice, that papa and mamma are out of spirits this
 evening, especially mamma; she is thinking so much of poor Richard!
 And we agreed it would be best to have the harp, for it seems to amuse
 her more than the piano-forte.  I will tell you why she is out of
 spirits.  When the Crofts called this morning, (they called here
 afterwards, did not they?), they happened to say, that her brother,
 Captain Wentworth, is just returned to England, or paid off, or
 something, and is coming to see them almost directly; and most
--**--**--
 and felt, and rubbed, and looked grave, and spoke low words both to the
 father and the aunt, still they were all to hope the best, and to be
 able to part and eat their dinner in tolerable ease of mind; and then
 it was, just before they parted, that the two young aunts were able so
 far to digress from their nephew's state, as to give the information of
 Captain Wentworth's visit; staying five minutes behind their father and
 mother, to endeavour to express how perfectly delighted they were with
 him, how much handsomer, how infinitely more agreeable they thought him
 than any individual among their male acquaintance, who had been at all
 a favourite before.  How glad they had been to hear papa invite him to
 stay dinner, how sorry when he said it was quite out of his power, and
 how glad again when he had promised in reply to papa and mamma's
 farther pressing invitations to come and dine with them on the
 morrow--actually on the morrow; and he had promised it in so pleasant a
 manner, as if he felt all the motive of their attention just as he
 ought.  And in short, he had looked and said everything with such
 exquisite grace, that they could assure them all, their heads were both
 turned by him; and off they ran, quite as full of glee as of love, and
 apparently more full of Captain Wentworth than of little Charles.
 
 The same story and the same raptures were repeated, when the two girls
 came with their father, through the gloom of the evening, to make
 enquiries; and Mr Musgrove, no longer under the first uneasiness about
 his heir, could add his confirmation and praise, and hope there would
 be now no occasion for putting Captain Wentworth off, and only be sorry
--**--**--
 nothing to distress us.  I perfectly understand Mr Robinson's
 directions, and have no fears; and indeed, Mary, I cannot wonder at
 your husband.  Nursing does not belong to a man; it is not his
 province.  A sick child is always the mother's property:  her own
 feelings generally make it so."
 
 "I hope I am as fond of my child as any mother, but I do not know that
 I am of any more use in the sick-room than Charles, for I cannot be
 always scolding and teazing the poor child when it is ill; and you saw,
 this morning, that if I told him to keep quiet, he was sure to begin
 kicking about.  I have not nerves for the sort of thing."
 
 "But, could you be comfortable yourself, to be spending the whole
 evening away from the poor boy?"
 
 "Yes; you see his papa can, and why should not I?  Jemima is so
 careful; and she could send us word every hour how he was.  I really
 think Charles might as well have told his father we would all come.  I
 am not more alarmed about little Charles now than he is.  I was
 dreadfully alarmed yesterday, but the case is very different to-day."
 
 "Well, if you do not think it too late to give notice for yourself,
 suppose you were to go, as well as your husband.  Leave little Charles
 to my care.  Mr and Mrs Musgrove cannot think it wrong while I remain
 with him."
 
 "Are you serious?" cried Mary, her eyes brightening.  "Dear me!  that's
 a very good thought, very good, indeed.  To be sure, I may just as well
 go as not, for I am of no use at home--am I?  and it only harasses me.
 You, who have not a mother's feelings, are a great deal the properest
--**--**--
 
 "Captain Wentworth is not very gallant by you, Anne, though he was so
 attentive to me.  Henrietta asked him what he thought of you, when they
 went away, and he said, 'You were so altered he should not have known
 you again.'"
 
 Mary had no feelings to make her respect her sister's in a common way,
 but she was perfectly unsuspicious of being inflicting any peculiar
 wound.
 
 "Altered beyond his knowledge."  Anne fully submitted, in silent, deep
 mortification.  Doubtless it was so, and she could take no revenge, for
 he was not altered, or not for the worse.  She had already acknowledged
 it to herself, and she could not think differently, let him think of
 her as he would.  No:  the years which had destroyed her youth and
 bloom had only given him a more glowing, manly, open look, in no
 respect lessening his personal advantages.  She had seen the same
 Frederick Wentworth.
 
 "So altered that he should not have known her again!"  These were words
 which could not but dwell with her.  Yet she soon began to rejoice that
 she had heard them.  They were of sobering tendency; they allayed
 agitation; they composed, and consequently must make her happier.
 
 Frederick Wentworth had used such words, or something like them, but
 without an idea that they would be carried round to her.  He had
 thought her wretchedly altered, and in the first moment of appeal, had
 spoken as he felt.  He had not forgiven Anne Elliot.  She had used him
 ill, deserted and disappointed him; and worse, she had shewn a
 feebleness of character in doing so, which his own decided, confident
 temper could not endure.  She had given him up to oblige others.  It
 had been the effect of over-persuasion.  It had been weakness and
 timidity.
 
 He had been most warmly attached to her, and had never seen a woman
--**--**--
 Whether former feelings were to be renewed must be brought to the
 proof; former times must undoubtedly be brought to the recollection of
 each; they could not but be reverted to; the year of their engagement
 could not but be named by him, in the little narratives or descriptions
 which conversation called forth.  His profession qualified him, his
 disposition lead him, to talk; and "That was in the year six;" "That
 happened before I went to sea in the year six," occurred in the course
 of the first evening they spent together: and though his voice did not
 falter, and though she had no reason to suppose his eye wandering
 towards her while he spoke, Anne felt the utter impossibility, from her
 knowledge of his mind, that he could be unvisited by remembrance any
 more than herself.  There must be the same immediate association of
 thought, though she was very far from conceiving it to be of equal pain.
 
 They had no conversation together, no intercourse but what the
 commonest civility required.  Once so much to each other!  Now nothing!
 There had been a time, when of all the large party now filling the
 drawing-room at Uppercross, they would have found it most difficult to
 cease to speak to one another.  With the exception, perhaps, of Admiral
 and Mrs Croft, who seemed particularly attached and happy, (Anne could
 allow no other exceptions even among the married couples), there could
 have been no two hearts so open, no tastes so similar, no feelings so
 in unison, no countenances so beloved.  Now they were as strangers;
 nay, worse than strangers, for they could never become acquainted.  It
 was a perpetual estrangement.
 
 When he talked, she heard the same voice, and discerned the same mind.
 There was a very general ignorance of all naval matters throughout the
--**--**--
 The girls were now hunting for the Laconia; and Captain Wentworth could
 not deny himself the pleasure of taking the precious volume into his
 own hands to save them the trouble, and once more read aloud the little
 statement of her name and rate, and present non-commissioned class,
 observing over it that she too had been one of the best friends man
 ever had.
 
 "Ah! those were pleasant days when I had the Laconia!  How fast I made
 money in her.  A friend of mine and I had such a lovely cruise together
 off the Western Islands.  Poor Harville, sister!  You know how much he
 wanted money:  worse than myself.  He had a wife.  Excellent fellow.  I
 shall never forget his happiness.  He felt it all, so much for her
 sake.  I wished for him again the next summer, when I had still the
 same luck in the Mediterranean."
 
 "And I am sure, Sir," said Mrs Musgrove, "it was a lucky day for us,
 when you were put captain into that ship.  We shall never forget what
 you did."
 
 Her feelings made her speak low; and Captain Wentworth, hearing only in
 part, and probably not having Dick Musgrove at all near his thoughts,
 looked rather in suspense, and as if waiting for more.
 
 "My brother," whispered one of the girls; "mamma is thinking of poor
 Richard."
 
 "Poor dear fellow!" continued Mrs Musgrove; "he was grown so steady,
 and such an excellent correspondent, while he was under your care!  Ah!
 it would have been a happy thing, if he had never left you.  I assure
 you, Captain Wentworth, we are very sorry he ever left you."
 
 There was a momentary expression in Captain Wentworth's face at this
 speech, a certain glance of his bright eye, and curl of his handsome
--**--**--
 and this is what I do.  I hate to hear of women on board, or to see
 them on board; and no ship under my command shall ever convey a family
 of ladies anywhere, if I can help it."
 
 This brought his sister upon him.
 
 "Oh! Frederick!  But I cannot believe it of you.--All idle
 refinement!--Women may be as comfortable on board, as in the best house
 in England.  I believe I have lived as much on board as most women, and
 I know nothing superior to the accommodations of a man-of-war.  I
 declare I have not a comfort or an indulgence about me, even at
 Kellynch Hall," (with a kind bow to Anne), "beyond what I always had in
 most of the ships I have lived in; and they have been five altogether."
 
 "Nothing to the purpose," replied her brother.  "You were living with
 your husband, and were the only woman on board."
 
 "But you, yourself, brought Mrs Harville, her sister, her cousin, and
 three children, round from Portsmouth to Plymouth.  Where was this
 superfine, extraordinary sort of gallantry of yours then?"
 
 "All merged in my friendship, Sophia.  I would assist any brother
 officer's wife that I could, and I would bring anything of Harville's
 from the world's end, if he wanted it.  But do not imagine that I did
 not feel it an evil in itself."
 
 "Depend upon it, they were all perfectly comfortable."
 
 "I might not like them the better for that perhaps.  Such a number of
 women and children have no right to be comfortable on board."
 
 "My dear Frederick, you are talking quite idly.  Pray, what would
 become of us poor sailors' wives, who often want to be conveyed to one
 port or another, after our husbands, if everybody had your feelings?"
 
 "My feelings, you see, did not prevent my taking Mrs Harville and all
--**--**--
 "Aye, to be sure.  Yes, indeed, oh yes!  I am quite of your opinion,
 Mrs Croft," was Mrs Musgrove's hearty answer.  "There is nothing so bad
 as a separation.  I am quite of your opinion.  I know what it is, for
 Mr Musgrove always attends the assizes, and I am so glad when they are
 over, and he is safe back again."
 
 The evening ended with dancing.  On its being proposed, Anne offered
 her services, as usual; and though her eyes would sometimes fill with
 tears as she sat at the instrument, she was extremely glad to be
 employed, and desired nothing in return but to be unobserved.
 
 It was a merry, joyous party, and no one seemed in higher spirits than
 Captain Wentworth.  She felt that he had every thing to elevate him
 which general attention and deference, and especially the attention of
 all the young women, could do.  The Miss Hayters, the females of the
 family of cousins already mentioned, were apparently admitted to the
 honour of being in love with him; and as for Henrietta and Louisa, they
 both seemed so entirely occupied by him, that nothing but the continued
 appearance of the most perfect good-will between themselves could have
 made it credible that they were not decided rivals.  If he were a
 little spoilt by such universal, such eager admiration, who could
 wonder?
 
 These were some of the thoughts which occupied Anne, while her fingers
 were mechanically at work, proceeding for half an hour together,
 equally without error, and without consciousness.  Once she felt that
 he was looking at herself,  observing her altered features, perhaps,
 trying to trace in them the ruins of the face which had once charmed
 him; and once she knew that he must have spoken of her; she was hardly
 aware of it, till she heard the answer; but then she was sure of his
--**--**--
 to the principal part of her family, and be giving bad connections to
 those who have not been used to them.  And, pray, who is Charles
 Hayter?  Nothing but a country curate.  A most improper match for Miss
 Musgrove of Uppercross."
 
 Her husband, however, would not agree with her here; for besides having
 a regard for his cousin, Charles Hayter was an eldest son, and he saw
 things as an eldest son himself.
 
 "Now you are talking nonsense, Mary," was therefore his answer.  "It
 would not be a great match for Henrietta, but Charles has a very fair
 chance, through the Spicers, of getting something from the Bishop in
 the course of a year or two; and you will please to remember, that he
 is the eldest son; whenever my uncle dies, he steps into very pretty
 property.  The estate at Winthrop is not less than two hundred and
 fifty acres, besides the farm near Taunton, which is some of the best
 land in the country.  I grant you, that any of them but Charles would
 be a very shocking match for Henrietta, and indeed it could not be; he
 is the only one that could be possible; but he is a very good-natured,
 good sort of a fellow; and whenever Winthrop comes into his hands, he
 will make a different sort of place of it, and live in a very different
 sort of way; and with that property, he will never be a contemptible
 man--good, freehold property.  No, no; Henrietta might do worse than
 marry Charles Hayter; and if she has him, and Louisa can get Captain
 Wentworth, I shall be very well satisfied."
 
 "Charles may say what he pleases," cried Mary to Anne, as soon as he
 was out of the room, "but it would be shocking to have Henrietta marry
--**--**--
 his manners of their usual composure:  he started, and could only say,
 "I thought the Miss Musgroves had been here: Mrs Musgrove told me I
 should find them here," before he walked to the window to recollect
 himself, and feel how he ought to behave.
 
 "They are up stairs with my sister:  they will be down in a few
 moments, I dare say," had been Anne's reply, in all the confusion that
 was natural; and if the child had not called her to come and do
 something for him, she would have been out of the room the next moment,
 and released Captain Wentworth as well as herself.
 
 He continued at the window; and after calmly and politely saying, "I
 hope the little boy is better," was silent.
 
 She was obliged to kneel down by the sofa, and remain there to satisfy
 her patient; and thus they continued a few minutes, when, to her very
 great satisfaction, she heard some other person crossing the little
 vestibule.  She hoped, on turning her head, to see the master of the
 house; but it proved to be one much less calculated for making matters
 easy--Charles Hayter, probably not at all better pleased by the sight
 of Captain Wentworth than Captain Wentworth had been by the sight of
 Anne.
 
 She only attempted to say, "How do you do?  Will you not sit down?  The
 others will be here presently."
 
 Captain Wentworth, however, came from his window, apparently not
 ill-disposed for conversation; but Charles Hayter soon put an end to
 his attempts by seating himself near the table, and taking up the
 newspaper; and Captain Wentworth returned to his window.
 
 Another minute brought another addition.  The younger boy, a remarkable
 stout, forward child, of two years old, having got the door opened for
 him by some one without, made his determined appearance among them, and
--**--**--
 varying, but very painful agitation, as she could not recover from,
 till enabled by the entrance of Mary and the Miss Musgroves to make
 over her little patient to their cares, and leave the room.  She could
 not stay.  It might have been an opportunity of watching the loves and
 jealousies of the four--they were now altogether; but she could stay
 for none of it.  It was evident that Charles Hayter was not well
 inclined towards Captain Wentworth.  She had a strong impression of his
 having said, in a vext tone of voice, after Captain Wentworth's
 interference, "You ought to have minded me, Walter; I told you not to
 teaze your aunt;" and could comprehend his regretting that Captain
 Wentworth should do what he ought to have done himself.  But neither
 Charles Hayter's feelings, nor anybody's feelings, could interest her,
 till she had a little better arranged her own.  She was ashamed of
 herself, quite ashamed of being so nervous, so overcome by such a
 trifle; but so it was, and it required a long application of solitude
 and reflection to recover her.
 
 
 
 Chapter 10
 
 
 Other opportunities of making her observations could not fail to occur.
 Anne had soon been in company with all the four together often enough
 to have an opinion, though too wise to acknowledge as much at home,
 where she knew it would have satisfied neither husband nor wife; for
 while she considered Louisa to be rather the favourite, she could not
 but think, as far as she might dare to judge from memory and
 experience, that Captain Wentworth was not in love with either.  They
 were more in love with him; yet there it was not love.  It was a little
 fever of admiration; but it might, probably must, end in love with
 some.  Charles Hayter seemed aware of being slighted, and yet Henrietta
--**--**--
 It was a very fine November day, and the Miss Musgroves came through
 the little grounds, and stopped for no other purpose than to say, that
 they were going to take a long walk, and therefore concluded Mary could
 not like to go with them; and when Mary immediately replied, with some
 jealousy at not being supposed a good walker, "Oh, yes, I should like
 to join you very much, I am very fond of a long walk;" Anne felt
 persuaded, by the looks of the two girls, that it was precisely what
 they did not wish, and admired again the sort of necessity which the
 family habits seemed to produce, of everything being to be
 communicated, and everything being to be done together, however
 undesired and inconvenient.  She tried to dissuade Mary from going, but
 in vain; and that being the case, thought it best to accept the Miss
 Musgroves' much more cordial invitation to herself to go likewise, as
 she might be useful in turning back with her sister, and lessening the
 interference in any plan of their own.
 
 "I cannot imagine why they should suppose I should not like a long
 walk," said Mary, as she went up stairs.  "Everybody is always
 supposing that I am not a good walker; and yet they would not have been
 pleased, if we had refused to join them.  When people come in this
 manner on purpose to ask us, how can one say no?"
 
 Just as they were setting off, the gentlemen returned.  They had taken
 out a young dog, who had spoilt their sport, and sent them back early.
 Their time and strength, and spirits, were, therefore, exactly ready
 for this walk, and they entered into it with pleasure.  Could Anne have
 foreseen such a junction, she would have staid at home; but, from some
--**--**--
 safely by anybody else."
 
 It was spoken with enthusiasm.
 
 "Had you?" cried he, catching the same tone; "I honour you!" And there
 was silence between them for a little while.
 
 Anne could not immediately fall into a quotation again.  The sweet
 scenes of autumn were for a while put by, unless some tender sonnet,
 fraught with the apt analogy of the declining year, with declining
 happiness, and the images of youth and hope, and spring, all gone
 together, blessed her memory.  She roused herself to say, as they
 struck by order into another path, "Is not this one of the ways to
 Winthrop?" But nobody heard, or, at least, nobody answered her.
 
 Winthrop, however, or its environs--for young men are, sometimes to be
 met with, strolling about near home--was their destination; and after
 another half mile of gradual ascent through large enclosures, where the
 ploughs at work, and the fresh made path spoke the farmer counteracting
 the sweets of poetical despondence, and meaning to have spring again,
 they gained the summit of the most considerable hill, which parted
 Uppercross and Winthrop, and soon commanded a full view of the latter,
 at the foot of the hill on the other side.
 
 Winthrop, without beauty and without dignity, was stretched before them
 an indifferent house, standing low, and hemmed in by the barns and
 buildings of a farm-yard.
 
 Mary exclaimed, "Bless me! here is Winthrop.  I declare I had no idea!
 Well now, I think we had better turn back; I am excessively tired."
 
 Henrietta, conscious and ashamed, and seeing no cousin Charles walking
 along any path, or leaning against any gate, was ready to do as Mary
 wished; but "No!" said Charles Musgrove, and "No, no!" cried Louisa
 more eagerly, and taking her sister aside, seemed to be arguing the
--**--**--
 followed by a contemptuous glance, as he turned away, which Anne
 perfectly knew the meaning of.
 
 The brow of the hill, where they remained, was a cheerful spot: Louisa
 returned; and Mary, finding a comfortable seat for herself on the step
 of a stile, was very well satisfied so long as the others all stood
 about her; but when Louisa drew Captain Wentworth away, to try for a
 gleaning of nuts in an adjoining hedge-row, and they were gone by
 degrees quite out of sight and sound, Mary was happy no longer; she
 quarrelled with her own seat, was sure Louisa had got a much better
 somewhere, and nothing could prevent her from going to look for a
 better also.  She turned through the same gate, but could not see them.
 Anne found a nice seat for her, on a dry sunny bank, under the
 hedge-row, in which she had no doubt of their still being, in some spot
 or other.  Mary sat down for a moment, but it would not do; she was
 sure Louisa had found a better seat somewhere else, and she would go on
 till she overtook her.
 
 Anne, really tired herself, was glad to sit down; and she very soon
 heard Captain Wentworth and Louisa in the hedge-row, behind her, as if
 making their way back along the rough, wild sort of channel, down the
 centre.  They were speaking as they drew near.  Louisa's voice was the
 first distinguished.  She seemed to be in the middle of some eager
 speech.  What Anne first heard was--
 
 "And so, I made her go.  I could not bear that she should be frightened
 from the visit by such nonsense.  What! would I be turned back from
 doing a thing that I had determined to do, and that I knew to be right,
--**--**--
 wanted to marry Anne?"
 
 After a moment's pause, Captain Wentworth said--
 
 "Do you mean that she refused him?"
 
 "Oh! yes; certainly."
 
 "When did that happen?"
 
 "I do not exactly know, for Henrietta and I were at school at the time;
 but I believe about a year before he married Mary.  I wish she had
 accepted him.  We should all have liked her a great deal better; and
 papa and mamma always think it was her great friend Lady Russell's
 doing, that she did not.  They think Charles might not be learned and
 bookish enough to please Lady Russell, and that therefore, she
 persuaded Anne to refuse him."
 
 The sounds were retreating, and Anne distinguished no more.  Her own
 emotions still kept her fixed.  She had much to recover from, before
 she could move.  The listener's proverbial fate was not absolutely
 hers; she had heard no evil of herself, but she had heard a great deal
 of very painful import.  She saw how her own character was considered
 by Captain Wentworth, and there had been just that degree of feeling
 and curiosity about her in his manner which must give her extreme
 agitation.
 
 As soon as she could, she went after Mary, and having found, and walked
 back with her to their former station, by the stile, felt some comfort
 in their whole party being immediately afterwards collected, and once
 more in motion together.  Her spirits wanted the solitude and silence
 which only numbers could give.
 
 Charles and Henrietta returned, bringing, as may be conjectured,
 Charles Hayter with them.  The minutiae of the business Anne could not
 attempt to understand; even Captain Wentworth did not seem admitted to
 perfect confidence here; but that there had been a withdrawing on the
 gentleman's side, and a relenting on the lady's, and that they were now
--**--**--
 
 But by coolly giving the reins a better direction herself they happily
 passed the danger; and by once afterwards judiciously putting out her
 hand they neither fell into a rut, nor ran foul of a dung-cart; and
 Anne, with some amusement at their style of driving, which she imagined
 no bad representation of the general guidance of their affairs, found
 herself safely deposited by them at the Cottage.
 
 
 
 Chapter 11
 
 
 The time now approached for Lady Russell's return:  the day was even
 fixed; and Anne, being engaged to join her as soon as she was
 resettled, was looking forward to an early removal to Kellynch, and
 beginning to think how her own comfort was likely to be affected by it.
 
 It would place her in the same village with Captain Wentworth, within
 half a mile of him; they would have to frequent the same church, and
 there must be intercourse between the two families.  This was against
 her; but on the other hand, he spent so much of his time at Uppercross,
 that in removing thence she might be considered rather as leaving him
 behind, than as going towards him; and, upon the whole, she believed
 she must, on this interesting question, be the gainer, almost as
 certainly as in her change of domestic society, in leaving poor Mary
 for Lady Russell.
 
 She wished it might be possible for her to avoid ever seeing Captain
 Wentworth at the Hall:  those rooms had witnessed former meetings which
 would be brought too painfully before her; but she was yet more anxious
 for the possibility of Lady Russell and Captain Wentworth never meeting
 anywhere.  They did not like each other, and no renewal of acquaintance
 now could do any good; and were Lady Russell to see them together, she
 might think that he had too much self-possession, and she too little.
--**--**--
 an officer, whom he had always valued highly, which must have stamped
 him well in the esteem of every listener, had been followed by a little
 history of his private life, which rendered him perfectly interesting
 in the eyes of all the ladies.  He had been engaged to Captain
 Harville's sister, and was now mourning her loss.  They had been a year
 or two waiting for fortune and promotion.  Fortune came, his
 prize-money as lieutenant being great; promotion, too, came at last;
 but Fanny Harville did not live to know it.  She had died the preceding
 summer while he was at sea.  Captain Wentworth believed it impossible
 for man to be more attached to woman than poor Benwick had been to
 Fanny Harville, or to be more deeply afflicted under the dreadful
 change.  He considered his disposition as of the sort which must suffer
 heavily, uniting very strong feelings with quiet, serious, and retiring
 manners, and a decided taste for reading, and sedentary pursuits.  To
 finish the interest of the story, the friendship between him and the
 Harvilles seemed, if possible, augmented by the event which closed all
 their views of alliance, and Captain Benwick was now living with them
 entirely.  Captain Harville had taken his present house for half a
 year; his taste, and his health, and his fortune, all directing him to
 a residence inexpensive, and by the sea; and the grandeur of the
 country, and the retirement of Lyme in the winter, appeared exactly
 adapted to Captain Benwick's state of mind.  The sympathy and good-will
 excited towards Captain Benwick was very great.
 
 "And yet," said Anne to herself, as they now moved forward to meet the
 party, "he has not, perhaps, a more sorrowing heart than I have.  I
 cannot believe his prospects so blighted for ever.  He is younger than
--**--**--
 
 They went back to dress and dine; and so well had the scheme answered
 already, that nothing was found amiss; though its being "so entirely
 out of season," and the "no thoroughfare of Lyme," and the "no
 expectation of company," had brought many apologies from the heads of
 the inn.
 
 Anne found herself by this time growing so much more hardened to being
 in Captain Wentworth's company than she had at first imagined could
 ever be, that the sitting down to the same table with him now, and the
 interchange of the common civilities attending on it (they never got
 beyond), was become a mere nothing.
 
 The nights were too dark for the ladies to meet again till the morrow,
 but Captain Harville had promised them a visit in the evening; and he
 came, bringing his friend also, which was more than had been expected,
 it having been agreed that Captain Benwick had all the appearance of
 being oppressed by the presence of so many strangers.  He ventured
 among them again, however, though his spirits certainly did not seem
 fit for the mirth of the party in general.
 
 While Captains Wentworth and Harville led the talk on one side of the
 room, and by recurring to former days, supplied anecdotes in abundance
 to occupy and entertain the others, it fell to Anne's lot to be placed
 rather apart with Captain Benwick; and a very good impulse of her
 nature obliged her to begin an acquaintance with him.  He was shy, and
 disposed to abstraction; but the engaging mildness of her countenance,
 and gentleness of her manners, soon had their effect; and Anne was well
 repaid the first trouble of exertion.  He was evidently a young man of
 considerable taste in reading, though principally in poetry; and
 besides the persuasion of having given him at least an evening's
--**--**--
 acquaintance, which would make it cheerful for her, and I am sure she
 would be glad to get to a place where she could have medical attendance
 at hand, in case of his having another seizure.  Indeed I think it
 quite melancholy to have such excellent people as Dr and Mrs Shirley,
 who have been doing good all their lives, wearing out their last days
 in a place like Uppercross, where, excepting our family, they seem shut
 out from all the world.  I wish his friends would propose it to him.  I
 really think they ought.  And, as to procuring a dispensation, there
 could be no difficulty at his time of life, and with his character.  My
 only doubt is, whether anything could persuade him to leave his parish.
 He is so very strict and scrupulous in his notions; over-scrupulous I
 must say.  Do not you think, Anne, it is being over-scrupulous?  Do not
 you think it is quite a mistaken point of conscience, when a clergyman
 sacrifices his health for the sake of duties, which may be just as well
 performed by another person?  And at Lyme too, only seventeen miles
 off, he would be near enough to hear, if people thought there was
 anything to complain of."
 
 Anne smiled more than once to herself during this speech, and entered
 into the subject, as ready to do good by entering into the feelings of
 a young lady as of a young man, though here it was good of a lower
 standard, for what could be offered but general acquiescence?  She said
 all that was reasonable and proper on the business; felt the claims of
 Dr Shirley to repose as she ought; saw how very desirable it was that
 he should have some active, respectable young man, as a resident
--**--**--
 Sir Walter Elliot!  I was sure that would come out, if it was so.
 Depend upon it, that is a circumstance which his servants take care to
 publish, wherever he goes.  But, Anne, only conceive how extraordinary!
 I wish I had looked at him more.  I wish we had been aware in time, who
 it was, that he might have been introduced to us.  What a pity that we
 should not have been introduced to each other!  Do you think he had the
 Elliot countenance?  I hardly looked at him, I was looking at the
 horses; but I think he had something of the Elliot countenance, I
 wonder the arms did not strike me!  Oh! the great-coat was hanging over
 the panel, and hid the arms, so it did; otherwise, I am sure, I should
 have observed them, and the livery too; if the servant had not been in
 mourning, one should have known him by the livery."
 
 "Putting all these very extraordinary circumstances together," said
 Captain Wentworth, "we must consider it to be the arrangement of
 Providence, that you should not be introduced to your cousin."
 
 When she could command Mary's attention, Anne quietly tried to convince
 her that their father and Mr Elliot had not, for many years, been on
 such terms as to make the power of attempting an introduction at all
 desirable.
 
 At the same time, however, it was a secret gratification to herself to
 have seen her cousin, and to know that the future owner of Kellynch was
 undoubtedly a gentleman, and had an air of good sense.  She would not,
 upon any account, mention her having met with him the second time;
 luckily Mary did not much attend to their having passed close by him in
 their earlier walk, but she would have felt quite ill-used by Anne's
--**--**--
 all were contented to pass quietly and carefully down the steep flight,
 excepting Louisa; she must be jumped down them by Captain Wentworth.
 In all their walks, he had had to jump her from the stiles; the
 sensation was delightful to her.  The hardness of the pavement for her
 feet, made him less willing upon the present occasion; he did it,
 however.  She was safely down, and instantly, to show her enjoyment,
 ran up the steps to be jumped down again.  He advised her against it,
 thought the jar too great; but no, he reasoned and talked in vain, she
 smiled and said, "I am determined I will:" he put out his hands; she
 was too precipitate by half a second, she fell on the pavement on the
 Lower Cobb, and was taken up lifeless!  There was no wound, no blood,
 no visible bruise; but her eyes were closed, she breathed not, her face
 was like death.  The horror of the moment to all who stood around!
 
 Captain Wentworth, who had caught her up, knelt with her in his arms,
 looking on her with a face as pallid as her own, in an agony of
 silence.  "She is dead! she is dead!" screamed Mary, catching hold of
 her husband, and contributing with his own horror to make him
 immoveable; and in another moment, Henrietta, sinking under the
 conviction, lost her senses too, and would have fallen on the steps,
 but for Captain Benwick and Anne, who caught and supported her between
 them.
 
 "Is there no one to help me?" were the first words which burst from
 Captain Wentworth, in a tone of despair, and as if all his own strength
 were gone.
 
 "Go to him, go to him," cried Anne, "for heaven's sake go to him.  I
 can support her myself.  Leave me, and go to him.  Rub her hands, rub
--**--**--
 arms and face concealed, as if overpowered by the various feelings of
 his soul, and trying by prayer and reflection to calm them.
 
 Louisa's limbs had escaped.  There was no injury but to the head.
 
 It now became necessary for the party to consider what was best to be
 done, as to their general situation.  They were now able to speak to
 each other and consult.  That Louisa must remain where she was, however
 distressing to her friends to be involving the Harvilles in such
 trouble, did not admit a doubt.  Her removal was impossible.  The
 Harvilles silenced all scruples; and, as much as they could, all
 gratitude.  They had looked forward and arranged everything before the
 others began to reflect.  Captain Benwick must give up his room to
 them, and get another bed elsewhere; and the whole was settled.  They
 were only concerned that the house could accommodate no more; and yet
 perhaps, by "putting the children away in the maid's room, or swinging
 a cot somewhere," they could hardly bear to think of not finding room
 for two or three besides, supposing they might wish to stay; though,
 with regard to any attendance on Miss Musgrove, there need not be the
 least uneasiness in leaving her to Mrs Harville's care entirely.  Mrs
 Harville was a very experienced nurse, and her nursery-maid, who had
 lived with her long, and gone about with her everywhere, was just such
 another.  Between these two, she could want no possible attendance by
 day or night.  And all this was said with a truth and sincerity of
 feeling irresistible.
 
 Charles, Henrietta, and Captain Wentworth were the three in
 consultation, and for a little while it was only an interchange of
 perplexity and terror.  "Uppercross, the necessity of some one's going
 to Uppercross; the news to be conveyed; how it could be broken to Mr
--**--**--
 
 Captain Benwick was most considerately attentive to her; and, united as
 they all seemed by the distress of the day, she felt an increasing
 degree of good-will towards him, and a pleasure even in thinking that
 it might, perhaps, be the occasion of continuing their acquaintance.
 
 Captain Wentworth was on the watch for them, and a chaise and four in
 waiting, stationed for their convenience in the lowest part of the
 street; but his evident surprise and vexation at the substitution of
 one sister for the other, the change in his countenance, the
 astonishment, the expressions begun and suppressed, with which Charles
 was listened to, made but a mortifying reception of Anne; or must at
 least convince her that she was valued only as she could be useful to
 Louisa.
 
 She endeavoured to be composed, and to be just.  Without emulating the
 feelings of an Emma towards her Henry, she would have attended on
 Louisa with a zeal above the common claims of regard, for his sake; and
 she hoped he would not long be so unjust as to suppose she would shrink
 unnecessarily from the office of a friend.
 
 In the mean while she was in the carriage.  He had handed them both in,
 and placed himself between them; and in this manner, under these
 circumstances, full of astonishment and emotion to Anne, she quitted
 Lyme.  How the long stage would pass; how it was to affect their
 manners; what was to be their sort of intercourse, she could not
 foresee.  It was all quite natural, however.  He was devoted to
 Henrietta; always turning towards her; and when he spoke at all, always
 with the view of supporting her hopes and raising her spirits.  In
 general, his voice and manner were studiously calm.  To spare Henrietta
 from agitation seemed the governing principle.  Once only, when she had
--**--**--
 glowing and bright in prosperous love, all that was most unlike Anne
 Elliot!
 
 An hour's complete leisure for such reflections as these, on a dark
 November day, a small thick rain almost blotting out the very few
 objects ever to be discerned from the windows, was enough to make the
 sound of Lady Russell's carriage exceedingly welcome; and yet, though
 desirous to be gone, she could not quit the Mansion House, or look an
 adieu to the Cottage, with its black, dripping and comfortless veranda,
 or even notice through the misty glasses the last humble tenements of
 the village, without a saddened heart.  Scenes had passed in Uppercross
 which made it precious.  It stood the record of many sensations of
 pain, once severe, but now softened; and of some instances of relenting
 feeling, some breathings of friendship and reconciliation, which could
 never be looked for again, and which could never cease to be dear.  She
 left it all behind her, all but the recollection that such things had
 been.
 
 Anne had never entered Kellynch since her quitting Lady Russell's house
 in September.  It had not been necessary, and the few occasions of its
 being possible for her to go to the Hall she had contrived to evade and
 escape from.  Her first return was to resume her place in the modern
 and elegant apartments of the Lodge, and to gladden the eyes of its
 mistress.
 
 There was some anxiety mixed with Lady Russell's joy in meeting her.
 She knew who had been frequenting Uppercross.  But happily, either Anne
 was improved in plumpness and looks, or Lady Russell fancied her so;
 and Anne, in receiving her compliments on the occasion, had the
 amusement of connecting them with the silent admiration of her cousin,
 and of hoping that she was to be blessed with a second spring of youth
--**--**--
 lady dated her intelligence from the same hour of yestermorn; that
 Captain Wentworth had been in Kellynch yesterday (the first time since
 the accident), had brought Anne the last note, which she had not been
 able to trace the exact steps of; had staid a few hours and then
 returned again to Lyme, and without any present intention of quitting
 it any more.  He had enquired after her, she found, particularly; had
 expressed his hope of Miss Elliot's not being the worse for her
 exertions, and had spoken of those exertions as great.  This was
 handsome, and gave her more pleasure than almost anything else could
 have done.
 
 As to the sad catastrophe itself, it could be canvassed only in one
 style by a couple of steady, sensible women, whose judgements had to
 work on ascertained events; and it was perfectly decided that it had
 been the consequence of much thoughtlessness and much imprudence; that
 its effects were most alarming, and that it was frightful to think, how
 long Miss Musgrove's recovery might yet be doubtful, and how liable she
 would still remain to suffer from the concussion hereafter!  The
 Admiral wound it up summarily by exclaiming--
 
 "Ay, a very bad business indeed.  A new sort of way this, for a young
 fellow to be making love, by breaking his mistress's head, is not it,
 Miss Elliot?  This is breaking a head and giving a plaster, truly!"
 
 Admiral Croft's manners were not quite of the tone to suit Lady
 Russell, but they delighted Anne.  His goodness of heart and simplicity
 of character were irresistible.
 
 "Now, this must be very bad for you," said he, suddenly rousing from a
 little reverie, "to be coming and finding us here.  I had not
 recollected it before, I declare, but it must be very bad.  But now, do
--**--**--
 Anne, amused in spite of herself, was rather distressed for an answer,
 and the Admiral, fearing he might not have been civil enough, took up
 the subject again, to say--
 
 "The next time you write to your good father, Miss Elliot, pray give
 him my compliments and Mrs Croft's, and say that we are settled here
 quite to our liking, and have no fault at all to find with the place.
 The breakfast-room chimney smokes a little, I grant you, but it is only
 when the wind is due north and blows hard, which may not happen three
 times a winter.  And take it altogether, now that we have been into
 most of the houses hereabouts and can judge, there is not one that we
 like better than this.  Pray say so, with my compliments.  He will be
 glad to hear it."
 
 Lady Russell and Mrs Croft were very well pleased with each other: but
 the acquaintance which this visit began was fated not to proceed far at
 present; for when it was returned, the Crofts announced themselves to
 be going away for a few weeks, to visit their connexions in the north
 of the county, and probably might not be at home again before Lady
 Russell would be removing to Bath.
 
 So ended all danger to Anne of meeting Captain Wentworth at Kellynch
 Hall, or of seeing him in company with her friend.  Everything was safe
 enough, and she smiled over the many anxious feelings she had wasted on
 the subject.
 
 
 
 Chapter 14
 
 
 Though Charles and Mary had remained at Lyme much longer after Mr and
 Mrs Musgrove's going than Anne conceived they could have been at all
 wanted, they were yet the first of the family to be at home again; and
 as soon as possible after their return to Uppercross they drove over to
--**--**--
 Charles laughed again and said, "Now Mary, you know very well how it
 really was.  It was all your doing," (turning to Anne.) "He fancied
 that if he went with us, he should find you close by: he fancied
 everybody to be living in Uppercross; and when he discovered that Lady
 Russell lived three miles off, his heart failed him, and he had not
 courage to come.  That is the fact, upon my honour, Mary knows it is."
 
 But Mary did not give into it very graciously, whether from not
 considering Captain Benwick entitled by birth and situation to be in
 love with an Elliot, or from not wanting to believe Anne a greater
 attraction to Uppercross than herself, must be left to be guessed.
 Anne's good-will, however, was not to be lessened by what she heard.
 She boldly acknowledged herself flattered, and continued her enquiries.
 
 "Oh! he talks of you," cried Charles, "in such terms--" Mary
 interrupted him. "I declare, Charles, I never heard him mention Anne
 twice all the time I was there.  I declare, Anne, he never talks of you
 at all."
 
 "No," admitted Charles, "I do not know that he ever does, in a general
 way; but however, it is a very clear thing that he admires you
 exceedingly.  His head is full of some books that he is reading upon
 your recommendation, and he wants to talk to you about them; he has
 found out something or other in one of them which he thinks--oh! I
 cannot pretend to remember it, but it was something very fine--I
 overheard him telling Henrietta all about it; and then 'Miss Elliot'
 was spoken of in the highest terms!  Now Mary, I declare it was so, I
 heard it myself, and you were in the other room.  'Elegance, sweetness,
--**--**--
 animation of their meeting with, or rather missing, Mr Elliot so
 extraordinarily.
 
 "He is a man," said Lady Russell, "whom I have no wish to see.  His
 declining to be on cordial terms with the head of his family, has left
 a very strong impression in his disfavour with me."
 
 This decision checked Mary's eagerness, and stopped her short in the
 midst of the Elliot countenance.
 
 With regard to Captain Wentworth, though Anne hazarded no enquiries,
 there was voluntary communication sufficient.  His spirits had been
 greatly recovering lately as might be expected.  As Louisa improved, he
 had improved, and he was now quite a different creature from what he
 had been the first week.  He had not seen Louisa; and was so extremely
 fearful of any ill consequence to her from an interview, that he did
 not press for it at all; and, on the contrary, seemed to have a plan of
 going away for a week or ten days, till her head was stronger.  He had
 talked of going down to Plymouth for a week, and wanted to persuade
 Captain Benwick to go with him; but, as Charles maintained to the last,
 Captain Benwick seemed much more disposed to ride over to Kellynch.
 
 There can be no doubt that Lady Russell and Anne were both occasionally
 thinking of Captain Benwick, from this time.  Lady Russell could not
 hear the door-bell without feeling that it might be his herald; nor
 could Anne return from any stroll of solitary indulgence in her
 father's grounds, or any visit of charity in the village, without
 wondering whether she might see him or hear of him.  Captain Benwick
 came not, however.  He was either less disposed for it than Charles had
 imagined, or he was too shy; and after giving him a week's indulgence,
--**--**--
 arrived?  And looked back, with fond regret, to the bustles of
 Uppercross and the seclusion of Kellynch.
 
 Elizabeth's last letter had communicated a piece of news of some
 interest.  Mr Elliot was in Bath.  He had called in Camden Place; had
 called a second time, a third; had been pointedly attentive.  If
 Elizabeth and her father did not deceive themselves, had been taking
 much pains to seek the acquaintance, and proclaim the value of the
 connection, as he had formerly taken pains to shew neglect.  This was
 very wonderful if it were true; and Lady Russell was in a state of very
 agreeable curiosity and perplexity about Mr Elliot, already recanting
 the sentiment she had so lately expressed to Mary, of his being "a man
 whom she had no wish to see."  She had a great wish to see him.  If he
 really sought to reconcile himself like a dutiful branch, he must be
 forgiven for having dismembered himself from the paternal tree.
 
 Anne was not animated to an equal pitch by the circumstance, but she
 felt that she would rather see Mr Elliot again than not, which was more
 than she could say for many other persons in Bath.
 
 She was put down in Camden Place; and Lady Russell then drove to her
 own lodgings, in Rivers Street.
 
 
 
 Chapter 15
 
 
 Sir Walter had taken a very good house in Camden Place, a lofty
 dignified situation, such as becomes a man of consequence; and both he
 and Elizabeth were settled there, much to their satisfaction.
 
 Anne entered it with a sinking heart, anticipating an imprisonment of
 many months, and anxiously saying to herself, "Oh! when shall I leave
 you again?"  A degree of unexpected cordiality, however, in the welcome
 she received, did her good.  Her father and sister were glad to see
--**--**--
 Anne listened, but without quite understanding it.  Allowances, large
 allowances, she knew, must be made for the ideas of those who spoke.
 She heard it all under embellishment.  All that sounded extravagant or
 irrational in the progress of the reconciliation might have no origin
 but in the language of the relators.  Still, however, she had the
 sensation of there being something more than immediately appeared, in
 Mr Elliot's wishing, after an interval of so many years, to be well
 received by them.  In a worldly view, he had nothing to gain by being
 on terms with Sir Walter; nothing to risk by a state of variance.  In
 all probability he was already the richer of the two, and the Kellynch
 estate would as surely be his hereafter as the title.  A sensible man,
 and he had looked like a very sensible man, why should it be an object
 to him?  She could only offer one solution; it was, perhaps, for
 Elizabeth's sake.  There might really have been a liking formerly,
 though convenience and accident had drawn him a different way; and now
 that he could afford to please himself, he might mean to pay his
 addresses to her.  Elizabeth was certainly very handsome, with
 well-bred, elegant manners, and her character might never have been
 penetrated by Mr Elliot, knowing her but in public, and when very young
 himself.  How her temper and understanding might bear the investigation
 of his present keener time of life was another concern and rather a
 fearful one.  Most earnestly did she wish that he might not be too
 nice, or too observant if Elizabeth were his object; and that Elizabeth
 was disposed to believe herself so, and that her friend Mrs Clay was
 encouraging the idea, seemed apparent by a glance or two between them,
--**--**--
 plain was out of all proportion.  He had frequently observed, as he
 walked, that one handsome face would be followed by thirty, or
 five-and-thirty frights; and once, as he had stood in a shop on Bond
 Street, he had counted eighty-seven women go by, one after another,
 without there being a tolerable face among them.  It had been a frosty
 morning, to be sure, a sharp frost, which hardly one woman in a
 thousand could stand the test of.  But still, there certainly were a
 dreadful multitude of ugly women in Bath; and as for the men!  they
 were infinitely worse.  Such scarecrows as the streets were full of!
 It was evident how little the women were used to the sight of anything
 tolerable, by the effect which a man of decent appearance produced.  He
 had never walked anywhere arm-in-arm with Colonel Wallis (who was a
 fine military figure, though sandy-haired) without observing that every
 woman's eye was upon him; every woman's eye was sure to be upon Colonel
 Wallis."  Modest Sir Walter!  He was not allowed to escape, however.
 His daughter and Mrs Clay united in hinting that Colonel Wallis's
 companion might have as good a figure as Colonel Wallis, and certainly
 was not sandy-haired.
 
 "How is Mary looking?" said Sir Walter, in the height of his good
 humour.  "The last time I saw her she had a red nose, but I hope that
 may not happen every day."
 
 "Oh! no, that must have been quite accidental.  In general she has been
 in very good health and very good looks since Michaelmas."
 
 "If I thought it would not tempt her to go out in sharp winds, and grow
 coarse, I would send her a new hat and pelisse."
 
 Anne was considering whether she should venture to suggest that a gown,
--**--**--
 Gowland, during the spring months.  Mrs Clay has been using it at my
 recommendation, and you see what it has done for her.  You see how it
 has carried away her freckles."
 
 If Elizabeth could but have heard this!  Such personal praise might
 have struck her, especially as it did not appear to Anne that the
 freckles were at all lessened.  But everything must take its chance.
 The evil of a marriage would be much diminished, if Elizabeth were also
 to marry.  As for herself, she might always command a home with Lady
 Russell.
 
 Lady Russell's composed mind and polite manners were put to some trial
 on this point, in her intercourse in Camden Place.  The sight of Mrs
 Clay in such favour, and of Anne so overlooked, was a perpetual
 provocation to her there; and vexed her as much when she was away, as a
 person in Bath who drinks the water, gets all the new publications, and
 has a very large acquaintance, has time to be vexed.
 
 As Mr Elliot became known to her, she grew more charitable, or more
 indifferent, towards the others.  His manners were an immediate
 recommendation; and on conversing with him she found the solid so fully
 supporting the superficial, that she was at first, as she told Anne,
 almost ready to exclaim, "Can this be Mr Elliot?" and could not
 seriously picture to herself a more agreeable or estimable man.
 Everything united in him; good understanding, correct opinions,
 knowledge of the world, and a warm heart.  He had strong feelings of
 family attachment and family honour, without pride or weakness; he
 lived with the liberality of a man of fortune, without display; he
 judged for himself in everything essential, without defying public
 opinion in any point of worldly decorum.  He was steady, observant,
--**--**--
 "You are mistaken," said he gently, "that is not good company; that is
 the best.  Good company requires only birth, education, and manners,
 and with regard to education is not very nice.  Birth and good manners
 are essential; but a little learning is by no means a dangerous thing
 in good company; on the contrary, it will do very well.  My cousin Anne
 shakes her head.  She is not satisfied.  She is fastidious.  My dear
 cousin" (sitting down by her), "you have a better right to be
 fastidious than almost any other woman I know; but will it answer?
 Will it make you happy?  Will it not be wiser to accept the society of
 those good ladies in Laura Place, and enjoy all the advantages of the
 connexion as far as possible?  You may depend upon it, that they will
 move in the first set in Bath this winter, and as rank is rank, your
 being known to be related to them will have its use in fixing your
 family (our family let me say) in that degree of consideration which we
 must all wish for."
 
 "Yes," sighed Anne, "we shall, indeed, be known to be related to them!"
 then recollecting herself, and not wishing to be answered, she added,
 "I certainly do think there has been by far too much trouble taken to
 procure the acquaintance.  I suppose" (smiling) "I have more pride than
 any of you; but I confess it does vex me, that we should be so
 solicitous to have the relationship acknowledged, which we may be very
 sure is a matter of perfect indifference to them."
 
 "Pardon me, dear cousin, you are unjust in your own claims.  In London,
 perhaps, in your present quiet style of living, it might be as you say:
 but in Bath; Sir Walter Elliot and his family will always be worth
--**--**--
 quitted the house but to be conveyed into the warm bath.  Yet, in spite
 of all this, Anne had reason to believe that she had moments only of
 languor and depression, to hours of occupation and enjoyment.  How
 could it be?  She watched, observed, reflected, and finally determined
 that this was not a case of fortitude or of resignation only.  A
 submissive spirit might be patient, a strong understanding would supply
 resolution, but here was something more; here was that elasticity of
 mind, that disposition to be comforted, that power of turning readily
 from evil to good, and of finding employment which carried her out of
 herself, which was from nature alone.  It was the choicest gift of
 Heaven; and Anne viewed her friend as one of those instances in which,
 by a merciful appointment, it seems designed to counterbalance almost
 every other want.
 
 There had been a time, Mrs Smith told her, when her spirits had nearly
 failed.  She could not call herself an invalid now, compared with her
 state on first reaching Bath.  Then she had, indeed, been a pitiable
 object; for she had caught cold on the journey, and had hardly taken
 possession of her lodgings before she was again confined to her bed and
 suffering under severe and constant pain; and all this among strangers,
 with the absolute necessity of having a regular nurse, and finances at
 that moment particularly unfit to meet any extraordinary expense.  She
 had weathered it, however, and could truly say that it had done her
 good.  It had increased her comforts by making her feel herself to be
 in good hands.  She had seen too much of the world, to expect sudden or
 disinterested attachment anywhere, but her illness had proved to her
 that her landlady had a character to preserve, and would not use her
--**--**--
 patience, resignation:  of all the conflicts and all the sacrifices
 that ennoble us most.  A sick chamber may often furnish the worth of
 volumes."
 
 "Yes," said Mrs Smith more doubtingly, "sometimes it may, though I fear
 its lessons are not often in the elevated style you describe.  Here and
 there, human nature may be great in times of trial; but generally
 speaking, it is its weakness and not its strength that appears in a
 sick chamber:  it is selfishness and impatience rather than generosity
 and fortitude, that one hears of.  There is so little real friendship
 in the world! and unfortunately" (speaking low and tremulously) "there
 are so many who forget to think seriously till it is almost too late."
 
 Anne saw the misery of such feelings.  The husband had not been what he
 ought, and the wife had been led among that part of mankind which made
 her think worse of the world than she hoped it deserved.  It was but a
 passing emotion however with Mrs Smith; she shook it off, and soon
 added in a different tone--
 
 "I do not suppose the situation my friend Mrs Rooke is in at present,
 will furnish much either to interest or edify me.  She is only nursing
 Mrs Wallis of Marlborough Buildings; a mere pretty, silly, expensive,
 fashionable woman, I believe; and of course will have nothing to report
 but of lace and finery.  I mean to make my profit of Mrs Wallis,
 however.  She has plenty of money, and I intend she shall buy all the
 high-priced things I have in hand now."
 
 Anne had called several times on her friend, before the existence of
 such a person was known in Camden Place.  At last, it became necessary
 to speak of her. Sir Walter, Elizabeth and Mrs Clay, returned one
--**--**--
 Though they had now been acquainted a month, she could not be satisfied
 that she really knew his character.  That he was a sensible man, an
 agreeable man, that he talked well, professed good opinions, seemed to
 judge properly and as a man of principle, this was all clear enough.
 He certainly knew what was right, nor could she fix on any one article
 of moral duty evidently transgressed; but yet she would have been
 afraid to answer for his conduct.  She distrusted the past, if not the
 present.  The names which occasionally dropt of former associates, the
 allusions to former practices and pursuits, suggested suspicions not
 favourable of what he had been.  She saw that there had been bad
 habits; that Sunday travelling had been a common thing; that there had
 been a period of his life (and probably not a short one) when he had
 been, at least, careless in all serious matters; and, though he might
 now think very differently, who could answer for the true sentiments of
 a clever, cautious man, grown old enough to appreciate a fair
 character?  How could it ever be ascertained that his mind was truly
 cleansed?
 
 Mr Elliot was rational, discreet, polished, but he was not open.  There
 was never any burst of feeling, any warmth of indignation or delight,
 at the evil or good of others.  This, to Anne, was a decided
 imperfection.  Her early impressions were incurable.  She prized the
 frank, the open-hearted, the eager character beyond all others.  Warmth
 and enthusiasm did captivate her still.  She felt that she could so
 much more depend upon the sincerity of those who sometimes looked or
 said a careless or a hasty thing, than of those whose presence of mind
 never varied, whose tongue never slipped.
 
 Mr Elliot was too generally agreeable.  Various as were the tempers in
--**--**--
 about.  I dare say I shall catch it; and my sore-throats, you know, are
 always worse than anybody's."
 
 
 So ended the first part, which had been afterwards put into an
 envelope, containing nearly as much more.
 
 
 "I kept my letter open, that I might send you word how Louisa bore her
 journey, and now I am extremely glad I did, having a great deal to add.
 In the first place, I had a note from Mrs Croft yesterday, offering to
 convey anything to you; a very kind, friendly note indeed, addressed to
 me, just as it ought; I shall therefore be able to make my letter as
 long as I like.  The Admiral does not seem very ill, and I sincerely
 hope Bath will do him all the good he wants.  I shall be truly glad to
 have them back again.  Our neighbourhood cannot spare such a pleasant
 family.  But now for Louisa.  I have something to communicate that will
 astonish you not a little.  She and the Harvilles came on Tuesday very
 safely, and in the evening we went to ask her how she did, when we were
 rather surprised not to find Captain Benwick of the party, for he had
 been invited as well as the Harvilles; and what do you think was the
 reason?  Neither more nor less than his being in love with Louisa, and
 not choosing to venture to Uppercross till he had had an answer from Mr
 Musgrove; for it was all settled between him and her before she came
 away, and he had written to her father by Captain Harville.  True, upon
 my honour!  Are not you astonished?  I shall be surprised at least if
 you ever received a hint of it, for I never did.  Mrs Musgrove protests
 solemnly that she knew nothing of the matter.  We are all very well
--**--**--
 appeared to have influenced her fate.
 
 The conclusion of the whole was, that if the woman who had been
 sensible of Captain Wentworth's merits could be allowed to prefer
 another man, there was nothing in the engagement to excite lasting
 wonder; and if Captain Wentworth lost no friend by it, certainly
 nothing to be regretted.  No, it was not regret which made Anne's heart
 beat in spite of herself, and brought the colour into her cheeks when
 she thought of Captain Wentworth unshackled and free.  She had some
 feelings which she was ashamed to investigate.  They were too much like
 joy, senseless joy!
 
 She longed to see the Crofts; but when the meeting took place, it was
 evident that no rumour of the news had yet reached them.  The visit of
 ceremony was paid and returned; and Louisa Musgrove was mentioned, and
 Captain Benwick, too, without even half a smile.
 
 The Crofts had placed themselves in lodgings in Gay Street, perfectly
 to Sir Walter's satisfaction.  He was not at all ashamed of the
 acquaintance, and did, in fact, think and talk a great deal more about
 the Admiral, than the Admiral ever thought or talked about him.
 
 The Crofts knew quite as many people in Bath as they wished for, and
 considered their intercourse with the Elliots as a mere matter of form,
 and not in the least likely to afford them any pleasure.  They brought
 with them their country habit of being almost always together.  He was
 ordered to walk to keep off the gout, and Mrs Croft seemed to go shares
 with him in everything, and to walk for her life to do him good.  Anne
 saw them wherever she went.  Lady Russell took her out in her carriage
 almost every morning, and she never failed to think of them, and never
--**--**--
 Christian name:  I always forget her Christian name."
 
 Anne had been ashamed to appear to comprehend so soon as she really
 did; but now she could safely suggest the name of "Louisa."
 
 "Ay, ay, Miss Louisa Musgrove, that is the name.  I wish young ladies
 had not such a number of fine Christian names.  I should never be out
 if they were all Sophys, or something of that sort.  Well, this Miss
 Louisa, we all thought, you know, was to marry Frederick.  He was
 courting her week after week.  The only wonder was, what they could be
 waiting for, till the business at Lyme came; then, indeed, it was clear
 enough that they must wait till her brain was set to right.  But even
 then there was something odd in their way of going on.  Instead of
 staying at Lyme, he went off to Plymouth, and then he went off to see
 Edward.  When we came back from Minehead he was gone down to Edward's,
 and there he has been ever since.  We have seen nothing of him since
 November.  Even Sophy could not understand it.  But now, the matter has
 taken the strangest turn of all; for this young lady, the same Miss
 Musgrove, instead of being to marry Frederick, is to marry James
 Benwick.  You know James Benwick."
 
 "A little.  I am a little acquainted with Captain Benwick."
 
 "Well, she is to marry him.  Nay, most likely they are married already,
 for I do not know what they should wait for."
 
 "I thought Captain Benwick a very pleasing young man," said Anne, "and
 I understand that he bears an excellent character."
 
 "Oh! yes, yes, there is not a word to be said against James Benwick.
 He is only a commander, it is true, made last summer, and these are bad
--**--**--
 between him and Louisa Musgrove; but I hope it may be understood to
 have worn out on each side equally, and without violence.  I hope his
 letter does not breathe the spirit of an ill-used man."
 
 "Not at all, not at all; there is not an oath or a murmur from
 beginning to end."
 
 Anne looked down to hide her smile.
 
 "No, no; Frederick is not a man to whine and complain; he has too much
 spirit for that.  If the girl likes another man better, it is very fit
 she should have him."
 
 "Certainly.  But what I mean is, that I hope there is nothing in
 Captain Wentworth's manner of writing to make you suppose he thinks
 himself ill-used by his friend, which might appear, you know, without
 its being absolutely said.  I should be very sorry that such a
 friendship as has subsisted between him and Captain Benwick should be
 destroyed, or even wounded, by a circumstance of this sort."
 
 "Yes, yes, I understand you.  But there is nothing at all of that
 nature in the letter.  He does not give the least fling at Benwick;
 does not so much as say, 'I wonder at it, I have a reason of my own for
 wondering at it.'  No, you would not guess, from his way of writing,
 that he had ever thought of this Miss (what's her name?) for himself.
 He very handsomely hopes they will be happy together; and there is
 nothing very unforgiving in that, I think."
 
 Anne did not receive the perfect conviction which the Admiral meant to
 convey, but it would have been useless to press the enquiry farther.
 She therefore satisfied herself with common-place remarks or quiet
 attention, and the Admiral had it all his own way.
 
 "Poor Frederick!" said he at last.  "Now he must begin all over again
--**--**--
 was a mere trifle, and Anne was most sincere in preferring a walk with
 Mr Elliot.  But the rain was also a mere trifle to Mrs Clay; she would
 hardly allow it even to drop at all, and her boots were so thick! much
 thicker than Miss Anne's; and, in short, her civility rendered her
 quite as anxious to be left to walk with Mr Elliot as Anne could be,
 and it was discussed between them with a generosity so polite and so
 determined, that the others were obliged to settle it for them; Miss
 Elliot maintaining that Mrs Clay had a little cold already, and Mr
 Elliot deciding on appeal, that his cousin Anne's boots were rather the
 thickest.
 
 It was fixed accordingly, that Mrs Clay should be of the party in the
 carriage; and they had just reached this point, when Anne, as she sat
 near the window, descried, most decidedly and distinctly, Captain
 Wentworth walking down the street.
 
 Her start was perceptible only to herself; but she instantly felt that
 she was the greatest simpleton in the world, the most unaccountable and
 absurd!  For a few minutes she saw nothing before her; it was all
 confusion.  She was lost, and when she had scolded back her senses, she
 found the others still waiting for the carriage, and Mr Elliot (always
 obliging) just setting off for Union Street on a commission of Mrs
 Clay's.
 
 She now felt a great inclination to go to the outer door; she wanted to
 see if it rained.  Why was she to suspect herself of another motive?
 Captain Wentworth must be out of sight.  She left her seat, she would
 go; one half of her should not be always so much wiser than the other
 half, or always suspecting the other of being worse than it was.  She
--**--**--
 thrown into company with Captain Wentworth, her imperfect knowledge of
 the matter might add another shade of prejudice against him.
 
 The following morning Anne was out with her friend, and for the first
 hour, in an incessant and fearful sort of watch for him in vain; but at
 last, in returning down Pulteney Street, she distinguished him on the
 right hand pavement at such a distance as to have him in view the
 greater part of the street.  There were many other men about him, many
 groups walking the same way, but there was no mistaking him.  She
 looked instinctively at Lady Russell; but not from any mad idea of her
 recognising him so soon as she did herself.  No, it was not to be
 supposed that Lady Russell would perceive him till they were nearly
 opposite.  She looked at her however, from time to time, anxiously; and
 when the moment approached which must point him out, though not daring
 to look again (for her own countenance she knew was unfit to be seen),
 she was yet perfectly conscious of Lady Russell's eyes being turned
 exactly in the direction for him--of her being, in short, intently
 observing him.  She could thoroughly comprehend the sort of fascination
 he must possess over Lady Russell's mind, the difficulty it must be for
 her to withdraw her eyes, the astonishment she must be feeling that
 eight or nine years should have passed over him, and in foreign climes
 and in active service too, without robbing him of one personal grace!
 
 At last, Lady Russell drew back her head.  "Now, how would she speak of
 him?"
 
 "You will wonder," said she, "what has been fixing my eye so long; but
 I was looking after some window-curtains, which Lady Alicia and Mrs
 Frankland were telling me of last night.  They described the
--**--**--
 more than perhaps--"
 
 He stopped.  A sudden recollection seemed to occur, and to give him
 some taste of that emotion which was reddening Anne's cheeks and fixing
 her eyes on the ground.  After clearing his throat, however, he
 proceeded thus--
 
 "I confess that I do think there is a disparity, too great a disparity,
 and in a point no less essential than mind.  I regard Louisa Musgrove
 as a very amiable, sweet-tempered girl, and not deficient in
 understanding, but Benwick is something more.  He is a clever man, a
 reading man; and I confess, that I do consider his attaching himself to
 her with some surprise.  Had it been the effect of gratitude, had he
 learnt to love her, because he believed her to be preferring him, it
 would have been another thing.  But I have no reason to suppose it so.
 It seems, on the contrary, to have been a perfectly spontaneous,
 untaught feeling on his side, and this surprises me.  A man like him,
 in his situation! with a heart pierced, wounded, almost broken!  Fanny
 Harville was a very superior creature, and his attachment to her was
 indeed attachment.  A man does not recover from such a devotion of the
 heart to such a woman.  He ought not; he does not."
 
 Either from the consciousness, however, that his friend had recovered,
 or from other consciousness, he went no farther; and Anne who, in spite
 of the agitated voice in which the latter part had been uttered, and in
 spite of all the various noises of the room, the almost ceaseless slam
 of the door, and ceaseless buzz of persons walking through, had
 distinguished every word, was struck, gratified, confused, and
 beginning to breathe very quick, and feel an hundred things in a
 moment.  It was impossible for her to enter on such a subject; and yet,
--**--**--
 "I will not oppose such kind politeness; but I should be sorry to be
 examined by a real proficient."
 
 "I have not had the pleasure of visiting in Camden Place so long,"
 replied he, "without knowing something of Miss Anne Elliot; and I do
 regard her as one who is too modest for the world in general to be
 aware of half her accomplishments, and too highly accomplished for
 modesty to be natural in any other woman."
 
 "For shame! for shame! this is too much flattery.  I forget what we are
 to have next," turning to the bill.
 
 "Perhaps," said Mr Elliot, speaking low, "I have had a longer
 acquaintance with your character than you are aware of."
 
 "Indeed!  How so?  You can have been acquainted with it only since I
 came to Bath, excepting as you might hear me previously spoken of in my
 own family."
 
 "I knew you by report long before you came to Bath.  I had heard you
 described by those who knew you intimately.  I have been acquainted
 with you by character many years.  Your person, your disposition,
 accomplishments, manner; they were all present to me."
 
 Mr Elliot was not disappointed in the interest he hoped to raise.  No
 one can withstand the charm of such a mystery.  To have been described
 long ago to a recent acquaintance, by nameless people, is irresistible;
 and Anne was all curiosity.  She wondered, and questioned him eagerly;
 but in vain.  He delighted in being asked, but he would not tell.
 
 "No, no, some time or other, perhaps, but not now.  He would mention no
 names now; but such, he could assure her, had been the fact.  He had
 many years ago received such a description of Miss Anne Elliot as had
 inspired him with the highest idea of her merit, and excited the
--**--**--
 "No!" he replied impressively, "there is nothing worth my staying for;"
 and he was gone directly.
 
 Jealousy of Mr Elliot!  It was the only intelligible motive.  Captain
 Wentworth jealous of her affection!  Could she have believed it a week
 ago; three hours ago!  For a moment the gratification was exquisite.
 But, alas! there were very different thoughts to succeed.  How was such
 jealousy to be quieted?  How was the truth to reach him?  How, in all
 the peculiar disadvantages of their respective situations, would he
 ever learn of her real sentiments?  It was misery to think of Mr
 Elliot's attentions.  Their evil was incalculable.
 
 
 
 Chapter 21
 
 
 Anne recollected with pleasure the next morning her promise of going to
 Mrs Smith, meaning that it should engage her from home at the time when
 Mr Elliot would be most likely to call; for to avoid Mr Elliot was
 almost a first object.
 
 She felt a great deal of good-will towards him.  In spite of the
 mischief of his attentions, she owed him gratitude and regard, perhaps
 compassion.  She could not help thinking much of the extraordinary
 circumstances attending their acquaintance, of the right which he
 seemed to have to interest her, by everything in situation, by his own
 sentiments, by his early prepossession.  It was altogether very
 extraordinary; flattering, but painful.  There was much to regret.  How
 she might have felt had there been no Captain Wentworth in the case,
 was not worth enquiry; for there was a Captain Wentworth; and be the
 conclusion of the present suspense good or bad, her affection would be
 his for ever.  Their union, she believed, could not divide her more
 from other men, than their final separation.
 
 Prettier musings of high-wrought love and eternal constancy, could
 never have passed along the streets of Bath, than Anne was sporting
--**--**--
 somehow or other, imbibed such a notion.  You must consider me only as
 Mr Elliot's relation.  If in that light there is anything which you
 suppose his cousin might fairly ask of him, I beg you would not
 hesitate to employ me."
 
 Mrs Smith gave her a penetrating glance, and then, smiling, said--
 
 "I have been a little premature, I perceive; I beg your pardon.  I
 ought to have waited for official information,  But now, my dear Miss
 Elliot, as an old friend, do give me a hint as to when I may speak.
 Next week?  To be sure by next week I may be allowed to think it all
 settled, and build my own selfish schemes on Mr Elliot's good fortune."
 
 "No," replied Anne, "nor next week, nor next, nor next.  I assure you
 that nothing of the sort you are thinking of will be settled any week.
 I am not going to marry Mr Elliot.  I should like to know why you
 imagine I am?"
 
 Mrs Smith looked at her again, looked earnestly, smiled, shook her
 head, and exclaimed--
 
 "Now, how I do wish I understood you!  How I do wish I knew what you
 were at!  I have a great idea that you do not design to be cruel, when
 the right moment occurs.  Till it does come, you know, we women never
 mean to have anybody.  It is a thing of course among us, that every man
 is refused, till he offers.  But why should you be cruel?  Let me plead
 for my--present friend I cannot call him, but for my former friend.
 Where can you look for a more suitable match?  Where could you expect a
 more gentlemanlike, agreeable man?  Let me recommend Mr Elliot.  I am
 sure you hear nothing but good of him from Colonel Wallis; and who can
--**--**--
 
 "But," continued Anne, presently, "though there is no truth in my
 having this claim on Mr Elliot, I should be extremely happy to be of
 use to you in any way that I could.  Shall I mention to him your being
 in Bath?  Shall I take any message?"
 
 "No, I thank you:  no, certainly not.  In the warmth of the moment, and
 under a mistaken impression, I might, perhaps, have endeavoured to
 interest you in some circumstances; but not now.  No, I thank you, I
 have nothing to trouble you with."
 
 "I think you spoke of having known Mr Elliot many years?"
 
 "I did."
 
 "Not before he was married, I suppose?"
 
 "Yes; he was not married when I knew him first."
 
 "And--were you much acquainted?"
 
 "Intimately."
 
 "Indeed!  Then do tell me what he was at that time of life.  I have a
 great curiosity to know what Mr Elliot was as a very young man.  Was he
 at all such as he appears now?"
 
 "I have not seen Mr Elliot these three years," was Mrs Smith's answer,
 given so gravely that it was impossible to pursue the subject farther;
 and Anne felt that she had gained nothing but an increase of curiosity.
 They were both silent:  Mrs Smith very thoughtful.  At last--
 
 "I beg your pardon, my dear Miss Elliot," she cried, in her natural
 tone of cordiality, "I beg your pardon for the short answers I have
 been giving you, but I have been uncertain what I ought to do.  I have
 been doubting and considering as to what I ought to tell you.  There
 were many things to be taken into the account.  One hates to be
 officious, to be giving bad impressions, making mischief.  Even the
 smooth surface of family-union seems worth preserving, though there may
--**--**--
 was doing.  'To do the best for himself,' passed as a duty."
 
 "But was not she a very low woman?"
 
 "Yes; which I objected to, but he would not regard.  Money, money, was
 all that he wanted.  Her father was a grazier, her grandfather had been
 a butcher, but that was all nothing.  She was a fine woman, had had a
 decent education, was brought forward by some cousins, thrown by chance
 into Mr Elliot's company, and fell in love with him; and not a
 difficulty or a scruple was there on his side, with respect to her
 birth.  All his caution was spent in being secured of the real amount
 of her fortune, before he committed himself.  Depend upon it, whatever
 esteem Mr Elliot may have for his own situation in life now, as a young
 man he had not the smallest value for it.  His chance for the Kellynch
 estate was something, but all the honour of the family he held as cheap
 as dirt.  I have often heard him declare, that if baronetcies were
 saleable, anybody should have his for fifty pounds, arms and motto,
 name and livery included; but I will not pretend to repeat half that I
 used to hear him say on that subject.  It would not be fair; and yet
 you ought to have proof, for what is all this but assertion, and you
 shall have proof."
 
 "Indeed, my dear Mrs Smith, I want none," cried Anne.  "You have
 asserted nothing contradictory to what Mr Elliot appeared to be some
 years ago.  This is all in confirmation, rather, of what we used to
 hear and believe.  I am more curious to know why he should be so
 different now."
 
 "But for my satisfaction, if you will have the goodness to ring for
--**--**--
 "I wish I had any name but Elliot.  I am sick of it.  The name of
 Walter I can drop, thank God! and I desire you will never insult me
 with my second W. again, meaning, for the rest of my life, to be only
 yours truly,--Wm. Elliot."
 
 Such a letter could not be read without putting Anne in a glow; and Mrs
 Smith, observing the high colour in her face, said--
 
 "The language, I know, is highly disrespectful.  Though I have forgot
 the exact terms, I have a perfect impression of the general meaning.
 But it shows you the man.  Mark his professions to my poor husband.
 Can any thing be stronger?"
 
 Anne could not immediately get over the shock and mortification of
 finding such words applied to her father.  She was obliged to recollect
 that her seeing the letter was a violation of the laws of honour, that
 no one ought to be judged or to be known by such testimonies, that no
 private correspondence could bear the eye of others, before she could
 recover calmness enough to return the letter which she had been
 meditating over, and say--
 
 "Thank you.  This is full proof undoubtedly; proof of every thing you
 were saying.  But why be acquainted with us now?"
 
 "I can explain this too," cried Mrs Smith, smiling.
 
 "Can you really?"
 
 "Yes.  I have shewn you Mr Elliot as he was a dozen years ago, and I
 will shew him as he is now.  I cannot produce written proof again, but
 I can give as authentic oral testimony as you can desire, of what he is
 now wanting, and what he is now doing.  He is no hypocrite now.  He
 truly wants to marry you.  His present attentions to your family are
 very sincere:  quite from the heart.  I will give you my authority: his
--**--**--
 
 "Lessening, I understand," replied Mrs Smith.  "He thinks Mrs Clay
 afraid of him, aware that he sees through her, and not daring to
 proceed as she might do in his absence.  But since he must be absent
 some time or other, I do not perceive how he can ever be secure while
 she holds her present influence.  Mrs Wallis has an amusing idea, as
 nurse tells me, that it is to be put into the marriage articles when
 you and Mr Elliot marry, that your father is not to marry Mrs Clay.  A
 scheme, worthy of Mrs Wallis's understanding, by all accounts; but my
 sensible nurse Rooke sees the absurdity of it.  'Why, to be sure,
 ma'am,' said she, 'it would not prevent his marrying anybody else.'
 And, indeed, to own the truth, I do not think nurse, in her heart, is a
 very strenuous opposer of Sir Walter's making a second match.  She must
 be allowed to be a favourer of matrimony, you know; and (since self
 will intrude) who can say that she may not have some flying visions of
 attending the next Lady Elliot, through Mrs Wallis's recommendation?"
 
 "I am very glad to know all this," said Anne, after a little
 thoughtfulness.  "It will be more painful to me in some respects to be
 in company with him, but I shall know better what to do.  My line of
 conduct will be more direct.  Mr Elliot is evidently a disingenuous,
 artificial, worldly man, who has never had any better principle to
 guide him than selfishness."
 
 But Mr Elliot was not done with.  Mrs Smith had been carried away from
 her first direction, and Anne had forgotten, in the interest of her own
 family concerns, how much had been originally implied against him; but
 her attention was now called to the explanation of those first hints,
--**--**--
 
 Chapter 22
 
 
 Anne went home to think over all that she had heard.  In one point, her
 feelings were relieved by this knowledge of Mr Elliot.  There was no
 longer anything of tenderness due to him.  He stood as opposed to
 Captain Wentworth, in all his own unwelcome obtrusiveness; and the evil
 of his attentions last night, the irremediable mischief he might have
 done, was considered with sensations unqualified, unperplexed.  Pity
 for him was all over.  But this was the only point of relief.  In every
 other respect, in looking around her, or penetrating forward, she saw
 more to distrust and to apprehend.  She was concerned for the
 disappointment and pain Lady Russell would be feeling; for the
 mortifications which must be hanging over her father and sister, and
 had all the distress of foreseeing many evils, without knowing how to
 avert any one of them.  She was most thankful for her own knowledge of
 him.  She had never considered herself as entitled to reward for not
 slighting an old friend like Mrs Smith, but here was a reward indeed
 springing from it!  Mrs Smith had been able to tell her what no one
 else could have done.  Could the knowledge have been extended through
 her family?  But this was a vain idea.  She must talk to Lady Russell,
 tell her, consult with her, and having done her best, wait the event
 with as much composure as possible; and after all, her greatest want of
 composure would be in that quarter of the mind which could not be
 opened to Lady Russell; in that flow of anxieties and fears which must
 be all to herself.
 
 
 She found, on reaching home, that she had, as she intended, escaped
 seeing Mr Elliot; that he had called and paid them a long morning
--**--**--
 father, contrasted with his former language, was odious; and when she
 thought of his cruel conduct towards Mrs Smith, she could hardly bear
 the sight of his present smiles and mildness, or the sound of his
 artificial good sentiments.
 
 She meant to avoid any such alteration of manners as might provoke a
 remonstrance on his side.  It was a great object to her to escape all
 enquiry or eclat; but it was her intention to be as decidedly cool to
 him as might be compatible with their relationship; and to retrace, as
 quietly as she could, the few steps of unnecessary intimacy she had
 been gradually led along.  She was accordingly more guarded, and more
 cool, than she had been the night before.
 
 He wanted to animate her curiosity again as to how and where he could
 have heard her formerly praised; wanted very much to be gratified by
 more solicitation; but the charm was broken: he found that the heat and
 animation of a public room was necessary to kindle his modest cousin's
 vanity; he found, at least, that it was not to be done now, by any of
 those attempts which he could hazard among the too-commanding claims of
 the others.  He little surmised that it was a subject acting now
 exactly against his interest, bringing immediately to her thoughts all
 those parts of his conduct which were least excusable.
 
 She had some satisfaction in finding that he was really going out of
 Bath the next morning, going early, and that he would be gone the
 greater part of two days.  He was invited again to Camden Place the
 very evening of his return; but from Thursday to Saturday evening his
 absence was certain.  It was bad enough that a Mrs Clay should be
 always before her; but that a deeper hypocrite should be added to their
--**--**--
 business.  He had begun to talk of it a week ago; and by way of doing
 something, as shooting was over, Charles had proposed coming with him,
 and Mrs Harville had seemed to like the idea of it very much, as an
 advantage to her husband; but Mary could not bear to be left, and had
 made herself so unhappy about it, that for a day or two everything
 seemed to be in suspense, or at an end.  But then, it had been taken up
 by his father and mother.  His mother had some old friends in Bath whom
 she wanted to see; it was thought a good opportunity for Henrietta to
 come and buy wedding-clothes for herself and her sister; and, in short,
 it ended in being his mother's party, that everything might be
 comfortable and easy to Captain Harville; and he and Mary were included
 in it by way of general convenience.  They had arrived late the night
 before.  Mrs Harville, her children, and Captain Benwick, remained with
 Mr Musgrove and Louisa at Uppercross.
 
 Anne's only surprise was, that affairs should be in forwardness enough
 for Henrietta's wedding-clothes to be talked of.  She had imagined such
 difficulties of fortune to exist there as must prevent the marriage
 from being near at hand; but she learned from Charles that, very
 recently, (since Mary's last letter to herself), Charles Hayter had
 been applied to by a friend to hold a living for a youth who could not
 possibly claim it under many years; and that on the strength of his
 present income, with almost a certainty of something more permanent
 long before the term in question, the two families had consented to the
 young people's wishes, and that their marriage was likely to take place
 in a few months, quite as soon as Louisa's.  "And a very good living it
--**--**--
 Mrs Musgrove and all her party ought to be asked to dine with them; but
 she could not bear to have the difference of style, the reduction of
 servants, which a dinner must betray, witnessed by those who had been
 always so inferior to the Elliots of Kellynch.  It was a struggle
 between propriety and vanity; but vanity got the better, and then
 Elizabeth was happy again.  These were her internal persuasions: "Old
 fashioned notions; country hospitality; we do not profess to give
 dinners; few people in Bath do; Lady Alicia never does; did not even
 ask her own sister's family, though they were here a month: and I dare
 say it would be very inconvenient to Mrs Musgrove; put her quite out of
 her way.  I am sure she would rather not come; she cannot feel easy
 with us.  I will ask them all for an evening; that will be much better;
 that will be a novelty and a treat.  They have not seen two such
 drawing rooms before.  They will be delighted to come to-morrow
 evening.  It shall be a regular party, small, but most elegant."  And
 this satisfied Elizabeth:  and when the invitation was given to the two
 present, and promised for the absent, Mary was as completely satisfied.
 She was particularly asked to meet Mr Elliot, and be introduced to Lady
 Dalrymple and Miss Carteret, who were fortunately already engaged to
 come; and she could not have received a more gratifying attention.
 Miss Elliot was to have the honour of calling on Mrs Musgrove in the
 course of the morning; and Anne walked off with Charles and Mary, to go
 and see her and Henrietta directly.
 
 Her plan of sitting with Lady Russell must give way for the present.
 They all three called in Rivers Street for a couple of minutes; but
--**--**--
 there be constant attachment on each side, our hearts must understand
 each other ere long.  We are not boy and girl, to be captiously
 irritable, misled by every moment's inadvertence, and wantonly playing
 with our own happiness."  And yet, a few minutes afterwards, she felt
 as if their being in company with each other, under their present
 circumstances, could only be exposing them to inadvertencies and
 misconstructions of the most mischievous kind.
 
 "Anne," cried Mary, still at her window, "there is Mrs Clay, I am sure,
 standing under the colonnade, and a gentleman with her.  I saw them
 turn the corner from Bath Street just now.  They seemed deep in talk.
 Who is it?  Come, and tell me.  Good heavens! I recollect.  It is Mr
 Elliot himself."
 
 "No," cried Anne, quickly, "it cannot be Mr Elliot, I assure you.  He
 was to leave Bath at nine this morning, and does not come back till
 to-morrow."
 
 As she spoke, she felt that Captain Wentworth was looking at her, the
 consciousness of which vexed and embarrassed her, and made her regret
 that she had said so much, simple as it was.
 
 Mary, resenting that she should be supposed not to know her own cousin,
 began talking very warmly about the family features, and protesting
 still more positively that it was Mr Elliot, calling again upon Anne to
 come and look for herself, but Anne did not mean to stir, and tried to
 be cool and unconcerned.  Her distress returned, however, on perceiving
 smiles and intelligent glances pass between two or three of the lady
 visitors, as if they believed themselves quite in the secret.  It was
 evident that the report concerning her had spread, and a short pause
 succeeded, which seemed to ensure that it would now spread farther.
 
 "Do come, Anne" cried Mary, "come and look yourself.  You will be too
--**--**--
 not depend on her serving you."
 
 Mrs. Bennet deigned not to make any reply, but, unable to contain
 herself, began scolding one of her daughters.
 
 "Don't keep coughing so, Kitty, for Heaven's sake! Have a little
 compassion on my nerves. You tear them to pieces."
 
 "Kitty has no discretion in her coughs," said her father; "she times
 them ill."
 
 "I do not cough for my own amusement," replied Kitty fretfully. "When is
 your next ball to be, Lizzy?"
 
 "To-morrow fortnight."
 
 "Aye, so it is," cried her mother, "and Mrs. Long does not come back
 till the day before; so it will be impossible for her to introduce him,
 for she will not know him herself."
 
 "Then, my dear, you may have the advantage of your friend, and introduce
 Mr. Bingley to _her_."
 
 "Impossible, Mr. Bennet, impossible, when I am not acquainted with him
 myself; how can you be so teasing?"
 
 "I honour your circumspection. A fortnight's acquaintance is certainly
 very little. One cannot know what a man really is by the end of a
 fortnight. But if _we_ do not venture somebody else will; and after all,
 Mrs. Long and her daughters must stand their chance; and, therefore, as
 she will think it an act of kindness, if you decline the office, I will
 take it on myself."
 
 The girls stared at their father. Mrs. Bennet said only, "Nonsense,
 nonsense!"
 
 "What can be the meaning of that emphatic exclamation?" cried he. "Do
 you consider the forms of introduction, and the stress that is laid on
 them, as nonsense? I cannot quite agree with you _there_. What say you,
 Mary? For you are a young lady of deep reflection, I know, and read
 great books and make extracts."
 
 Mary wished to say something sensible, but knew not how.
 
 "While Mary is adjusting her ideas," he continued, "let us return to Mr.
--**--**--
 accomplished girl in the neighbourhood; and Catherine and Lydia had been
 fortunate enough never to be without partners, which was all that they
 had yet learnt to care for at a ball. They returned, therefore, in good
 spirits to Longbourn, the village where they lived, and of which they
 were the principal inhabitants. They found Mr. Bennet still up. With
 a book he was regardless of time; and on the present occasion he had a
 good deal of curiosity as to the event of an evening which had raised
 such splendid expectations. He had rather hoped that his wife's views on
 the stranger would be disappointed; but he soon found out that he had a
 different story to hear.
 
 "Oh! my dear Mr. Bennet," as she entered the room, "we have had a most
 delightful evening, a most excellent ball. I wish you had been there.
 Jane was so admired, nothing could be like it. Everybody said how well
 she looked; and Mr. Bingley thought her quite beautiful, and danced with
 her twice! Only think of _that_, my dear; he actually danced with her
 twice! and she was the only creature in the room that he asked a second
 time. First of all, he asked Miss Lucas. I was so vexed to see him stand
 up with her! But, however, he did not admire her at all; indeed, nobody
 can, you know; and he seemed quite struck with Jane as she was going
 down the dance. So he inquired who she was, and got introduced, and
 asked her for the two next. Then the two third he danced with Miss King,
 and the two fourth with Maria Lucas, and the two fifth with Jane again,
 and the two sixth with Lizzy, and the _Boulanger_--"
 
 "If he had had any compassion for _me_," cried her husband impatiently,
--**--**--
 estate, but did not live to do it. Mr. Bingley intended it likewise, and
 sometimes made choice of his county; but as he was now provided with a
 good house and the liberty of a manor, it was doubtful to many of those
 who best knew the easiness of his temper, whether he might not spend the
 remainder of his days at Netherfield, and leave the next generation to
 purchase.
 
 His sisters were anxious for his having an estate of his own; but,
 though he was now only established as a tenant, Miss Bingley was by no
 means unwilling to preside at his table--nor was Mrs. Hurst, who had
 married a man of more fashion than fortune, less disposed to consider
 his house as her home when it suited her. Mr. Bingley had not been of
 age two years, when he was tempted by an accidental recommendation
 to look at Netherfield House. He did look at it, and into it for
 half-an-hour--was pleased with the situation and the principal
 rooms, satisfied with what the owner said in its praise, and took it
 immediately.
 
 Between him and Darcy there was a very steady friendship, in spite of
 great opposition of character. Bingley was endeared to Darcy by the
 easiness, openness, and ductility of his temper, though no disposition
 could offer a greater contrast to his own, and though with his own he
 never appeared dissatisfied. On the strength of Darcy's regard, Bingley
 had the firmest reliance, and of his judgement the highest opinion.
 In understanding, Darcy was the superior. Bingley was by no means
 deficient, but Darcy was clever. He was at the same time haughty,
 reserved, and fastidious, and his manners, though well-bred, were not
 inviting. In that respect his friend had greatly the advantage. Bingley
 was sure of being liked wherever he appeared, Darcy was continually
--**--**--
 "Your plan is a good one," replied Elizabeth, "where nothing is in
 question but the desire of being well married, and if I were determined
 to get a rich husband, or any husband, I dare say I should adopt it. But
 these are not Jane's feelings; she is not acting by design. As yet,
 she cannot even be certain of the degree of her own regard nor of its
 reasonableness. She has known him only a fortnight. She danced four
 dances with him at Meryton; she saw him one morning at his own house,
 and has since dined with him in company four times. This is not quite
 enough to make her understand his character."
 
 "Not as you represent it. Had she merely _dined_ with him, she might
 only have discovered whether he had a good appetite; but you must
 remember that four evenings have also been spent together--and four
 evenings may do a great deal."
 
 "Yes; these four evenings have enabled them to ascertain that they
 both like Vingt-un better than Commerce; but with respect to any other
 leading characteristic, I do not imagine that much has been unfolded."
 
 "Well," said Charlotte, "I wish Jane success with all my heart; and
 if she were married to him to-morrow, I should think she had as good a
 chance of happiness as if she were to be studying his character for a
 twelvemonth. Happiness in marriage is entirely a matter of chance. If
 the dispositions of the parties are ever so well known to each other or
 ever so similar beforehand, it does not advance their felicity in the
 least. They always continue to grow sufficiently unlike afterwards to
 have their share of vexation; and it is better to know as little as
 possible of the defects of the person with whom you are to pass your
--**--**--
 Mary had neither genius nor taste; and though vanity had given her
 application, it had given her likewise a pedantic air and conceited
 manner, which would have injured a higher degree of excellence than she
 had reached. Elizabeth, easy and unaffected, had been listened to with
 much more pleasure, though not playing half so well; and Mary, at the
 end of a long concerto, was glad to purchase praise and gratitude by
 Scotch and Irish airs, at the request of her younger sisters, who,
 with some of the Lucases, and two or three officers, joined eagerly in
 dancing at one end of the room.
 
 Mr. Darcy stood near them in silent indignation at such a mode of
 passing the evening, to the exclusion of all conversation, and was too
 much engrossed by his thoughts to perceive that Sir William Lucas was
 his neighbour, till Sir William thus began:
 
 "What a charming amusement for young people this is, Mr. Darcy! There
 is nothing like dancing after all. I consider it as one of the first
 refinements of polished society."
 
 "Certainly, sir; and it has the advantage also of being in vogue amongst
 the less polished societies of the world. Every savage can dance."
 
 Sir William only smiled. "Your friend performs delightfully," he
 continued after a pause, on seeing Bingley join the group; "and I doubt
 not that you are an adept in the science yourself, Mr. Darcy."
 
 "You saw me dance at Meryton, I believe, sir."
 
 "Yes, indeed, and received no inconsiderable pleasure from the sight. Do
 you often dance at St. James's?"
 
 "Never, sir."
 
 "Do you not think it would be a proper compliment to the place?"
 
 "It is a compliment which I never pay to any place if I can avoid it."
 
 "You have a house in town, I conclude?"
--**--**--
 headquarters.
 
 Their visits to Mrs. Phillips were now productive of the most
 interesting intelligence. Every day added something to their knowledge
 of the officers' names and connections. Their lodgings were not long a
 secret, and at length they began to know the officers themselves. Mr.
 Phillips visited them all, and this opened to his nieces a store of
 felicity unknown before. They could talk of nothing but officers; and
 Mr. Bingley's large fortune, the mention of which gave animation
 to their mother, was worthless in their eyes when opposed to the
 regimentals of an ensign.
 
 After listening one morning to their effusions on this subject, Mr.
 Bennet coolly observed:
 
 "From all that I can collect by your manner of talking, you must be two
 of the silliest girls in the country. I have suspected it some time, but
 I am now convinced."
 
 Catherine was disconcerted, and made no answer; but Lydia, with perfect
 indifference, continued to express her admiration of Captain Carter,
 and her hope of seeing him in the course of the day, as he was going the
 next morning to London.
 
 "I am astonished, my dear," said Mrs. Bennet, "that you should be so
 ready to think your own children silly. If I wished to think slightingly
 of anybody's children, it should not be of my own, however."
 
 "If my children are silly, I must hope to be always sensible of it."
 
 "Yes--but as it happens, they are all of them very clever."
 
 "This is the only point, I flatter myself, on which we do not agree. I
 had hoped that our sentiments coincided in every particular, but I must
 so far differ from you as to think our two youngest daughters uncommonly
 foolish."
 
 "My dear Mr. Bennet, you must not expect such girls to have the sense of
--**--**--
 "Can I have the carriage?" said Jane.
 
 "No, my dear, you had better go on horseback, because it seems likely to
 rain; and then you must stay all night."
 
 "That would be a good scheme," said Elizabeth, "if you were sure that
 they would not offer to send her home."
 
 "Oh! but the gentlemen will have Mr. Bingley's chaise to go to Meryton,
 and the Hursts have no horses to theirs."
 
 "I had much rather go in the coach."
 
 "But, my dear, your father cannot spare the horses, I am sure. They are
 wanted in the farm, Mr. Bennet, are they not?"
 
 "They are wanted in the farm much oftener than I can get them."
 
 "But if you have got them to-day," said Elizabeth, "my mother's purpose
 will be answered."
 
 She did at last extort from her father an acknowledgment that the horses
 were engaged. Jane was therefore obliged to go on horseback, and her
 mother attended her to the door with many cheerful prognostics of a
 bad day. Her hopes were answered; Jane had not been gone long before
 it rained hard. Her sisters were uneasy for her, but her mother was
 delighted. The rain continued the whole evening without intermission;
 Jane certainly could not come back.
 
 "This was a lucky idea of mine, indeed!" said Mrs. Bennet more than
 once, as if the credit of making it rain were all her own. Till the
 next morning, however, she was not aware of all the felicity of her
 contrivance. Breakfast was scarcely over when a servant from Netherfield
 brought the following note for Elizabeth:
 
 "MY DEAREST LIZZY,--
 
 "I find myself very unwell this morning, which, I suppose, is to be
 imputed to my getting wet through yesterday. My kind friends will not
 hear of my returning till I am better. They insist also on my seeing Mr.
--**--**--
 inclined to think that you would not wish to see _your_ sister make such
 an exhibition."
 
 "Certainly not."
 
 "To walk three miles, or four miles, or five miles, or whatever it is,
 above her ankles in dirt, and alone, quite alone! What could she mean by
 it? It seems to me to show an abominable sort of conceited independence,
 a most country-town indifference to decorum."
 
 "It shows an affection for her sister that is very pleasing," said
 Bingley.
 
 "I am afraid, Mr. Darcy," observed Miss Bingley in a half whisper, "that
 this adventure has rather affected your admiration of her fine eyes."
 
 "Not at all," he replied; "they were brightened by the exercise." A
 short pause followed this speech, and Mrs. Hurst began again:
 
 "I have an excessive regard for Miss Jane Bennet, she is really a very
 sweet girl, and I wish with all my heart she were well settled. But with
 such a father and mother, and such low connections, I am afraid there is
 no chance of it."
 
 "I think I have heard you say that their uncle is an attorney in
 Meryton."
 
 "Yes; and they have another, who lives somewhere near Cheapside."
 
 "That is capital," added her sister, and they both laughed heartily.
 
 "If they had uncles enough to fill _all_ Cheapside," cried Bingley, "it
 would not make them one jot less agreeable."
 
 "But it must very materially lessen their chance of marrying men of any
 consideration in the world," replied Darcy.
 
 To this speech Bingley made no answer; but his sisters gave it their
 hearty assent, and indulged their mirth for some time at the expense of
 their dear friend's vulgar relations.
 
 With a renewal of tenderness, however, they returned to her room on
 leaving the dining-parlour, and sat with her till summoned to coffee.
--**--**--
 in the room.
 
 "I am astonished," said Miss Bingley, "that my father should have left
 so small a collection of books. What a delightful library you have at
 Pemberley, Mr. Darcy!"
 
 "It ought to be good," he replied, "it has been the work of many
 generations."
 
 "And then you have added so much to it yourself, you are always buying
 books."
 
 "I cannot comprehend the neglect of a family library in such days as
 these."
 
 "Neglect! I am sure you neglect nothing that can add to the beauties of
 that noble place. Charles, when you build _your_ house, I wish it may be
 half as delightful as Pemberley."
 
 "I wish it may."
 
 "But I would really advise you to make your purchase in that
 neighbourhood, and take Pemberley for a kind of model. There is not a
 finer county in England than Derbyshire."
 
 "With all my heart; I will buy Pemberley itself if Darcy will sell it."
 
 "I am talking of possibilities, Charles."
 
 "Upon my word, Caroline, I should think it more possible to get
 Pemberley by purchase than by imitation."
 
 Elizabeth was so much caught with what passed, as to leave her very
 little attention for her book; and soon laying it wholly aside, she drew
 near the card-table, and stationed herself between Mr. Bingley and his
 eldest sister, to observe the game.
 
 "Is Miss Darcy much grown since the spring?" said Miss Bingley; "will
 she be as tall as I am?"
 
 "I think she will. She is now about Miss Elizabeth Bennet's height, or
 rather taller."
 
 "How I long to see her again! I never met with anybody who delighted me
 so much. Such a countenance, such manners! And so extremely accomplished
 for her age! Her performance on the pianoforte is exquisite."
 
 "It is amazing to me," said Bingley, "how young ladies can have patience
--**--**--
 
 "I am sure," she added, "if it was not for such good friends I do not
 know what would become of her, for she is very ill indeed, and suffers
 a vast deal, though with the greatest patience in the world, which is
 always the way with her, for she has, without exception, the sweetest
 temper I have ever met with. I often tell my other girls they are
 nothing to _her_. You have a sweet room here, Mr. Bingley, and a
 charming prospect over the gravel walk. I do not know a place in the
 country that is equal to Netherfield. You will not think of quitting it
 in a hurry, I hope, though you have but a short lease."
 
 "Whatever I do is done in a hurry," replied he; "and therefore if I
 should resolve to quit Netherfield, I should probably be off in five
 minutes. At present, however, I consider myself as quite fixed here."
 
 "That is exactly what I should have supposed of you," said Elizabeth.
 
 "You begin to comprehend me, do you?" cried he, turning towards her.
 
 "Oh! yes--I understand you perfectly."
 
 "I wish I might take this for a compliment; but to be so easily seen
 through I am afraid is pitiful."
 
 "That is as it happens. It does not follow that a deep, intricate
 character is more or less estimable than such a one as yours."
 
 "Lizzy," cried her mother, "remember where you are, and do not run on in
 the wild manner that you are suffered to do at home."
 
 "I did not know before," continued Bingley immediately, "that you were a
 studier of character. It must be an amusing study."
 
 "Yes, but intricate characters are the _most_ amusing. They have at
 least that advantage."
 
 "The country," said Darcy, "can in general supply but a few subjects for
--**--**--
 Lydia declared herself satisfied. "Oh! yes--it would be much better to
 wait till Jane was well, and by that time most likely Captain Carter
 would be at Meryton again. And when you have given _your_ ball," she
 added, "I shall insist on their giving one also. I shall tell Colonel
 Forster it will be quite a shame if he does not."
 
 Mrs. Bennet and her daughters then departed, and Elizabeth returned
 instantly to Jane, leaving her own and her relations' behaviour to the
 remarks of the two ladies and Mr. Darcy; the latter of whom, however,
 could not be prevailed on to join in their censure of _her_, in spite of
 all Miss Bingley's witticisms on _fine eyes_.
 
 
 
 Chapter 10
 
 
 The day passed much as the day before had done. Mrs. Hurst and Miss
 Bingley had spent some hours of the morning with the invalid, who
 continued, though slowly, to mend; and in the evening Elizabeth joined
 their party in the drawing-room. The loo-table, however, did not appear.
 Mr. Darcy was writing, and Miss Bingley, seated near him, was watching
 the progress of his letter and repeatedly calling off his attention by
 messages to his sister. Mr. Hurst and Mr. Bingley were at piquet, and
 Mrs. Hurst was observing their game.
 
 Elizabeth took up some needlework, and was sufficiently amused in
 attending to what passed between Darcy and his companion. The perpetual
 commendations of the lady, either on his handwriting, or on the evenness
 of his lines, or on the length of his letter, with the perfect unconcern
 with which her praises were received, formed a curious dialogue, and was
 exactly in union with her opinion of each.
 
 "How delighted Miss Darcy will be to receive such a letter!"
 
 He made no answer.
 
 "You write uncommonly fast."
 
 "You are mistaken. I write rather slowly."
--**--**--
 because he disliked her, was still more strange. She could only imagine,
 however, at last that she drew his notice because there was something
 more wrong and reprehensible, according to his ideas of right, than in
 any other person present. The supposition did not pain her. She liked
 him too little to care for his approbation.
 
 After playing some Italian songs, Miss Bingley varied the charm by
 a lively Scotch air; and soon afterwards Mr. Darcy, drawing near
 Elizabeth, said to her:
 
 "Do not you feel a great inclination, Miss Bennet, to seize such an
 opportunity of dancing a reel?"
 
 She smiled, but made no answer. He repeated the question, with some
 surprise at her silence.
 
 "Oh!" said she, "I heard you before, but I could not immediately
 determine what to say in reply. You wanted me, I know, to say 'Yes,'
 that you might have the pleasure of despising my taste; but I always
 delight in overthrowing those kind of schemes, and cheating a person of
 their premeditated contempt. I have, therefore, made up my mind to tell
 you, that I do not want to dance a reel at all--and now despise me if
 you dare."
 
 "Indeed I do not dare."
 
 Elizabeth, having rather expected to affront him, was amazed at his
 gallantry; but there was a mixture of sweetness and archness in her
 manner which made it difficult for her to affront anybody; and Darcy
 had never been so bewitched by any woman as he was by her. He really
 believed, that were it not for the inferiority of her connections, he
 should be in some danger.
 
 Miss Bingley saw, or suspected enough to be jealous; and her great
 anxiety for the recovery of her dear friend Jane received some
 assistance from her desire of getting rid of Elizabeth.
--**--**--
 the silence of the whole party on the subject seemed to justify her. Mr.
 Hurst had therefore nothing to do, but to stretch himself on one of the
 sofas and go to sleep. Darcy took up a book; Miss Bingley did the same;
 and Mrs. Hurst, principally occupied in playing with her bracelets
 and rings, joined now and then in her brother's conversation with Miss
 Bennet.
 
 Miss Bingley's attention was quite as much engaged in watching Mr.
 Darcy's progress through _his_ book, as in reading her own; and she
 was perpetually either making some inquiry, or looking at his page. She
 could not win him, however, to any conversation; he merely answered her
 question, and read on. At length, quite exhausted by the attempt to be
 amused with her own book, which she had only chosen because it was the
 second volume of his, she gave a great yawn and said, "How pleasant
 it is to spend an evening in this way! I declare after all there is no
 enjoyment like reading! How much sooner one tires of anything than of a
 book! When I have a house of my own, I shall be miserable if I have not
 an excellent library."
 
 No one made any reply. She then yawned again, threw aside her book, and
 cast her eyes round the room in quest for some amusement; when hearing
 her brother mentioning a ball to Miss Bennet, she turned suddenly
 towards him and said:
 
 "By the bye, Charles, are you really serious in meditating a dance at
 Netherfield? I would advise you, before you determine on it, to consult
 the wishes of the present party; I am much mistaken if there are
 not some among us to whom a ball would be rather a punishment than a
 pleasure."
 
 "If you mean Darcy," cried her brother, "he may go to bed, if he
--**--**--
 Elizabeth.
 
 They found Mary, as usual, deep in the study of thorough-bass and human
 nature; and had some extracts to admire, and some new observations of
 threadbare morality to listen to. Catherine and Lydia had information
 for them of a different sort. Much had been done and much had been said
 in the regiment since the preceding Wednesday; several of the officers
 had dined lately with their uncle, a private had been flogged, and it
 had actually been hinted that Colonel Forster was going to be married.
 
 
 
 Chapter 13
 
 
 "I hope, my dear," said Mr. Bennet to his wife, as they were at
 breakfast the next morning, "that you have ordered a good dinner to-day,
 because I have reason to expect an addition to our family party."
 
 "Who do you mean, my dear? I know of nobody that is coming, I am sure,
 unless Charlotte Lucas should happen to call in--and I hope _my_ dinners
 are good enough for her. I do not believe she often sees such at home."
 
 "The person of whom I speak is a gentleman, and a stranger."
 
 Mrs. Bennet's eyes sparkled. "A gentleman and a stranger! It is Mr.
 Bingley, I am sure! Well, I am sure I shall be extremely glad to see Mr.
 Bingley. But--good Lord! how unlucky! There is not a bit of fish to be
 got to-day. Lydia, my love, ring the bell--I must speak to Hill this
 moment."
 
 "It is _not_ Mr. Bingley," said her husband; "it is a person whom I
 never saw in the whole course of my life."
 
 This roused a general astonishment; and he had the pleasure of being
 eagerly questioned by his wife and his five daughters at once.
 
 After amusing himself some time with their curiosity, he thus explained:
 
 "About a month ago I received this letter; and about a fortnight ago
--**--**--
 when we are better acquainted--"
 
 He was interrupted by a summons to dinner; and the girls smiled on each
 other. They were not the only objects of Mr. Collins's admiration. The
 hall, the dining-room, and all its furniture, were examined and praised;
 and his commendation of everything would have touched Mrs. Bennet's
 heart, but for the mortifying supposition of his viewing it all as his
 own future property. The dinner too in its turn was highly admired; and
 he begged to know to which of his fair cousins the excellency of its
 cooking was owing. But he was set right there by Mrs. Bennet, who
 assured him with some asperity that they were very well able to keep a
 good cook, and that her daughters had nothing to do in the kitchen. He
 begged pardon for having displeased her. In a softened tone she declared
 herself not at all offended; but he continued to apologise for about a
 quarter of an hour.
 
 
 
 Chapter 14
 
 
 During dinner, Mr. Bennet scarcely spoke at all; but when the servants
 were withdrawn, he thought it time to have some conversation with his
 guest, and therefore started a subject in which he expected him to
 shine, by observing that he seemed very fortunate in his patroness. Lady
 Catherine de Bourgh's attention to his wishes, and consideration for
 his comfort, appeared very remarkable. Mr. Bennet could not have chosen
 better. Mr. Collins was eloquent in her praise. The subject elevated him
 to more than usual solemnity of manner, and with a most important aspect
 he protested that "he had never in his life witnessed such behaviour in
 a person of rank--such affability and condescension, as he had himself
 experienced from Lady Catherine. She had been graciously pleased to
 approve of both of the discourses which he had already had the honour of
--**--**--
 miserly father; and though he belonged to one of the universities, he
 had merely kept the necessary terms, without forming at it any useful
 acquaintance. The subjection in which his father had brought him up had
 given him originally great humility of manner; but it was now a
 good deal counteracted by the self-conceit of a weak head, living in
 retirement, and the consequential feelings of early and unexpected
 prosperity. A fortunate chance had recommended him to Lady Catherine de
 Bourgh when the living of Hunsford was vacant; and the respect which
 he felt for her high rank, and his veneration for her as his patroness,
 mingling with a very good opinion of himself, of his authority as a
 clergyman, and his right as a rector, made him altogether a mixture of
 pride and obsequiousness, self-importance and humility.
 
 Having now a good house and a very sufficient income, he intended to
 marry; and in seeking a reconciliation with the Longbourn family he had
 a wife in view, as he meant to choose one of the daughters, if he found
 them as handsome and amiable as they were represented by common report.
 This was his plan of amends--of atonement--for inheriting their father's
 estate; and he thought it an excellent one, full of eligibility and
 suitableness, and excessively generous and disinterested on his own
 part.
 
 His plan did not vary on seeing them. Miss Bennet's lovely face
 confirmed his views, and established all his strictest notions of what
 was due to seniority; and for the first evening _she_ was his settled
 choice. The next morning, however, made an alteration; for in a
 quarter of an hour's tete-a-tete with Mrs. Bennet before breakfast, a
 conversation beginning with his parsonage-house, and leading naturally
 to the avowal of his hopes, that a mistress might be found for it at
--**--**--
 
 In describing to her all the grandeur of Lady Catherine and her mansion,
 with occasional digressions in praise of his own humble abode, and
 the improvements it was receiving, he was happily employed until the
 gentlemen joined them; and he found in Mrs. Phillips a very attentive
 listener, whose opinion of his consequence increased with what she
 heard, and who was resolving to retail it all among her neighbours as
 soon as she could. To the girls, who could not listen to their cousin,
 and who had nothing to do but to wish for an instrument, and examine
 their own indifferent imitations of china on the mantelpiece, the
 interval of waiting appeared very long. It was over at last, however.
 The gentlemen did approach, and when Mr. Wickham walked into the room,
 Elizabeth felt that she had neither been seeing him before, nor thinking
 of him since, with the smallest degree of unreasonable admiration.
 The officers of the ----shire were in general a very creditable,
 gentlemanlike set, and the best of them were of the present party; but
 Mr. Wickham was as far beyond them all in person, countenance, air, and
 walk, as _they_ were superior to the broad-faced, stuffy uncle Phillips,
 breathing port wine, who followed them into the room.
 
 Mr. Wickham was the happy man towards whom almost every female eye was
 turned, and Elizabeth was the happy woman by whom he finally seated
 himself; and the agreeable manner in which he immediately fell into
 conversation, though it was only on its being a wet night, made her feel
 that the commonest, dullest, most threadbare topic might be rendered
 interesting by the skill of the speaker.
 
 With such rivals for the notice of the fair as Mr. Wickham and the
 officers, Mr. Collins seemed to sink into insignificance; to the young
--**--**--
 Pemberley property. He was most highly esteemed by Mr. Darcy, a most
 intimate, confidential friend. Mr. Darcy often acknowledged himself to
 be under the greatest obligations to my father's active superintendence,
 and when, immediately before my father's death, Mr. Darcy gave him a
 voluntary promise of providing for me, I am convinced that he felt it to
 be as much a debt of gratitude to _him_, as of his affection to myself."
 
 "How strange!" cried Elizabeth. "How abominable! I wonder that the very
 pride of this Mr. Darcy has not made him just to you! If from no better
 motive, that he should not have been too proud to be dishonest--for
 dishonesty I must call it."
 
 "It _is_ wonderful," replied Wickham, "for almost all his actions may
 be traced to pride; and pride had often been his best friend. It has
 connected him nearer with virtue than with any other feeling. But we are
 none of us consistent, and in his behaviour to me there were stronger
 impulses even than pride."
 
 "Can such abominable pride as his have ever done him good?"
 
 "Yes. It has often led him to be liberal and generous, to give his money
 freely, to display hospitality, to assist his tenants, and relieve the
 poor. Family pride, and _filial_ pride--for he is very proud of what
 his father was--have done this. Not to appear to disgrace his family,
 to degenerate from the popular qualities, or lose the influence of the
 Pemberley House, is a powerful motive. He has also _brotherly_ pride,
 which, with _some_ brotherly affection, makes him a very kind and
 careful guardian of his sister, and you will hear him generally cried up
 as the most attentive and best of brothers."
 
 "What sort of girl is Miss Darcy?"
 
 He shook his head. "I wish I could call her amiable. It gives me pain to
--**--**--
 everybody."
 
 Elizabeth's spirits were so high on this occasion, that though she did
 not often speak unnecessarily to Mr. Collins, she could not help asking
 him whether he intended to accept Mr. Bingley's invitation, and if
 he did, whether he would think it proper to join in the evening's
 amusement; and she was rather surprised to find that he entertained no
 scruple whatever on that head, and was very far from dreading a rebuke
 either from the Archbishop, or Lady Catherine de Bourgh, by venturing to
 dance.
 
 "I am by no means of the opinion, I assure you," said he, "that a ball
 of this kind, given by a young man of character, to respectable people,
 can have any evil tendency; and I am so far from objecting to dancing
 myself, that I shall hope to be honoured with the hands of all my fair
 cousins in the course of the evening; and I take this opportunity of
 soliciting yours, Miss Elizabeth, for the two first dances especially,
 a preference which I trust my cousin Jane will attribute to the right
 cause, and not to any disrespect for her."
 
 Elizabeth felt herself completely taken in. She had fully proposed being
 engaged by Mr. Wickham for those very dances; and to have Mr. Collins
 instead! her liveliness had never been worse timed. There was no help
 for it, however. Mr. Wickham's happiness and her own were perforce
 delayed a little longer, and Mr. Collins's proposal accepted with as
 good a grace as she could. She was not the better pleased with his
 gallantry from the idea it suggested of something more. It now first
 struck her, that _she_ was selected from among her sisters as worthy
 of being mistress of Hunsford Parsonage, and of assisting to form a
 quadrille table at Rosings, in the absence of more eligible visitors.
--**--**--
 "The _present_ always occupies you in such scenes--does it?" said he,
 with a look of doubt.
 
 "Yes, always," she replied, without knowing what she said, for her
 thoughts had wandered far from the subject, as soon afterwards appeared
 by her suddenly exclaiming, "I remember hearing you once say, Mr. Darcy,
 that you hardly ever forgave, that your resentment once created was
 unappeasable. You are very cautious, I suppose, as to its _being
 created_."
 
 "I am," said he, with a firm voice.
 
 "And never allow yourself to be blinded by prejudice?"
 
 "I hope not."
 
 "It is particularly incumbent on those who never change their opinion,
 to be secure of judging properly at first."
 
 "May I ask to what these questions tend?"
 
 "Merely to the illustration of _your_ character," said she, endeavouring
 to shake off her gravity. "I am trying to make it out."
 
 "And what is your success?"
 
 She shook her head. "I do not get on at all. I hear such different
 accounts of you as puzzle me exceedingly."
 
 "I can readily believe," answered he gravely, "that reports may vary
 greatly with respect to me; and I could wish, Miss Bennet, that you were
 not to sketch my character at the present moment, as there is reason to
 fear that the performance would reflect no credit on either."
 
 "But if I do not take your likeness now, I may never have another
 opportunity."
 
 "I would by no means suspend any pleasure of yours," he coldly replied.
 She said no more, and they went down the other dance and parted in
 silence; and on each side dissatisfied, though not to an equal degree,
 for in Darcy's breast there was a tolerable powerful feeling towards
 her, which soon procured her pardon, and directed all his anger against
 another.
 
 They had not long separated, when Miss Bingley came towards her, and
--**--**--
 had been long yawning at the repetition of delights which she saw no
 likelihood of sharing, was left to the comforts of cold ham and
 chicken. Elizabeth now began to revive. But not long was the interval of
 tranquillity; for, when supper was over, singing was talked of, and
 she had the mortification of seeing Mary, after very little entreaty,
 preparing to oblige the company. By many significant looks and silent
 entreaties, did she endeavour to prevent such a proof of complaisance,
 but in vain; Mary would not understand them; such an opportunity of
 exhibiting was delightful to her, and she began her song. Elizabeth's
 eyes were fixed on her with most painful sensations, and she watched her
 progress through the several stanzas with an impatience which was very
 ill rewarded at their close; for Mary, on receiving, amongst the thanks
 of the table, the hint of a hope that she might be prevailed on to
 favour them again, after the pause of half a minute began another.
 Mary's powers were by no means fitted for such a display; her voice was
 weak, and her manner affected. Elizabeth was in agonies. She looked at
 Jane, to see how she bore it; but Jane was very composedly talking to
 Bingley. She looked at his two sisters, and saw them making signs
 of derision at each other, and at Darcy, who continued, however,
 imperturbably grave. She looked at her father to entreat his
 interference, lest Mary should be singing all night. He took the hint,
 and when Mary had finished her second song, said aloud, "That will do
 extremely well, child. You have delighted us long enough. Let the other
 young ladies have time to exhibit."
 
 Mary, though pretending not to hear, was somewhat disconcerted; and
 Elizabeth, sorry for her, and sorry for her father's speech, was afraid
--**--**--
 will be very happy--I am sure she can have no objection. Come, Kitty, I
 want you up stairs." And, gathering her work together, she was hastening
 away, when Elizabeth called out:
 
 "Dear madam, do not go. I beg you will not go. Mr. Collins must excuse
 me. He can have nothing to say to me that anybody need not hear. I am
 going away myself."
 
 "No, no, nonsense, Lizzy. I desire you to stay where you are." And upon
 Elizabeth's seeming really, with vexed and embarrassed looks, about to
 escape, she added: "Lizzy, I _insist_ upon your staying and hearing Mr.
 Collins."
 
 Elizabeth would not oppose such an injunction--and a moment's
 consideration making her also sensible that it would be wisest to get it
 over as soon and as quietly as possible, she sat down again and tried to
 conceal, by incessant employment the feelings which were divided between
 distress and diversion. Mrs. Bennet and Kitty walked off, and as soon as
 they were gone, Mr. Collins began.
 
 "Believe me, my dear Miss Elizabeth, that your modesty, so far from
 doing you any disservice, rather adds to your other perfections. You
 would have been less amiable in my eyes had there _not_ been this little
 unwillingness; but allow me to assure you, that I have your respected
 mother's permission for this address. You can hardly doubt the
 purport of my discourse, however your natural delicacy may lead you to
 dissemble; my attentions have been too marked to be mistaken. Almost as
 soon as I entered the house, I singled you out as the companion of
 my future life. But before I am run away with by my feelings on this
 subject, perhaps it would be advisable for me to state my reasons for
 marrying--and, moreover, for coming into Hertfordshire with the design
--**--**--
 successful love; for Mrs. Bennet, having dawdled about in the vestibule
 to watch for the end of the conference, no sooner saw Elizabeth open
 the door and with quick step pass her towards the staircase, than she
 entered the breakfast-room, and congratulated both him and herself in
 warm terms on the happy prospect or their nearer connection. Mr. Collins
 received and returned these felicitations with equal pleasure, and then
 proceeded to relate the particulars of their interview, with the result
 of which he trusted he had every reason to be satisfied, since the
 refusal which his cousin had steadfastly given him would naturally flow
 from her bashful modesty and the genuine delicacy of her character.
 
 This information, however, startled Mrs. Bennet; she would have been
 glad to be equally satisfied that her daughter had meant to encourage
 him by protesting against his proposals, but she dared not believe it,
 and could not help saying so.
 
 "But, depend upon it, Mr. Collins," she added, "that Lizzy shall be
 brought to reason. I will speak to her about it directly. She is a very
 headstrong, foolish girl, and does not know her own interest but I will
 _make_ her know it."
 
 "Pardon me for interrupting you, madam," cried Mr. Collins; "but if
 she is really headstrong and foolish, I know not whether she would
 altogether be a very desirable wife to a man in my situation, who
 naturally looks for happiness in the marriage state. If therefore she
 actually persists in rejecting my suit, perhaps it were better not
 to force her into accepting me, because if liable to such defects of
 temper, she could not contribute much to my felicity."
 
 "Sir, you quite misunderstand me," said Mrs. Bennet, alarmed. "Lizzy is
 only headstrong in such matters as these. In everything else she is as
--**--**--
 
 "An unhappy alternative is before you, Elizabeth. From this day you must
 be a stranger to one of your parents. Your mother will never see you
 again if you do _not_ marry Mr. Collins, and I will never see you again
 if you _do_."
 
 Elizabeth could not but smile at such a conclusion of such a beginning,
 but Mrs. Bennet, who had persuaded herself that her husband regarded the
 affair as she wished, was excessively disappointed.
 
 "What do you mean, Mr. Bennet, in talking this way? You promised me to
 _insist_ upon her marrying him."
 
 "My dear," replied her husband, "I have two small favours to request.
 First, that you will allow me the free use of my understanding on the
 present occasion; and secondly, of my room. I shall be glad to have the
 library to myself as soon as may be."
 
 Not yet, however, in spite of her disappointment in her husband, did
 Mrs. Bennet give up the point. She talked to Elizabeth again and again;
 coaxed and threatened her by turns. She endeavoured to secure Jane
 in her interest; but Jane, with all possible mildness, declined
 interfering; and Elizabeth, sometimes with real earnestness, and
 sometimes with playful gaiety, replied to her attacks. Though her manner
 varied, however, her determination never did.
 
 Mr. Collins, meanwhile, was meditating in solitude on what had passed.
 He thought too well of himself to comprehend on what motives his cousin
 could refuse him; and though his pride was hurt, he suffered in no other
 way. His regard for her was quite imaginary; and the possibility of her
 deserving her mother's reproach prevented his feeling any regret.
 
 While the family were in this confusion, Charlotte Lucas came to spend
 the day with them. She was met in the vestibule by Lydia, who, flying to
--**--**--
 her. His accompanying them was a double advantage; she felt all the
 compliment it offered to herself, and it was most acceptable as an
 occasion of introducing him to her father and mother.
 
 Soon after their return, a letter was delivered to Miss Bennet; it came
 from Netherfield. The envelope contained a sheet of elegant, little,
 hot-pressed paper, well covered with a lady's fair, flowing hand; and
 Elizabeth saw her sister's countenance change as she read it, and saw
 her dwelling intently on some particular passages. Jane recollected
 herself soon, and putting the letter away, tried to join with her usual
 cheerfulness in the general conversation; but Elizabeth felt an anxiety
 on the subject which drew off her attention even from Wickham; and no
 sooner had he and his companion taken leave, than a glance from Jane
 invited her to follow her up stairs. When they had gained their own room,
 Jane, taking out the letter, said:
 
 "This is from Caroline Bingley; what it contains has surprised me a good
 deal. The whole party have left Netherfield by this time, and are on
 their way to town--and without any intention of coming back again. You
 shall hear what she says."
 
 She then read the first sentence aloud, which comprised the information
 of their having just resolved to follow their brother to town directly,
 and of their meaning to dine in Grosvenor Street, where Mr. Hurst had a
 house. The next was in these words: "I do not pretend to regret anything
 I shall leave in Hertfordshire, except your society, my dearest friend;
 but we will hope, at some future period, to enjoy many returns of that
 delightful intercourse we have known, and in the meanwhile may
 lessen the pain of separation by a very frequent and most unreserved
 correspondence. I depend on you for that." To these highflown
--**--**--
 
 
 
 Chapter 22
 
 
 The Bennets were engaged to dine with the Lucases and again during the
 chief of the day was Miss Lucas so kind as to listen to Mr. Collins.
 Elizabeth took an opportunity of thanking her. "It keeps him in good
 humour," said she, "and I am more obliged to you than I can express."
 Charlotte assured her friend of her satisfaction in being useful, and
 that it amply repaid her for the little sacrifice of her time. This was
 very amiable, but Charlotte's kindness extended farther than Elizabeth
 had any conception of; its object was nothing else than to secure her
 from any return of Mr. Collins's addresses, by engaging them towards
 herself. Such was Miss Lucas's scheme; and appearances were so
 favourable, that when they parted at night, she would have felt almost
 secure of success if he had not been to leave Hertfordshire so very
 soon. But here she did injustice to the fire and independence of his
 character, for it led him to escape out of Longbourn House the next
 morning with admirable slyness, and hasten to Lucas Lodge to throw
 himself at her feet. He was anxious to avoid the notice of his cousins,
 from a conviction that if they saw him depart, they could not fail to
 conjecture his design, and he was not willing to have the attempt known
 till its success might be known likewise; for though feeling almost
 secure, and with reason, for Charlotte had been tolerably encouraging,
 he was comparatively diffident since the adventure of Wednesday.
 His reception, however, was of the most flattering kind. Miss Lucas
 perceived him from an upper window as he walked towards the house, and
 instantly set out to meet him accidentally in the lane. But little had
 she dared to hope that so much love and eloquence awaited her there.
--**--**--
 the only provision for well-educated young women of small fortune,
 and however uncertain of giving happiness, must be their pleasantest
 preservative from want. This preservative she had now obtained; and at
 the age of twenty-seven, without having ever been handsome, she felt all
 the good luck of it. The least agreeable circumstance in the business
 was the surprise it must occasion to Elizabeth Bennet, whose friendship
 she valued beyond that of any other person. Elizabeth would wonder,
 and probably would blame her; and though her resolution was not to be
 shaken, her feelings must be hurt by such a disapprobation. She resolved
 to give her the information herself, and therefore charged Mr. Collins,
 when he returned to Longbourn to dinner, to drop no hint of what had
 passed before any of the family. A promise of secrecy was of course very
 dutifully given, but it could not be kept without difficulty; for the
 curiosity excited by his long absence burst forth in such very direct
 questions on his return as required some ingenuity to evade, and he was
 at the same time exercising great self-denial, for he was longing to
 publish his prosperous love.
 
 As he was to begin his journey too early on the morrow to see any of the
 family, the ceremony of leave-taking was performed when the ladies moved
 for the night; and Mrs. Bennet, with great politeness and cordiality,
 said how happy they should be to see him at Longbourn again, whenever
 his engagements might allow him to visit them.
 
 "My dear madam," he replied, "this invitation is particularly
 gratifying, because it is what I have been hoping to receive; and
 you may be very certain that I shall avail myself of it as soon as
 possible."
 
 They were all astonished; and Mr. Bennet, who could by no means wish for
--**--**--
 was impossible for that friend to be tolerably happy in the lot she had
 chosen.
 
 
 
 Chapter 23
 
 
 Elizabeth was sitting with her mother and sisters, reflecting on what
 she had heard, and doubting whether she was authorised to mention
 it, when Sir William Lucas himself appeared, sent by his daughter, to
 announce her engagement to the family. With many compliments to them,
 and much self-gratulation on the prospect of a connection between the
 houses, he unfolded the matter--to an audience not merely wondering, but
 incredulous; for Mrs. Bennet, with more perseverance than politeness,
 protested he must be entirely mistaken; and Lydia, always unguarded and
 often uncivil, boisterously exclaimed:
 
 "Good Lord! Sir William, how can you tell such a story? Do not you know
 that Mr. Collins wants to marry Lizzy?"
 
 Nothing less than the complaisance of a courtier could have borne
 without anger such treatment; but Sir William's good breeding carried
 him through it all; and though he begged leave to be positive as to the
 truth of his information, he listened to all their impertinence with the
 most forbearing courtesy.
 
 Elizabeth, feeling it incumbent on her to relieve him from so unpleasant
 a situation, now put herself forward to confirm his account, by
 mentioning her prior knowledge of it from Charlotte herself; and
 endeavoured to put a stop to the exclamations of her mother and sisters
 by the earnestness of her congratulations to Sir William, in which she
 was readily joined by Jane, and by making a variety of remarks on the
 happiness that might be expected from the match, the excellent character
 of Mr. Collins, and the convenient distance of Hunsford from London.
 
 Mrs. Bennet was in fact too much overpowered to say a great deal while
 Sir William remained; but no sooner had he left them than her feelings
--**--**--
 
 Hope was over, entirely over; and when Jane could attend to the rest
 of the letter, she found little, except the professed affection of the
 writer, that could give her any comfort. Miss Darcy's praise occupied
 the chief of it. Her many attractions were again dwelt on, and Caroline
 boasted joyfully of their increasing intimacy, and ventured to predict
 the accomplishment of the wishes which had been unfolded in her former
 letter. She wrote also with great pleasure of her brother's being an
 inmate of Mr. Darcy's house, and mentioned with raptures some plans of
 the latter with regard to new furniture.
 
 Elizabeth, to whom Jane very soon communicated the chief of all this,
 heard it in silent indignation. Her heart was divided between concern
 for her sister, and resentment against all others. To Caroline's
 assertion of her brother's being partial to Miss Darcy she paid no
 credit. That he was really fond of Jane, she doubted no more than she
 had ever done; and much as she had always been disposed to like him, she
 could not think without anger, hardly without contempt, on that easiness
 of temper, that want of proper resolution, which now made him the slave
 of his designing friends, and led him to sacrifice of his own happiness
 to the caprice of their inclination. Had his own happiness, however,
 been the only sacrifice, he might have been allowed to sport with it in
 whatever manner he thought best, but her sister's was involved in it, as
 she thought he must be sensible himself. It was a subject, in short,
 on which reflection would be long indulged, and must be unavailing. She
 could think of nothing else; and yet whether Bingley's regard had really
 died away, or were suppressed by his friends' interference; whether
 he had been aware of Jane's attachment, or whether it had escaped his
--**--**--
 "Your first position is false. They may wish many things besides his
 happiness; they may wish his increase of wealth and consequence; they
 may wish him to marry a girl who has all the importance of money, great
 connections, and pride."
 
 "Beyond a doubt, they _do_ wish him to choose Miss Darcy," replied Jane;
 "but this may be from better feelings than you are supposing. They have
 known her much longer than they have known me; no wonder if they love
 her better. But, whatever may be their own wishes, it is very unlikely
 they should have opposed their brother's. What sister would think
 herself at liberty to do it, unless there were something very
 objectionable? If they believed him attached to me, they would not try
 to part us; if he were so, they could not succeed. By supposing such an
 affection, you make everybody acting unnaturally and wrong, and me most
 unhappy. Do not distress me by the idea. I am not ashamed of having been
 mistaken--or, at least, it is light, it is nothing in comparison of what
 I should feel in thinking ill of him or his sisters. Let me take it in
 the best light, in the light in which it may be understood."
 
 Elizabeth could not oppose such a wish; and from this time Mr. Bingley's
 name was scarcely ever mentioned between them.
 
 Mrs. Bennet still continued to wonder and repine at his returning no
 more, and though a day seldom passed in which Elizabeth did not account
 for it clearly, there was little chance of her ever considering it with
 less perplexity. Her daughter endeavoured to convince her of what she
 did not believe herself, that his attentions to Jane had been merely the
 effect of a common and transient liking, which ceased when he saw her
--**--**--
 town, all our connections are so different, and, as you well know, we go
 out so little, that it is very improbable that they should meet at all,
 unless he really comes to see her."
 
 "And _that_ is quite impossible; for he is now in the custody of his
 friend, and Mr. Darcy would no more suffer him to call on Jane in such
 a part of London! My dear aunt, how could you think of it? Mr. Darcy may
 perhaps have _heard_ of such a place as Gracechurch Street, but he
 would hardly think a month's ablution enough to cleanse him from its
 impurities, were he once to enter it; and depend upon it, Mr. Bingley
 never stirs without him."
 
 "So much the better. I hope they will not meet at all. But does not Jane
 correspond with his sister? _She_ will not be able to help calling."
 
 "She will drop the acquaintance entirely."
 
 But in spite of the certainty in which Elizabeth affected to place this
 point, as well as the still more interesting one of Bingley's being
 withheld from seeing Jane, she felt a solicitude on the subject which
 convinced her, on examination, that she did not consider it entirely
 hopeless. It was possible, and sometimes she thought it probable, that
 his affection might be reanimated, and the influence of his friends
 successfully combated by the more natural influence of Jane's
 attractions.
 
 Miss Bennet accepted her aunt's invitation with pleasure; and the
 Bingleys were no otherwise in her thoughts at the same time, than as she
 hoped by Caroline's not living in the same house with her brother,
 she might occasionally spend a morning with her, without any danger of
 seeing him.
 
 The Gardiners stayed a week at Longbourn; and what with the Phillipses,
 the Lucases, and the officers, there was not a day without its
--**--**--
 the kindness of her hints, they parted; a wonderful instance of advice
 being given on such a point, without being resented.
 
 Mr. Collins returned into Hertfordshire soon after it had been quitted
 by the Gardiners and Jane; but as he took up his abode with the Lucases,
 his arrival was no great inconvenience to Mrs. Bennet. His marriage was
 now fast approaching, and she was at length so far resigned as to think
 it inevitable, and even repeatedly to say, in an ill-natured tone, that
 she "_wished_ they might be happy." Thursday was to be the wedding day,
 and on Wednesday Miss Lucas paid her farewell visit; and when she
 rose to take leave, Elizabeth, ashamed of her mother's ungracious and
 reluctant good wishes, and sincerely affected herself, accompanied her
 out of the room. As they went downstairs together, Charlotte said:
 
 "I shall depend on hearing from you very often, Eliza."
 
 "_That_ you certainly shall."
 
 "And I have another favour to ask you. Will you come and see me?"
 
 "We shall often meet, I hope, in Hertfordshire."
 
 "I am not likely to leave Kent for some time. Promise me, therefore, to
 come to Hunsford."
 
 Elizabeth could not refuse, though she foresaw little pleasure in the
 visit.
 
 "My father and Maria are coming to me in March," added Charlotte, "and I
 hope you will consent to be of the party. Indeed, Eliza, you will be as
 welcome as either of them."
 
 The wedding took place; the bride and bridegroom set off for Kent from
 the church door, and everybody had as much to say, or to hear, on
 the subject as usual. Elizabeth soon heard from her friend; and their
 correspondence was as regular and frequent as it had ever been; that
 it should be equally unreserved was impossible. Elizabeth could never
--**--**--
 remarkable charm of the young lady to whom he was now rendering himself
 agreeable; but Elizabeth, less clear-sighted perhaps in this case than
 in Charlotte's, did not quarrel with him for his wish of independence.
 Nothing, on the contrary, could be more natural; and while able to
 suppose that it cost him a few struggles to relinquish her, she was
 ready to allow it a wise and desirable measure for both, and could very
 sincerely wish him happy.
 
 All this was acknowledged to Mrs. Gardiner; and after relating the
 circumstances, she thus went on: "I am now convinced, my dear aunt, that
 I have never been much in love; for had I really experienced that pure
 and elevating passion, I should at present detest his very name, and
 wish him all manner of evil. But my feelings are not only cordial
 towards _him_; they are even impartial towards Miss King. I cannot find
 out that I hate her at all, or that I am in the least unwilling to
 think her a very good sort of girl. There can be no love in all this. My
 watchfulness has been effectual; and though I certainly should be a more
 interesting object to all my acquaintances were I distractedly in love
 with him, I cannot say that I regret my comparative insignificance.
 Importance may sometimes be purchased too dearly. Kitty and Lydia take
 his defection much more to heart than I do. They are young in the
 ways of the world, and not yet open to the mortifying conviction that
 handsome young men must have something to live on as well as the plain."
 
 
 
 Chapter 27
 
 
 With no greater events than these in the Longbourn family, and otherwise
 diversified by little beyond the walks to Meryton, sometimes dirty and
 sometimes cold, did January and February pass away. March was to take
--**--**--
 to think ill of a young man who has lived so long in Derbyshire."
 
 "Oh! if that is all, I have a very poor opinion of young men who live in
 Derbyshire; and their intimate friends who live in Hertfordshire are not
 much better. I am sick of them all. Thank Heaven! I am going to-morrow
 where I shall find a man who has not one agreeable quality, who has
 neither manner nor sense to recommend him. Stupid men are the only ones
 worth knowing, after all."
 
 "Take care, Lizzy; that speech savours strongly of disappointment."
 
 Before they were separated by the conclusion of the play, she had the
 unexpected happiness of an invitation to accompany her uncle and aunt in
 a tour of pleasure which they proposed taking in the summer.
 
 "We have not determined how far it shall carry us," said Mrs. Gardiner,
 "but, perhaps, to the Lakes."
 
 No scheme could have been more agreeable to Elizabeth, and her
 acceptance of the invitation was most ready and grateful. "Oh, my dear,
 dear aunt," she rapturously cried, "what delight! what felicity! You
 give me fresh life and vigour. Adieu to disappointment and spleen. What
 are young men to rocks and mountains? Oh! what hours of transport
 we shall spend! And when we _do_ return, it shall not be like other
 travellers, without being able to give one accurate idea of anything. We
 _will_ know where we have gone--we _will_ recollect what we have seen.
 Lakes, mountains, and rivers shall not be jumbled together in our
 imaginations; nor when we attempt to describe any particular scene,
 will we begin quarreling about its relative situation. Let _our_
 first effusions be less insupportable than those of the generality of
 travellers."
 
 
 
 Chapter 28
 
 
 Every object in the next day's journey was new and interesting to
--**--**--
 to dine at Rosings the next day.
 
 
 
 Chapter 29
 
 
 Mr. Collins's triumph, in consequence of this invitation, was complete.
 The power of displaying the grandeur of his patroness to his wondering
 visitors, and of letting them see her civility towards himself and his
 wife, was exactly what he had wished for; and that an opportunity
 of doing it should be given so soon, was such an instance of Lady
 Catherine's condescension, as he knew not how to admire enough.
 
 "I confess," said he, "that I should not have been at all surprised by
 her ladyship's asking us on Sunday to drink tea and spend the evening at
 Rosings. I rather expected, from my knowledge of her affability, that it
 would happen. But who could have foreseen such an attention as this? Who
 could have imagined that we should receive an invitation to dine there
 (an invitation, moreover, including the whole party) so immediately
 after your arrival!"
 
 "I am the less surprised at what has happened," replied Sir William,
 "from that knowledge of what the manners of the great really are, which
 my situation in life has allowed me to acquire. About the court, such
 instances of elegant breeding are not uncommon."
 
 Scarcely anything was talked of the whole day or next morning but their
 visit to Rosings. Mr. Collins was carefully instructing them in what
 they were to expect, that the sight of such rooms, so many servants, and
 so splendid a dinner, might not wholly overpower them.
 
 When the ladies were separating for the toilette, he said to Elizabeth--
 
 "Do not make yourself uneasy, my dear cousin, about your apparel. Lady
 Catherine is far from requiring that elegance of dress in us which
 becomes herself and her daughter. I would advise you merely to put on
 whatever of your clothes is superior to the rest--there is no occasion
--**--**--
 gentlemen did nothing but eat and admire.
 
 When the ladies returned to the drawing-room, there was little to
 be done but to hear Lady Catherine talk, which she did without any
 intermission till coffee came in, delivering her opinion on every
 subject in so decisive a manner, as proved that she was not used to
 have her judgement controverted. She inquired into Charlotte's domestic
 concerns familiarly and minutely, gave her a great deal of advice as
 to the management of them all; told her how everything ought to be
 regulated in so small a family as hers, and instructed her as to the
 care of her cows and her poultry. Elizabeth found that nothing was
 beneath this great lady's attention, which could furnish her with an
 occasion of dictating to others. In the intervals of her discourse
 with Mrs. Collins, she addressed a variety of questions to Maria and
 Elizabeth, but especially to the latter, of whose connections she knew
 the least, and who she observed to Mrs. Collins was a very genteel,
 pretty kind of girl. She asked her, at different times, how many sisters
 she had, whether they were older or younger than herself, whether any of
 them were likely to be married, whether they were handsome, where they
 had been educated, what carriage her father kept, and what had been
 her mother's maiden name? Elizabeth felt all the impertinence of
 her questions but answered them very composedly. Lady Catherine then
 observed,
 
 "Your father's estate is entailed on Mr. Collins, I think. For your
 sake," turning to Charlotte, "I am glad of it; but otherwise I see no
 occasion for entailing estates from the female line. It was not thought
 necessary in Sir Lewis de Bourgh's family. Do you play and sing, Miss
 Bennet?"
 
 "A little."
 
 "Oh! then--some time or other we shall be happy to hear you. Our
--**--**--
 
 Chapter 30
 
 
 Sir William stayed only a week at Hunsford, but his visit was long
 enough to convince him of his daughter's being most comfortably settled,
 and of her possessing such a husband and such a neighbour as were not
 often met with. While Sir William was with them, Mr. Collins devoted his
 morning to driving him out in his gig, and showing him the country; but
 when he went away, the whole family returned to their usual employments,
 and Elizabeth was thankful to find that they did not see more of her
 cousin by the alteration, for the chief of the time between breakfast
 and dinner was now passed by him either at work in the garden or in
 reading and writing, and looking out of the window in his own book-room,
 which fronted the road. The room in which the ladies sat was backwards.
 Elizabeth had at first rather wondered that Charlotte should not prefer
 the dining-parlour for common use; it was a better sized room, and had a
 more pleasant aspect; but she soon saw that her friend had an excellent
 reason for what she did, for Mr. Collins would undoubtedly have been
 much less in his own apartment, had they sat in one equally lively; and
 she gave Charlotte credit for the arrangement.
 
 From the drawing-room they could distinguish nothing in the lane, and
 were indebted to Mr. Collins for the knowledge of what carriages went
 along, and how often especially Miss de Bourgh drove by in her phaeton,
 which he never failed coming to inform them of, though it happened
 almost every day. She not unfrequently stopped at the Parsonage, and
 had a few minutes' conversation with Charlotte, but was scarcely ever
 prevailed upon to get out.
 
 Very few days passed in which Mr. Collins did not walk to Rosings, and
--**--**--
 me, and teach you not to believe a word I say. I am particularly unlucky
 in meeting with a person so able to expose my real character, in a part
 of the world where I had hoped to pass myself off with some degree of
 credit. Indeed, Mr. Darcy, it is very ungenerous in you to mention all
 that you knew to my disadvantage in Hertfordshire--and, give me leave to
 say, very impolitic too--for it is provoking me to retaliate, and such
 things may come out as will shock your relations to hear."
 
 "I am not afraid of you," said he, smilingly.
 
 "Pray let me hear what you have to accuse him of," cried Colonel
 Fitzwilliam. "I should like to know how he behaves among strangers."
 
 "You shall hear then--but prepare yourself for something very dreadful.
 The first time of my ever seeing him in Hertfordshire, you must know,
 was at a ball--and at this ball, what do you think he did? He danced
 only four dances, though gentlemen were scarce; and, to my certain
 knowledge, more than one young lady was sitting down in want of a
 partner. Mr. Darcy, you cannot deny the fact."
 
 "I had not at that time the honour of knowing any lady in the assembly
 beyond my own party."
 
 "True; and nobody can ever be introduced in a ball-room. Well, Colonel
 Fitzwilliam, what do I play next? My fingers wait your orders."
 
 "Perhaps," said Darcy, "I should have judged better, had I sought an
 introduction; but I am ill-qualified to recommend myself to strangers."
 
 "Shall we ask your cousin the reason of this?" said Elizabeth, still
 addressing Colonel Fitzwilliam. "Shall we ask him why a man of sense and
 education, and who has lived in the world, is ill qualified to recommend
 himself to strangers?"
--**--**--
 from the time of year. All field sports were over. Within doors there
 was Lady Catherine, books, and a billiard-table, but gentlemen cannot
 always be within doors; and in the nearness of the Parsonage, or the
 pleasantness of the walk to it, or of the people who lived in it, the
 two cousins found a temptation from this period of walking thither
 almost every day. They called at various times of the morning, sometimes
 separately, sometimes together, and now and then accompanied by their
 aunt. It was plain to them all that Colonel Fitzwilliam came because he
 had pleasure in their society, a persuasion which of course recommended
 him still more; and Elizabeth was reminded by her own satisfaction in
 being with him, as well as by his evident admiration of her, of her
 former favourite George Wickham; and though, in comparing them, she saw
 there was less captivating softness in Colonel Fitzwilliam's manners,
 she believed he might have the best informed mind.
 
 But why Mr. Darcy came so often to the Parsonage, it was more difficult
 to understand. It could not be for society, as he frequently sat there
 ten minutes together without opening his lips; and when he did speak,
 it seemed the effect of necessity rather than of choice--a sacrifice
 to propriety, not a pleasure to himself. He seldom appeared really
 animated. Mrs. Collins knew not what to make of him. Colonel
 Fitzwilliam's occasionally laughing at his stupidity, proved that he was
 generally different, which her own knowledge of him could not have told
 her; and as she would liked to have believed this change the effect
 of love, and the object of that love her friend Eliza, she set herself
 seriously to work to find it out. She watched him whenever they were at
 Rosings, and whenever he came to Hunsford; but without much success. He
--**--**--
 
 "In my opinion, the younger son of an earl can know very little of
 either. Now seriously, what have you ever known of self-denial and
 dependence? When have you been prevented by want of money from going
 wherever you chose, or procuring anything you had a fancy for?"
 
 "These are home questions--and perhaps I cannot say that I have
 experienced many hardships of that nature. But in matters of greater
 weight, I may suffer from want of money. Younger sons cannot marry where
 they like."
 
 "Unless where they like women of fortune, which I think they very often
 do."
 
 "Our habits of expense make us too dependent, and there are not many
 in my rank of life who can afford to marry without some attention to
 money."
 
 "Is this," thought Elizabeth, "meant for me?" and she coloured at the
 idea; but, recovering herself, said in a lively tone, "And pray, what
 is the usual price of an earl's younger son? Unless the elder brother is
 very sickly, I suppose you would not ask above fifty thousand pounds."
 
 He answered her in the same style, and the subject dropped. To interrupt
 a silence which might make him fancy her affected with what had passed,
 she soon afterwards said:
 
 "I imagine your cousin brought you down with him chiefly for the sake of
 having someone at his disposal. I wonder he does not marry, to secure a
 lasting convenience of that kind. But, perhaps, his sister does as well
 for the present, and, as she is under his sole care, he may do what he
 likes with her."
 
 "No," said Colonel Fitzwilliam, "that is an advantage which he must
 divide with me. I am joined with him in the guardianship of Miss Darcy."
 
 "Are you indeed? And pray what sort of guardians do you make? Does your
--**--**--
 cheerfulness which had been used to characterise her style, and which,
 proceeding from the serenity of a mind at ease with itself and kindly
 disposed towards everyone, had been scarcely ever clouded. Elizabeth
 noticed every sentence conveying the idea of uneasiness, with an
 attention which it had hardly received on the first perusal. Mr. Darcy's
 shameful boast of what misery he had been able to inflict, gave her
 a keener sense of her sister's sufferings. It was some consolation
 to think that his visit to Rosings was to end on the day after the
 next--and, a still greater, that in less than a fortnight she should
 herself be with Jane again, and enabled to contribute to the recovery of
 her spirits, by all that affection could do.
 
 She could not think of Darcy's leaving Kent without remembering that
 his cousin was to go with him; but Colonel Fitzwilliam had made it clear
 that he had no intentions at all, and agreeable as he was, she did not
 mean to be unhappy about him.
 
 While settling this point, she was suddenly roused by the sound of the
 door-bell, and her spirits were a little fluttered by the idea of its
 being Colonel Fitzwilliam himself, who had once before called late in
 the evening, and might now come to inquire particularly after her.
 But this idea was soon banished, and her spirits were very differently
 affected, when, to her utter amazement, she saw Mr. Darcy walk into the
 room. In an hurried manner he immediately began an inquiry after her
 health, imputing his visit to a wish of hearing that she were better.
 She answered him with cold civility. He sat down for a few moments, and
 then getting up, walked about the room. Elizabeth was surprised, but
 said not a word. After a silence of several minutes, he came towards her
--**--**--
 disappointed hopes, and involving them both in misery of the acutest
 kind."
 
 She paused, and saw with no slight indignation that he was listening
 with an air which proved him wholly unmoved by any feeling of remorse.
 He even looked at her with a smile of affected incredulity.
 
 "Can you deny that you have done it?" she repeated.
 
 With assumed tranquillity he then replied: "I have no wish of denying
 that I did everything in my power to separate my friend from your
 sister, or that I rejoice in my success. Towards _him_ I have been
 kinder than towards myself."
 
 Elizabeth disdained the appearance of noticing this civil reflection,
 but its meaning did not escape, nor was it likely to conciliate her.
 
 "But it is not merely this affair," she continued, "on which my dislike
 is founded. Long before it had taken place my opinion of you was
 decided. Your character was unfolded in the recital which I received
 many months ago from Mr. Wickham. On this subject, what can you have to
 say? In what imaginary act of friendship can you here defend yourself?
 or under what misrepresentation can you here impose upon others?"
 
 "You take an eager interest in that gentleman's concerns," said Darcy,
 in a less tranquil tone, and with a heightened colour.
 
 "Who that knows what his misfortunes have been, can help feeling an
 interest in him?"
 
 "His misfortunes!" repeated Darcy contemptuously; "yes, his misfortunes
 have been great indeed."
 
 "And of your infliction," cried Elizabeth with energy. "You have reduced
 him to his present state of poverty--comparative poverty. You have
 withheld the advantages which you must know to have been designed for
 him. You have deprived the best years of his life of that independence
 which was no less his due than his desert. You have done all this!
--**--**--
 Bennet was beyond what I had ever witnessed in him. Your sister I also
 watched. Her look and manners were open, cheerful, and engaging as ever,
 but without any symptom of peculiar regard, and I remained convinced
 from the evening's scrutiny, that though she received his attentions
 with pleasure, she did not invite them by any participation of
 sentiment. If _you_ have not been mistaken here, _I_ must have been
 in error. Your superior knowledge of your sister must make the latter
 probable. If it be so, if I have been misled by such error to inflict
 pain on her, your resentment has not been unreasonable. But I shall not
 scruple to assert, that the serenity of your sister's countenance and
 air was such as might have given the most acute observer a conviction
 that, however amiable her temper, her heart was not likely to be
 easily touched. That I was desirous of believing her indifferent is
 certain--but I will venture to say that my investigation and decisions
 are not usually influenced by my hopes or fears. I did not believe
 her to be indifferent because I wished it; I believed it on impartial
 conviction, as truly as I wished it in reason. My objections to the
 marriage were not merely those which I last night acknowledged to have
 the utmost force of passion to put aside, in my own case; the want of
 connection could not be so great an evil to my friend as to me. But
 there were other causes of repugnance; causes which, though still
 existing, and existing to an equal degree in both instances, I had
 myself endeavoured to forget, because they were not immediately before
 me. These causes must be stated, though briefly. The situation of your
 mother's family, though objectionable, was nothing in comparison to that
--**--**--
 ill consequence is perhaps probable; but his regard did not appear to me
 enough extinguished for him to see her without some danger. Perhaps this
 concealment, this disguise was beneath me; it is done, however, and it
 was done for the best. On this subject I have nothing more to say, no
 other apology to offer. If I have wounded your sister's feelings, it
 was unknowingly done and though the motives which governed me may to
 you very naturally appear insufficient, I have not yet learnt to condemn
 them.
 
 "With respect to that other, more weighty accusation, of having injured
 Mr. Wickham, I can only refute it by laying before you the whole of his
 connection with my family. Of what he has _particularly_ accused me I
 am ignorant; but of the truth of what I shall relate, I can summon more
 than one witness of undoubted veracity.
 
 "Mr. Wickham is the son of a very respectable man, who had for many
 years the management of all the Pemberley estates, and whose good
 conduct in the discharge of his trust naturally inclined my father to
 be of service to him; and on George Wickham, who was his godson, his
 kindness was therefore liberally bestowed. My father supported him at
 school, and afterwards at Cambridge--most important assistance, as his
 own father, always poor from the extravagance of his wife, would have
 been unable to give him a gentleman's education. My father was not only
 fond of this young man's society, whose manners were always engaging; he
 had also the highest opinion of him, and hoping the church would be
 his profession, intended to provide for him in it. As for myself, it is
 many, many years since I first began to think of him in a very different
 manner. The vicious propensities--the want of principle, which he was
--**--**--
 This cannot be! This must be the grossest falsehood!"--and when she had
 gone through the whole letter, though scarcely knowing anything of the
 last page or two, put it hastily away, protesting that she would not
 regard it, that she would never look in it again.
 
 In this perturbed state of mind, with thoughts that could rest on
 nothing, she walked on; but it would not do; in half a minute the letter
 was unfolded again, and collecting herself as well as she could, she
 again began the mortifying perusal of all that related to Wickham, and
 commanded herself so far as to examine the meaning of every sentence.
 The account of his connection with the Pemberley family was exactly what
 he had related himself; and the kindness of the late Mr. Darcy, though
 she had not before known its extent, agreed equally well with his own
 words. So far each recital confirmed the other; but when she came to the
 will, the difference was great. What Wickham had said of the living
 was fresh in her memory, and as she recalled his very words, it was
 impossible not to feel that there was gross duplicity on one side or the
 other; and, for a few moments, she flattered herself that her wishes did
 not err. But when she read and re-read with the closest attention, the
 particulars immediately following of Wickham's resigning all pretensions
 to the living, of his receiving in lieu so considerable a sum as three
 thousand pounds, again was she forced to hesitate. She put down
 the letter, weighed every circumstance with what she meant to be
 impartiality--deliberated on the probability of each statement--but with
 little success. On both sides it was only assertion. Again she read
 on; but every line proved more clearly that the affair, which she had
--**--**--
 His attentions to Miss King were now the consequence of views solely and
 hatefully mercenary; and the mediocrity of her fortune proved no longer
 the moderation of his wishes, but his eagerness to grasp at anything.
 His behaviour to herself could now have had no tolerable motive; he had
 either been deceived with regard to her fortune, or had been gratifying
 his vanity by encouraging the preference which she believed she had most
 incautiously shown. Every lingering struggle in his favour grew fainter
 and fainter; and in farther justification of Mr. Darcy, she could not
 but allow that Mr. Bingley, when questioned by Jane, had long ago
 asserted his blamelessness in the affair; that proud and repulsive as
 were his manners, she had never, in the whole course of their
 acquaintance--an acquaintance which had latterly brought them much
 together, and given her a sort of intimacy with his ways--seen anything
 that betrayed him to be unprincipled or unjust--anything that spoke him
 of irreligious or immoral habits; that among his own connections he was
 esteemed and valued--that even Wickham had allowed him merit as a
 brother, and that she had often heard him speak so affectionately of his
 sister as to prove him capable of _some_ amiable feeling; that had his
 actions been what Mr. Wickham represented them, so gross a violation of
 everything right could hardly have been concealed from the world; and
 that friendship between a person capable of it, and such an amiable man
 as Mr. Bingley, was incomprehensible.
 
 She grew absolutely ashamed of herself. Of neither Darcy nor Wickham
 could she think without feeling she had been blind, partial, prejudiced,
 absurd.
 
 "How despicably I have acted!" she cried; "I, who have prided myself
 on my discernment! I, who have valued myself on my abilities! who have
--**--**--
 
 Lady Catherine seemed resigned. "Mrs. Collins, you must send a servant
 with them. You know I always speak my mind, and I cannot bear the idea
 of two young women travelling post by themselves. It is highly improper.
 You must contrive to send somebody. I have the greatest dislike in
 the world to that sort of thing. Young women should always be properly
 guarded and attended, according to their situation in life. When my
 niece Georgiana went to Ramsgate last summer, I made a point of her
 having two men-servants go with her. Miss Darcy, the daughter of
 Mr. Darcy, of Pemberley, and Lady Anne, could not have appeared with
 propriety in a different manner. I am excessively attentive to all those
 things. You must send John with the young ladies, Mrs. Collins. I
 am glad it occurred to me to mention it; for it would really be
 discreditable to _you_ to let them go alone."
 
 "My uncle is to send a servant for us."
 
 "Oh! Your uncle! He keeps a man-servant, does he? I am very glad you
 have somebody who thinks of these things. Where shall you change horses?
 Oh! Bromley, of course. If you mention my name at the Bell, you will be
 attended to."
 
 Lady Catherine had many other questions to ask respecting their journey,
 and as she did not answer them all herself, attention was necessary,
 which Elizabeth believed to be lucky for her; or, with a mind so
 occupied, she might have forgotten where she was. Reflection must be
 reserved for solitary hours; whenever she was alone, she gave way to it
 as the greatest relief; and not a day went by without a solitary
 walk, in which she might indulge in all the delight of unpleasant
 recollections.
 
 Mr. Darcy's letter she was in a fair way of soon knowing by heart. She
--**--**--
 
 Elizabeth was eager with her thanks and assurances of happiness. She
 had spent six weeks with great enjoyment; and the pleasure of being with
 Charlotte, and the kind attentions she had received, must make _her_
 feel the obliged. Mr. Collins was gratified, and with a more smiling
 solemnity replied:
 
 "It gives me great pleasure to hear that you have passed your time not
 disagreeably. We have certainly done our best; and most fortunately
 having it in our power to introduce you to very superior society, and,
 from our connection with Rosings, the frequent means of varying the
 humble home scene, I think we may flatter ourselves that your Hunsford
 visit cannot have been entirely irksome. Our situation with regard to
 Lady Catherine's family is indeed the sort of extraordinary advantage
 and blessing which few can boast. You see on what a footing we are. You
 see how continually we are engaged there. In truth I must acknowledge
 that, with all the disadvantages of this humble parsonage, I should
 not think anyone abiding in it an object of compassion, while they are
 sharers of our intimacy at Rosings."
 
 Words were insufficient for the elevation of his feelings; and he was
 obliged to walk about the room, while Elizabeth tried to unite civility
 and truth in a few short sentences.
 
 "You may, in fact, carry a very favourable report of us into
 Hertfordshire, my dear cousin. I flatter myself at least that you will
 be able to do so. Lady Catherine's great attentions to Mrs. Collins you
 have been a daily witness of; and altogether I trust it does not appear
 that your friend has drawn an unfortunate--but on this point it will be
 as well to be silent. Only let me assure you, my dear Miss Elizabeth,
 that I can from my heart most cordially wish you equal felicity in
--**--**--
 that she had the power of revealing what would so exceedingly astonish
 Jane, and must, at the same time, so highly gratify whatever of her own
 vanity she had not yet been able to reason away, was such a temptation
 to openness as nothing could have conquered but the state of indecision
 in which she remained as to the extent of what she should communicate;
 and her fear, if she once entered on the subject, of being hurried
 into repeating something of Bingley which might only grieve her sister
 further.
 
 
 
 Chapter 39
 
 
 It was the second week in May, in which the three young ladies set out
 together from Gracechurch Street for the town of ----, in Hertfordshire;
 and, as they drew near the appointed inn where Mr. Bennet's carriage
 was to meet them, they quickly perceived, in token of the coachman's
 punctuality, both Kitty and Lydia looking out of a dining-room up stairs.
 These two girls had been above an hour in the place, happily employed
 in visiting an opposite milliner, watching the sentinel on guard, and
 dressing a salad and cucumber.
 
 After welcoming their sisters, they triumphantly displayed a table set
 out with such cold meat as an inn larder usually affords, exclaiming,
 "Is not this nice? Is not this an agreeable surprise?"
 
 "And we mean to treat you all," added Lydia, "but you must lend us the
 money, for we have just spent ours at the shop out there." Then, showing
 her purchases--"Look here, I have bought this bonnet. I do not think
 it is very pretty; but I thought I might as well buy it as not. I shall
 pull it to pieces as soon as I get home, and see if I can make it up any
 better."
 
 And when her sisters abused it as ugly, she added, with perfect
--**--**--
 Lydia, assisted by Kitty's hints and additions, endeavour to amuse her
 companions all the way to Longbourn. Elizabeth listened as little as she
 could, but there was no escaping the frequent mention of Wickham's name.
 
 Their reception at home was most kind. Mrs. Bennet rejoiced to see Jane
 in undiminished beauty; and more than once during dinner did Mr. Bennet
 say voluntarily to Elizabeth:
 
 "I am glad you are come back, Lizzy."
 
 Their party in the dining-room was large, for almost all the Lucases
 came to meet Maria and hear the news; and various were the subjects that
 occupied them: Lady Lucas was inquiring of Maria, after the welfare and
 poultry of her eldest daughter; Mrs. Bennet was doubly engaged, on one
 hand collecting an account of the present fashions from Jane, who sat
 some way below her, and, on the other, retailing them all to the younger
 Lucases; and Lydia, in a voice rather louder than any other person's,
 was enumerating the various pleasures of the morning to anybody who
 would hear her.
 
 "Oh! Mary," said she, "I wish you had gone with us, for we had such fun!
 As we went along, Kitty and I drew up the blinds, and pretended there
 was nobody in the coach; and I should have gone so all the way, if Kitty
 had not been sick; and when we got to the George, I do think we behaved
 very handsomely, for we treated the other three with the nicest cold
 luncheon in the world, and if you would have gone, we would have treated
 you too. And then when we came away it was such fun! I thought we never
 should have got into the coach. I was ready to die of laughter. And then
 we were so merry all the way home! we talked and laughed so loud, that
--**--**--
 
 But as Elizabeth could not receive comfort from any such expectation,
 she made no answer.
 
 "Well, Lizzy," continued her mother, soon afterwards, "and so the
 Collinses live very comfortable, do they? Well, well, I only hope
 it will last. And what sort of table do they keep? Charlotte is an
 excellent manager, I dare say. If she is half as sharp as her
 mother, she is saving enough. There is nothing extravagant in _their_
 housekeeping, I dare say."
 
 "No, nothing at all."
 
 "A great deal of good management, depend upon it. Yes, yes. _they_ will
 take care not to outrun their income. _They_ will never be distressed
 for money. Well, much good may it do them! And so, I suppose, they often
 talk of having Longbourn when your father is dead. They look upon it as
 quite their own, I dare say, whenever that happens."
 
 "It was a subject which they could not mention before me."
 
 "No; it would have been strange if they had; but I make no doubt they
 often talk of it between themselves. Well, if they can be easy with an
 estate that is not lawfully their own, so much the better. I should be
 ashamed of having one that was only entailed on me."
 
 
 
 Chapter 41
 
 
 The first week of their return was soon gone. The second began. It was
 the last of the regiment's stay in Meryton, and all the young ladies
 in the neighbourhood were drooping apace. The dejection was almost
 universal. The elder Miss Bennets alone were still able to eat, drink,
 and sleep, and pursue the usual course of their employments. Very
 frequently were they reproached for this insensibility by Kitty and
 Lydia, whose own misery was extreme, and who could not comprehend such
 hard-heartedness in any of the family.
--**--**--
 us all which must arise from the public notice of Lydia's unguarded and
 imprudent manner--nay, which has already arisen from it, I am sure you
 would judge differently in the affair."
 
 "Already arisen?" repeated Mr. Bennet. "What, has she frightened away
 some of your lovers? Poor little Lizzy! But do not be cast down. Such
 squeamish youths as cannot bear to be connected with a little absurdity
 are not worth a regret. Come, let me see the list of pitiful fellows who
 have been kept aloof by Lydia's folly."
 
 "Indeed you are mistaken. I have no such injuries to resent. It is not
 of particular, but of general evils, which I am now complaining. Our
 importance, our respectability in the world must be affected by the
 wild volatility, the assurance and disdain of all restraint which mark
 Lydia's character. Excuse me, for I must speak plainly. If you, my dear
 father, will not take the trouble of checking her exuberant spirits, and
 of teaching her that her present pursuits are not to be the business of
 her life, she will soon be beyond the reach of amendment. Her character
 will be fixed, and she will, at sixteen, be the most determined flirt
 that ever made herself or her family ridiculous; a flirt, too, in the
 worst and meanest degree of flirtation; without any attraction beyond
 youth and a tolerable person; and, from the ignorance and emptiness
 of her mind, wholly unable to ward off any portion of that universal
 contempt which her rage for admiration will excite. In this danger
 Kitty also is comprehended. She will follow wherever Lydia leads. Vain,
 ignorant, idle, and absolutely uncontrolled! Oh! my dear father, can you
 suppose it possible that they will not be censured and despised wherever
 they are known, and that their sisters will not be often involved in the
--**--**--
 children, was so highly reprehensible. But she had never felt so
 strongly as now the disadvantages which must attend the children of so
 unsuitable a marriage, nor ever been so fully aware of the evils arising
 from so ill-judged a direction of talents; talents, which, rightly used,
 might at least have preserved the respectability of his daughters, even
 if incapable of enlarging the mind of his wife.
 
 When Elizabeth had rejoiced over Wickham's departure she found little
 other cause for satisfaction in the loss of the regiment. Their parties
 abroad were less varied than before, and at home she had a mother and
 sister whose constant repinings at the dullness of everything around
 them threw a real gloom over their domestic circle; and, though Kitty
 might in time regain her natural degree of sense, since the disturbers
 of her brain were removed, her other sister, from whose disposition
 greater evil might be apprehended, was likely to be hardened in all
 her folly and assurance by a situation of such double danger as a
 watering-place and a camp. Upon the whole, therefore, she found, what
 has been sometimes found before, that an event to which she had been
 looking with impatient desire did not, in taking place, bring all the
 satisfaction she had promised herself. It was consequently necessary to
 name some other period for the commencement of actual felicity--to have
 some other point on which her wishes and hopes might be fixed, and by
 again enjoying the pleasure of anticipation, console herself for the
 present, and prepare for another disappointment. Her tour to the Lakes
 was now the object of her happiest thoughts; it was her best consolation
 for all the uncomfortable hours which the discontentedness of her mother
 and Kitty made inevitable; and could she have included Jane in the
--**--**--
 likeness of Mr. Wickham, suspended, amongst several other miniatures,
 over the mantelpiece. Her aunt asked her, smilingly, how she liked it.
 The housekeeper came forward, and told them it was a picture of a young
 gentleman, the son of her late master's steward, who had been brought
 up by him at his own expense. "He is now gone into the army," she added;
 "but I am afraid he has turned out very wild."
 
 Mrs. Gardiner looked at her niece with a smile, but Elizabeth could not
 return it.
 
 "And that," said Mrs. Reynolds, pointing to another of the miniatures,
 "is my master--and very like him. It was drawn at the same time as the
 other--about eight years ago."
 
 "I have heard much of your master's fine person," said Mrs. Gardiner,
 looking at the picture; "it is a handsome face. But, Lizzy, you can tell
 us whether it is like or not."
 
 Mrs. Reynolds respect for Elizabeth seemed to increase on this
 intimation of her knowing her master.
 
 "Does that young lady know Mr. Darcy?"
 
 Elizabeth coloured, and said: "A little."
 
 "And do not you think him a very handsome gentleman, ma'am?"
 
 "Yes, very handsome."
 
 "I am sure I know none so handsome; but in the gallery up stairs you
 will see a finer, larger picture of him than this. This room was my late
 master's favourite room, and these miniatures are just as they used to
 be then. He was very fond of them."
 
 This accounted to Elizabeth for Mr. Wickham's being among them.
 
 Mrs. Reynolds then directed their attention to one of Miss Darcy, drawn
 when she was only eight years old.
 
 "And is Miss Darcy as handsome as her brother?" said Mrs. Gardiner.
 
 "Oh! yes--the handsomest young lady that ever was seen; and so
 accomplished!--She plays and sings all day long. In the next room is
--**--**--
 world."
 
 Elizabeth almost stared at her. "Can this be Mr. Darcy?" thought she.
 
 "His father was an excellent man," said Mrs. Gardiner.
 
 "Yes, ma'am, that he was indeed; and his son will be just like him--just
 as affable to the poor."
 
 Elizabeth listened, wondered, doubted, and was impatient for more. Mrs.
 Reynolds could interest her on no other point. She related the subjects
 of the pictures, the dimensions of the rooms, and the price of the
 furniture, in vain. Mr. Gardiner, highly amused by the kind of family
 prejudice to which he attributed her excessive commendation of her
 master, soon led again to the subject; and she dwelt with energy on his
 many merits as they proceeded together up the great staircase.
 
 "He is the best landlord, and the best master," said she, "that ever
 lived; not like the wild young men nowadays, who think of nothing but
 themselves. There is not one of his tenants or servants but will give
 him a good name. Some people call him proud; but I am sure I never saw
 anything of it. To my fancy, it is only because he does not rattle away
 like other young men."
 
 "In what an amiable light does this place him!" thought Elizabeth.
 
 "This fine account of him," whispered her aunt as they walked, "is not
 quite consistent with his behaviour to our poor friend."
 
 "Perhaps we might be deceived."
 
 "That is not very likely; our authority was too good."
 
 On reaching the spacious lobby above they were shown into a very pretty
 sitting-room, lately fitted up with greater elegance and lightness than
 the apartments below; and were informed that it was but just done to
 give pleasure to Miss Darcy, who had taken a liking to the room when
 last at Pemberley.
 
 "He is certainly a good brother," said Elizabeth, as she walked towards
--**--**--
 distinguished no part of the scene. Her thoughts were all fixed on that
 one spot of Pemberley House, whichever it might be, where Mr. Darcy then
 was. She longed to know what at the moment was passing in his mind--in
 what manner he thought of her, and whether, in defiance of everything,
 she was still dear to him. Perhaps he had been civil only because he
 felt himself at ease; yet there had been _that_ in his voice which was
 not like ease. Whether he had felt more of pain or of pleasure in
 seeing her she could not tell, but he certainly had not seen her with
 composure.
 
 At length, however, the remarks of her companions on her absence of mind
 aroused her, and she felt the necessity of appearing more like herself.
 
 They entered the woods, and bidding adieu to the river for a while,
 ascended some of the higher grounds; when, in spots where the opening of
 the trees gave the eye power to wander, were many charming views of the
 valley, the opposite hills, with the long range of woods overspreading
 many, and occasionally part of the stream. Mr. Gardiner expressed a wish
 of going round the whole park, but feared it might be beyond a walk.
 With a triumphant smile they were told that it was ten miles round.
 It settled the matter; and they pursued the accustomed circuit; which
 brought them again, after some time, in a descent among hanging woods,
 to the edge of the water, and one of its narrowest parts. They crossed
 it by a simple bridge, in character with the general air of the scene;
 it was a spot less adorned than any they had yet visited; and the
 valley, here contracted into a glen, allowed room only for the stream,
--**--**--
 his relations in Kent, his actions were capable of a very different
 construction; and that his character was by no means so faulty, nor
 Wickham's so amiable, as they had been considered in Hertfordshire. In
 confirmation of this, she related the particulars of all the pecuniary
 transactions in which they had been connected, without actually naming
 her authority, but stating it to be such as might be relied on.
 
 Mrs. Gardiner was surprised and concerned; but as they were now
 approaching the scene of her former pleasures, every idea gave way to
 the charm of recollection; and she was too much engaged in pointing out
 to her husband all the interesting spots in its environs to think of
 anything else. Fatigued as she had been by the morning's walk they
 had no sooner dined than she set off again in quest of her former
 acquaintance, and the evening was spent in the satisfactions of a
 intercourse renewed after many years' discontinuance.
 
 The occurrences of the day were too full of interest to leave Elizabeth
 much attention for any of these new friends; and she could do nothing
 but think, and think with wonder, of Mr. Darcy's civility, and, above
 all, of his wishing her to be acquainted with his sister.
 
 
 
 Chapter 44
 
 
 Elizabeth had settled it that Mr. Darcy would bring his sister to visit
 her the very day after her reaching Pemberley; and was consequently
 resolved not to be out of sight of the inn the whole of that morning.
 But her conclusion was false; for on the very morning after their
 arrival at Lambton, these visitors came. They had been walking about the
 place with some of their new friends, and were just returning to the inn
 to dress themselves for dining with the same family, when the sound of a
--**--**--
 how _she_, whom the invitation most concerned, felt disposed as to its
 acceptance, but Elizabeth had turned away her head. Presuming however,
 that this studied avoidance spoke rather a momentary embarrassment than
 any dislike of the proposal, and seeing in her husband, who was fond of
 society, a perfect willingness to accept it, she ventured to engage for
 her attendance, and the day after the next was fixed on.
 
 Bingley expressed great pleasure in the certainty of seeing Elizabeth
 again, having still a great deal to say to her, and many inquiries to
 make after all their Hertfordshire friends. Elizabeth, construing all
 this into a wish of hearing her speak of her sister, was pleased, and on
 this account, as well as some others, found herself, when their
 visitors left them, capable of considering the last half-hour with some
 satisfaction, though while it was passing, the enjoyment of it had been
 little. Eager to be alone, and fearful of inquiries or hints from her
 uncle and aunt, she stayed with them only long enough to hear their
 favourable opinion of Bingley, and then hurried away to dress.
 
 But she had no reason to fear Mr. and Mrs. Gardiner's curiosity; it was
 not their wish to force her communication. It was evident that she was
 much better acquainted with Mr. Darcy than they had before any idea of;
 it was evident that he was very much in love with her. They saw much to
 interest, but nothing to justify inquiry.
 
 Of Mr. Darcy it was now a matter of anxiety to think well; and, as far
 as their acquaintance reached, there was no fault to find. They could
 not be untouched by his politeness; and had they drawn his character
 from their own feelings and his servant's report, without any reference
--**--**--
 cried; "I never in my life saw anyone so much altered as she is since
 the winter. She is grown so brown and coarse! Louisa and I were agreeing
 that we should not have known her again."
 
 However little Mr. Darcy might have liked such an address, he contented
 himself with coolly replying that he perceived no other alteration than
 her being rather tanned, no miraculous consequence of travelling in the
 summer.
 
 "For my own part," she rejoined, "I must confess that I never could
 see any beauty in her. Her face is too thin; her complexion has no
 brilliancy; and her features are not at all handsome. Her nose
 wants character--there is nothing marked in its lines. Her teeth are
 tolerable, but not out of the common way; and as for her eyes,
 which have sometimes been called so fine, I could never see anything
 extraordinary in them. They have a sharp, shrewish look, which I do
 not like at all; and in her air altogether there is a self-sufficiency
 without fashion, which is intolerable."
 
 Persuaded as Miss Bingley was that Darcy admired Elizabeth, this was not
 the best method of recommending herself; but angry people are not always
 wise; and in seeing him at last look somewhat nettled, she had all the
 success she expected. He was resolutely silent, however, and, from a
 determination of making him speak, she continued:
 
 "I remember, when we first knew her in Hertfordshire, how amazed we all
 were to find that she was a reputed beauty; and I particularly recollect
 your saying one night, after they had been dining at Netherfield, '_She_
 a beauty!--I should as soon call her mother a wit.' But afterwards she
 seemed to improve on you, and I believe you thought her rather pretty at
 one time."
--**--**--
 nothing can be done--I know very well that nothing can be done. How is
 such a man to be worked on? How are they even to be discovered? I have
 not the smallest hope. It is every way horrible!"
 
 Darcy shook his head in silent acquiescence.
 
 "When _my_ eyes were opened to his real character--Oh! had I known what
 I ought, what I dared to do! But I knew not--I was afraid of doing too
 much. Wretched, wretched mistake!"
 
 Darcy made no answer. He seemed scarcely to hear her, and was walking
 up and down the room in earnest meditation, his brow contracted, his air
 gloomy. Elizabeth soon observed, and instantly understood it. Her
 power was sinking; everything _must_ sink under such a proof of family
 weakness, such an assurance of the deepest disgrace. She could neither
 wonder nor condemn, but the belief of his self-conquest brought nothing
 consolatory to her bosom, afforded no palliation of her distress. It
 was, on the contrary, exactly calculated to make her understand her own
 wishes; and never had she so honestly felt that she could have loved
 him, as now, when all love must be vain.
 
 But self, though it would intrude, could not engross her. Lydia--the
 humiliation, the misery she was bringing on them all, soon swallowed
 up every private care; and covering her face with her handkerchief,
 Elizabeth was soon lost to everything else; and, after a pause of
 several minutes, was only recalled to a sense of her situation by
 the voice of her companion, who, in a manner which, though it spoke
 compassion, spoke likewise restraint, said, "I am afraid you have been
 long desiring my absence, nor have I anything to plead in excuse of my
 stay, but real, though unavailing concern. Would to Heaven that anything
--**--**--
 She was wild to be at home--to hear, to see, to be upon the spot to
 share with Jane in the cares that must now fall wholly upon her, in a
 family so deranged, a father absent, a mother incapable of exertion, and
 requiring constant attendance; and though almost persuaded that nothing
 could be done for Lydia, her uncle's interference seemed of the utmost
 importance, and till he entered the room her impatience was severe. Mr.
 and Mrs. Gardiner had hurried back in alarm, supposing by the servant's
 account that their niece was taken suddenly ill; but satisfying them
 instantly on that head, she eagerly communicated the cause of their
 summons, reading the two letters aloud, and dwelling on the postscript
 of the last with trembling energy, though Lydia had never been a
 favourite with them, Mr. and Mrs. Gardiner could not but be deeply
 afflicted. Not Lydia only, but all were concerned in it; and after the
 first exclamations of surprise and horror, Mr. Gardiner promised every
 assistance in his power. Elizabeth, though expecting no less, thanked
 him with tears of gratitude; and all three being actuated by one spirit,
 everything relating to their journey was speedily settled. They were to
 be off as soon as possible. "But what is to be done about Pemberley?"
 cried Mrs. Gardiner. "John told us Mr. Darcy was here when you sent for
 us; was it so?"
 
 "Yes; and I told him we should not be able to keep our engagement.
 _That_ is all settled."
 
 "What is all settled?" repeated the other, as she ran into her room to
 prepare. "And are they upon such terms as for her to disclose the real
 truth? Oh, that I knew how it was!"
 
 But wishes were vain, or at least could only serve to amuse her in the
--**--**--
 
 "Well, then--supposing them to be in London. They may be there, though
 for the purpose of concealment, for no more exceptional purpose. It is
 not likely that money should be very abundant on either side; and it
 might strike them that they could be more economically, though less
 expeditiously, married in London than in Scotland."
 
 "But why all this secrecy? Why any fear of detection? Why must their
 marriage be private? Oh, no, no--this is not likely. His most particular
 friend, you see by Jane's account, was persuaded of his never intending
 to marry her. Wickham will never marry a woman without some money. He
 cannot afford it. And what claims has Lydia--what attraction has she
 beyond youth, health, and good humour that could make him, for her sake,
 forego every chance of benefiting himself by marrying well? As to what
 restraint the apprehensions of disgrace in the corps might throw on a
 dishonourable elopement with her, I am not able to judge; for I know
 nothing of the effects that such a step might produce. But as to your
 other objection, I am afraid it will hardly hold good. Lydia has
 no brothers to step forward; and he might imagine, from my father's
 behaviour, from his indolence and the little attention he has ever
 seemed to give to what was going forward in his family, that _he_ would
 do as little, and think as little about it, as any father could do, in
 such a matter."
 
 "But can you think that Lydia is so lost to everything but love of him
 as to consent to live with him on any terms other than marriage?"
 
 "It does seem, and it is most shocking indeed," replied Elizabeth, with
 tears in her eyes, "that a sister's sense of decency and virtue in such
--**--**--
 everything will be well."
 
 "Is my father in town?"
 
 "Yes, he went on Tuesday, as I wrote you word."
 
 "And have you heard from him often?"
 
 "We have heard only twice. He wrote me a few lines on Wednesday to say
 that he had arrived in safety, and to give me his directions, which I
 particularly begged him to do. He merely added that he should not write
 again till he had something of importance to mention."
 
 "And my mother--how is she? How are you all?"
 
 "My mother is tolerably well, I trust; though her spirits are greatly
 shaken. She is up stairs and will have great satisfaction in seeing you
 all. She does not yet leave her dressing-room. Mary and Kitty, thank
 Heaven, are quite well."
 
 "But you--how are you?" cried Elizabeth. "You look pale. How much you
 must have gone through!"
 
 Her sister, however, assured her of her being perfectly well; and their
 conversation, which had been passing while Mr. and Mrs. Gardiner were
 engaged with their children, was now put an end to by the approach
 of the whole party. Jane ran to her uncle and aunt, and welcomed and
 thanked them both, with alternate smiles and tears.
 
 When they were all in the drawing-room, the questions which Elizabeth
 had already asked were of course repeated by the others, and they soon
 found that Jane had no intelligence to give. The sanguine hope of
 good, however, which the benevolence of her heart suggested had not yet
 deserted her; she still expected that it would all end well, and that
 every morning would bring some letter, either from Lydia or her father,
 to explain their proceedings, and, perhaps, announce their marriage.
 
 Mrs. Bennet, to whose apartment they all repaired, after a few minutes'
 conversation together, received them exactly as might be expected; with
--**--**--
 the subject, by saying, "But tell me all and everything about it which
 I have not already heard. Give me further particulars. What did Colonel
 Forster say? Had they no apprehension of anything before the elopement
 took place? They must have seen them together for ever."
 
 "Colonel Forster did own that he had often suspected some partiality,
 especially on Lydia's side, but nothing to give him any alarm. I am so
 grieved for him! His behaviour was attentive and kind to the utmost. He
 _was_ coming to us, in order to assure us of his concern, before he had
 any idea of their not being gone to Scotland: when that apprehension
 first got abroad, it hastened his journey."
 
 "And was Denny convinced that Wickham would not marry? Did he know of
 their intending to go off? Had Colonel Forster seen Denny himself?"
 
 "Yes; but, when questioned by _him_, Denny denied knowing anything of
 their plans, and would not give his real opinion about it. He did not
 repeat his persuasion of their not marrying--and from _that_, I am
 inclined to hope, he might have been misunderstood before."
 
 "And till Colonel Forster came himself, not one of you entertained a
 doubt, I suppose, of their being really married?"
 
 "How was it possible that such an idea should enter our brains? I felt
 a little uneasy--a little fearful of my sister's happiness with him
 in marriage, because I knew that his conduct had not been always quite
 right. My father and mother knew nothing of that; they only felt how
 imprudent a match it must be. Kitty then owned, with a very natural
 triumph on knowing more than the rest of us, that in Lydia's last letter
 she had prepared her for such a step. She had known, it seems, of their
--**--**--
 Kitty is slight and delicate; and Mary studies so much, that her hours
 of repose should not be broken in on. My aunt Phillips came to Longbourn
 on Tuesday, after my father went away; and was so good as to stay till
 Thursday with me. She was of great use and comfort to us all. And
 Lady Lucas has been very kind; she walked here on Wednesday morning to
 condole with us, and offered her services, or any of her daughters', if
 they should be of use to us."
 
 "She had better have stayed at home," cried Elizabeth; "perhaps she
 _meant_ well, but, under such a misfortune as this, one cannot see
 too little of one's neighbours. Assistance is impossible; condolence
 insufferable. Let them triumph over us at a distance, and be satisfied."
 
 She then proceeded to inquire into the measures which her father had
 intended to pursue, while in town, for the recovery of his daughter.
 
 "He meant I believe," replied Jane, "to go to Epsom, the place where
 they last changed horses, see the postilions and try if anything could
 be made out from them. His principal object must be to discover the
 number of the hackney coach which took them from Clapham. It had come
 with a fare from London; and as he thought that the circumstance of a
 gentleman and lady's removing from one carriage into another might
 be remarked he meant to make inquiries at Clapham. If he could anyhow
 discover at what house the coachman had before set down his fare, he
 determined to make inquiries there, and hoped it might not be impossible
 to find out the stand and number of the coach. I do not know of any
 other designs that he had formed; but he was in such a hurry to be gone,
--**--**--
 to his brother-in-law's entreaty that he would return to his family, and
 leave it to him to do whatever occasion might suggest to be advisable
 for continuing their pursuit. When Mrs. Bennet was told of this, she did
 not express so much satisfaction as her children expected, considering
 what her anxiety for his life had been before.
 
 "What, is he coming home, and without poor Lydia?" she cried. "Sure he
 will not leave London before he has found them. Who is to fight Wickham,
 and make him marry her, if he comes away?"
 
 As Mrs. Gardiner began to wish to be at home, it was settled that she
 and the children should go to London, at the same time that Mr. Bennet
 came from it. The coach, therefore, took them the first stage of their
 journey, and brought its master back to Longbourn.
 
 Mrs. Gardiner went away in all the perplexity about Elizabeth and her
 Derbyshire friend that had attended her from that part of the world. His
 name had never been voluntarily mentioned before them by her niece; and
 the kind of half-expectation which Mrs. Gardiner had formed, of their
 being followed by a letter from him, had ended in nothing. Elizabeth had
 received none since her return that could come from Pemberley.
 
 The present unhappy state of the family rendered any other excuse for
 the lowness of her spirits unnecessary; nothing, therefore, could be
 fairly conjectured from _that_, though Elizabeth, who was by this time
 tolerably well acquainted with her own feelings, was perfectly aware
 that, had she known nothing of Darcy, she could have borne the dread of
 Lydia's infamy somewhat better. It would have spared her, she thought,
 one sleepless night out of two.
 
 When Mr. Bennet arrived, he had all the appearance of his usual
--**--**--
 
 "Well, and what news does it bring--good or bad?"
 
 "What is there of good to be expected?" said he, taking the letter from
 his pocket. "But perhaps you would like to read it."
 
 Elizabeth impatiently caught it from his hand. Jane now came up.
 
 "Read it aloud," said their father, "for I hardly know myself what it is
 about."
 
 "Gracechurch Street, Monday, August 2.
 
 "MY DEAR BROTHER,
 
 "At last I am able to send you some tidings of my niece, and such as,
 upon the whole, I hope it will give you satisfaction. Soon after you
 left me on Saturday, I was fortunate enough to find out in what part of
 London they were. The particulars I reserve till we meet; it is enough
 to know they are discovered. I have seen them both--"
 
 "Then it is as I always hoped," cried Jane; "they are married!"
 
 Elizabeth read on:
 
 "I have seen them both. They are not married, nor can I find there
 was any intention of being so; but if you are willing to perform the
 engagements which I have ventured to make on your side, I hope it will
 not be long before they are. All that is required of you is, to assure
 to your daughter, by settlement, her equal share of the five thousand
 pounds secured among your children after the decease of yourself and
 my sister; and, moreover, to enter into an engagement of allowing her,
 during your life, one hundred pounds per annum. These are conditions
 which, considering everything, I had no hesitation in complying with,
 as far as I thought myself privileged, for you. I shall send this by
 express, that no time may be lost in bringing me your answer. You
 will easily comprehend, from these particulars, that Mr. Wickham's
 circumstances are not so hopeless as they are generally believed to be.